I wonder where I'll float next?
hey, a package!
When self-reference, irony, and meta-humor go too far
A CAUTIONARY TALE
This statement wouldn't be funny if not for irony!
ha ha
ha ha, I guess.
20,000 years later...
None of the places i floated had mommies.
I'm a poisson distribution!
Still a poisson distribution.
What the hell, man.  Why do you keep saying that?
Because I'm totally a poisson distribution.
I'm less than zero.
What time is it?
Now.
That's a pretty boring answer.
Is not.
It's the least boring answer imaginable.
Sometimes I just can't get outraged over copyright law
Before you talk to me, I should warn you: I am kind of strange
We are the knights who say... Ni!!
hahaha
We are the knights who... Oh, God, I'm so sorry
So sorry the car just came too fast and
She was right there and I sasw her and then it was a blur and so much I ran to help didn't know she wasn't moving I'm so sorry ... so sorry
Anyway, yeah, knights who say "Ni".
Here, take a bite of this Snapple.
food!
Ow! What is this? 
It's an apple infused with tin.
I once tried to start the urban legend that George Clinton has a B.A. in mathematics
...but I wanted it to be true so badly that I started believing it myself.
Why on earth did you make those wings? You don't seriously think they could let your ferret fly, right?
I... of course not.
That would be pretty dumb. It's just, uh... ...a Halloween costume.
oh, okay.
Besides, who would want a pet to fly anyway?
Yeah. Pretty lame, huh?
Anyway, let's go play video games.
Nice store. How do you keep the floors so clean?
Oh, we hired this dude named Kepler, he's really good hard worker.  Doesn't mind the monotony. Sweeps out the same area every night.
Wow!
it's just so hard to compare kids now with kids in the past. you can't help but to belong to one group or the other.
and of course every generation seems awful to the one before it. look at quotes from throughout history.
yeah, and it sure would be nice to have some perspective on some of this stuff. I just don't know what to make of it.
i guess you do what you can to help the people around you and hope it turns out okay.
in the end, what else can you do?
lead a crusade?
There's too much. And so little feels important.
Hi, Dr. Elizabeth?  Yeah, uh ... I accidentally took the Fourier transform of my cat ...
Meow!
What do you get when you cross an Elephant with a Rhino?
I haven't a goddamn clue.
Donner, party of four?
Actually, never mind.
We're full.
The sky is so blue, and all the leaves are green.
Haven' t you ever wondered if we really see the same colors as everyone else? It's all perception.
Well, you might as well call into question all of human experience. Who really knows what world someone else sees?
Yeah, I guess.
Anyway, can you help me down from this pole?
What pole?
I promise never to never again squeeze humor out of self-reference.
God dammit.
Another from my high-school notebooks.
Man, that's a sweet ass-car.
Hey, these don't taste like apples!
Fuck off, dad.
Sooner or later, my friend, one of us will run out of time.
WELL, YOU STUMPED ME...
I love you!
I love you!
I love you more!
Yeah.
You know what? If you've never played the 1995 SNES RPG 'Seiken Densetsu' don't even _bother_ reading today's strip. We don't _need_ your kind here.
Robert Smith should do a cover of Coldplay's 'Clocks,' so when he sings "Am I part of the cure 
Why didn't you wait for me?
I thought you were gone forever!
I said I'd be back in a minute!
The . . . the seconds went fast at first, but then they started to drag on. She was there for me.
You had an affair in the 90 seconds I was gone?!
. . . yes.
And we had a son.
He'd be about your age now.
Why do you love me?
I don't know; My heart never gave me a choice.
Aww.
I wish it had.
What do you want to do when you graduate ?
I want to become a lighthouse operator.
Oh ?
Yeah.
Lighthouses are built on interesting pieces of coast, so I'll have an interesting place to walk and swim, and great views of all kinds of weather.  I'd feel good about myself and my work every single day.
I'd get to be the girl in the tower, only I'd be the one rescuing people.
Why. What do you want to do ?
I'm going to grad school.  I don't really know why.
Wanna come hang in my lighthouse over breaks ?
...yeah.
Look, I know you think that since I walked out she could use a guy like you. But trust me. That woman has a lot going on, and you want none of it.
Get out while you still can.
Asolarplexussayswhat?
What?
Man, she's hot
Whatever, you are so gay.
C'mon, everyone knows you're the gay one
Hey, your mom's pretty masculine, but sleeping with her doesn't make me gay.
Fag.
Ass pirate.
Fudge packer
Cock jockey
Cum dumpster.
Okay, seriously, are you gay? Because if you've been holding out on me, we're missing out.
No, it's cool.
OK me neither.
At least, thanks to your constant fawning, we have an *excuse* for our social ineptness. What's *yours*?
It's 80's night at the club. Wanna go?
There is no Tuesday.
Jack the Ripper or Jack Black?
You crashed my helicopter!
Verily!
Basically, neither of us have shins.
Over and out.
shitshitshitshitshit
shitdaylightsavings
shitshitshitshitsh
You're out of ointment and out of time!
Does being a mermaid for five minutes make you gay?
I hope so!
Barbershops are for pussies.
My hair is bleeding.
3
Bachelor party!
STRETCHY DEATH
Staring at the ceiling, she asked me what I was thinking about.
I should have made something up.
The Bellman-Ford algorithm makes terrible pillow talk.
We made it so far together but then I lost you in the trees.
Finally
How did you spend your morning?
Feeding rocks to children in the park.
Your sociopathic abuse of random strangers staggers me.
I aspire to have more creativity than the common asshole.
I'm more of a classy asshole -- A class-hole, if you will. For example, I like poking tiny holes in styrofoam noodle cups at the grocery store--
Thanks to me, someone gets surprise boiling water in the lap.
I am in awe.
It's even more fun to do to condoms.
What time is it?
What a gosh-darned cunt.
I worry that I'm just with you because it's familiar. Of course no one else compares. I've known you for so long that I'd have to spend years with someone to build up this kind of connection 
But I guess this is really all I can ask for.
This is probably a bad time to bring this up, but I don't actually like you.
I feel like I'm wasting my life on the internet. Let's walk around the world.
Sounds good.
And yet all I can think is, "This will make for a great LiveJournal entry."
THE WORLD IS BURNING.
RUN.
What time can you pick Michael up?
Well, I can meet the plane at ten of six.
Do you know where to find him?
I'll meet him at the stairs before the gate.
This IS my other car.
Attention,
To the owner of a Dodge Viper SRT-10 with license plate "MYTOY", your lights are on and your windshield was just smashed with a golf club.
Can you pause for a moment and help me with something?
You know, our love is like a katamari.  We travel along, rolling up more and more of the world into our shared experience, taking it and making it our own.
I, you... wow.  Geekiness aside, that was actually incredibly sweet.
The clutter of everyday life, with a simple core to tie it together, eventually becomes something grand as the world itself.
Okay, also sweet, but now I'm wondering if you could possibly get any gayer.
English should be the national language. These immigrants should have to learn English when they come here.
Yeah
When you go to live somewhere, you learn the language they speak there. English is the language of the land.
Excuse me, but osio Sarah dawado.
What the hell was that?
Woman: Cherokee.
Dear Sony, Microsoft, the MPAA, the RIAA, and Apple: Let's make a deal. You stop trying to tell me where, when, and how I play my movies and music, and I won't crush your homes under my inexorably advancing wall of ice.
probably secure.
secure.
VELOCIRAPTOR ENTRY POINT!
It's been over a decade since Jurassic Park opened, and I still size up buildings for their potential as shelter against velociraptor attacks.
Gravitational mass is identical to inertial mass. That is, the amount of inertia something has and the amount of gravity it has are effectively the same. What's interesting is that there doesn't seem to be any reason this should be true. One could imagine an extremely large object with lots of resistance to force and no gravity , but this is never observed.
You know what? I'm just gonna skip the rest of the buildup and say it: Yo mama's fat.
Where's my fucking jacket?
Over there, next to your regular one.
My what?
Never mind.
I love the time just before sunrise. It's quiet; no one is ever just walking about. It's like a secret. I always hope that I'll find someone else quietly hiding from sleep, and we'll see each other and sit and talk. I guess this is a bad place to meet people. I wish it weren't.
But as THICK as you are, pay attention 
My goal: To make enough money to hire Jeremy Irons, the voice of Scar from The Lion King, to follow me around and do my dialogue.
PENIS! Haha, penis.Do you think I could mail a running chainsaw to someone?
I doubt it.
What about a baby's first word?
Look, your obsession with sending strange things through the mail is getting out of hand.
Can you mail a blank stare?
A dizzying height?
Pi?
. . .
Well, did you at least get that package of time I sent you?
I . . . you . . . no, I didn't.
Well, there was a lot of it, so it will probably take a while.
Jeffy's ongoing struggle with obsessive-compulsive disorder
This weekend, my professor friend built a time machine out of a DeLorean and I went back in time! I helped make sure my parents got together and helped my dad to be less of a loser.
Wow! Do you still have the time machine?
Nah. But I did what I really needed to do.
Uh huh.
Okay, you remember that my father was in the WTC North Tower, right? 
Yeah...why?
I...nothing.
Sweet. I summoned myself from a parallel universe.
You know, he could vanish at any moment.
You should take this chance to make out with yourself.
. . . you know, _I_ could vanish at any moment.
I've heard that when the Wright brothers argued, they periodically switched sides in the debate to try to encourage a more balanced conclusion.
We should try that in our relationship!
It's a neat idea, but I think treating personal issues like a debate will only engender hostility and hurt feelings.
No, I think it would help, by forcing us to consider the other person's point of view.
Hmm, maybe you're right.
Am not.  It's a bad idea.
From the creators of last summer's hit thriller Snakes On a Plane comes:
 Snakes...  on EVERY Plane!
Much worse than last time.
I just feel like somewhere out there is the girl for me.
Yeah.
Someone loving and caring.
I know what you mean.
A girl whose only mode of transportation is the M.C. Hammer Slide.
Yeah.
...Wait, what?
People who can always make me smile
People who constantly show me new things about the world
People I want to spend the rest of my life with
YOU.
Vanilla Ice
You are like the prime numbers. Unpredictable turns, unconstrainable. Tantalizingly regular but never quite the same. I am like the Riemann-zeta function. A rippled curtain of the imagined and real. Deeply tied with you in ways incomprehensible. Although, strictly speaking, The Riemann-zeta function couldn't have given your herpes.
And the dumbest thing about emo kids is that... I... You know, I'm sick of easy targets. Anyone can make fun of emo kids. You know who's had it too easy? Computational Linguists. "Ooh, look at me! My field is so ill-defined, I can subscribe to any of dozens of contradictory models and still be taken seriously!"
It's probably a good thing that I never get to pick band names.
Maaan...
Hi, my name is Randall. I like candlelight dinners and long walks on the beach.
When I say long walks on the beach, I mean LONG walks on the beach. I've met people through these services who CLAIM to like long walks on the beach. But we'll be out there barely an hour before they start in with "I'm tired" and "Don't you think it's time we head back?"
I love that girl.  She's not afraid to be quirky and different.
You know, I'm active in street theatre and I collect and paint Asian dolls.
...Okay, I didn't actually mean be different.  I just want silly and entertaining on command now and then.
Do you like my centrifuge, Mister Bond? When I throw the lever, you will feel centrifugal force crush every bone in your body.
You mean centripetal force. There's no such thing as centrifugal force.
A laughable claim, Mister Bond, perpetuated by overzealous teachers of science. Simply construct Newton's laws into a rotating system and you will see a centrifugal force term appear as plain as day.
Come now, do you really expect me to do coordinate substitution in my head while strapped to a centrifuge?
No, Mr. Bond. I expect you to die.
DIY baby
 +1 Sassy
I've heard you're one of the best in marketing business, but I've got your portfolio here and looks like you've never run a major campaign. Why should I hire you to head our new initiative?
If you don't mind asking, what gave you the idea I was one of the best in the business?
Hm? I don't remember. Just word of mouth or someth-- ...oh, you're good.
Thank you. When can I start?
TOKYO DASH!!
Do you know anything about hackers? Can you jam with the console cowboys in cyberspace? Never experienced the new wave? Next wave? Dream wave? *OR* cyberpunk?
Best thing about having my own apartment: Holding fans in place so they twitch helplessly and make that clicking sound without my mom yelling at me.
What kind of music do you listen to?
Oh, a mix of things. Some classic rock like Boston, but then of course Queen and Bowie, Joan Jett...
Definitely, we need more of those sounds.
But there's some great newer stuff too, like Franz Ferdinand, The Donnas, and Audioslave.
Sometimes they're a little much for me. I go more for things like The Arcade Fire, sometimes mixing some electronic sounds like Postal Service.
Oh yeahhave you ever checked out Freezepop?
Mhm! Synth pop can be fun, but at the same time, I agree that sometimes you just need to blast some Metallica.
Who?
...Metallica.
Are they new?
I sound pretty knowledgeable about music until people figure out that I'm just naming bands from Guitar Hero.
Once upon a midnight dreary while I pondered, weak and weary, over many a quaint and curious volume of forgotten lore while i nodded, nearly napping, suddenly there came a tapping as if someone gently rapping rapping at my chamber door...
Yo.
Miss Lenhart couldn't be here today, so she asked me to substitute.
I've put out your test. Please get started.
Mr. Munroe, Miss Lenhardt never taught us this.
That's because Miss Lenhart doesn't understand how important certain kinds of math are.
But this just looks --
This material is more vital than anything you've ever learned
But --
No buts.
This is a matter of life and death.
_________
You should be more careful what you write. Future employers might read it.
When did we forget our dreams?
What?
The infinite possibilities each day holds should stagger the mind. The sheer number of experiences I could have is uncountable, breathtaking, and I'm sitting here refreshing my inbox. We live trapped in loops, reliving a few days over and over, and we envision only a handful of paths laid out before us. We see the same things every day, we respond the same way, we think the same thoughts, each day a slight variation on the last, every moment smoothly following the gentle curves of societal norms. We act like if we just get through today, tomorrow our dreams will come back to us.
And no, I don't have all the answers. I don't know how to jolt myself into seeing what each moment could become. But I do know one thing: the solution doesn't involve watering down my every little idea and creative impulse for the sake of some day easing my fit into a mold. It doesn't involve tempering my life to better fit someone's expectations. It doesn't involve constantly holding back for fear of shaking things up.
This is very important, so I want to say it as clearly as I can:
FUCK.
THAT.
SHIT.
Man, I suck at this game. Can you give me a few pointers?
0x3A28213A 0x6339392C, 0x7363682E.
I hate you.
I have leftover cheese. I should get chips and make nachos.
I have leftover chips. I should get cheese and make nachos.
A delicious cycle
Philippe, your hearing is perfect! In fact, you heard ALL the beeps! You have super-hearing! You're needed at Hogwarts!
Oh boy!
Beef, check this out. I got an invite to that The Dude Is Pretty Awesome In Most Measurable Ways I Mean Wow competition.
Alright that is pretty sweet dogg what is your strategy gonna consist of
I'm thinkin' I need to point out my best features--maybe go holdin' a sign with an arrow toward my junk.
Yeah well I always said subtlety was your middle name dogg
And also your first and last in case they didn't get the point
How do you think I should play it?
Well basically you got no chance as I see it these dudes are all lovers and fighters to the last
All sprung fully formed from the head of Sweet Sweetback
You are gonna stand out as the sort of dude who stays at home all night playing fleshlight tag
These words you got are crazy. Didn't I win the outdoor fight?
Uh huh about the fight I wasn't gonna tell you but how could you miss that I was setting you up
What?
You got played dogg
I basically just didn't have the heart to go through with it in the end.
Anyway the point is that you are gonna lose this thing so hard
All cheap McD's hamburger to their slabs of steak
A couple 12-oz sirloins garnished with nothing but pure manhood
Maybe some sprigs of parsley
You are pretty much going down
In today's megaxkcd, our protagonist comes to terms with his romantic love for a girl who is a video game console accessory.
Wait, I'm not sure we should parody megatokyo.
Fred Gallagher does seem like he might take it kind of hard.
He really does.
Poor guy.  We should try to cheer him up.
Fred?  Fred, please come out.  It's OK.  Don't cry, Fred.
We... we baked you a cake.
THINGS I AM UPPITY ABOUT: "They" as a third-person singular gender-free pronoun.
I'm all for it!
But isn't that terrible grammar?
Only by recent convention!  It's been in use that way for centuries, and its use is widely accepted!  ALSO: this lets us avoid ridiculous constructs like "he
T-Rex, I... agree.
What?
That sounds good to me!
Normally I'd jump in with an objection, but I think your point makes sense.
Could it be that the rift in our author's mind has finally healed?  Is he no longer locked in perpetual war with the self-doubt that lurks in his subc-
IN A WORLD WHERE THERE IS STILL A LAND BRIDGE BETWEEN ASIA AND NORTH AMERICA FOR SOME REASON:
-onscious?
ALSO HOW ABOUT IN THIS WORLD EVERYONE IS BICURIOUS
Dude, you should get on MySpace.
Eh, I don't think so.
C'mon. There's no real reason not to except snobbiness. It's the new social scene.
I know. I'm just not interested.
Please? I'll friend you.
Carebearstare.
What?
I saw a cute girl outside the bank today. She looked nice.
Oh no, not again. You are the _worst_ judge of these things.
But she was so sweet. Shy, but there was something in her eyes. A pain down in her soul, the same as the one down in mine.
Mm hmm.
The police light played through her mohawk like the sun setting through pine trees as she shoveled the third hooker into the trunk of the camry...
Back up.
Yeah, did you see what he said on his wobsite?
...his what?
Wobsite.
... I think you mean "website."
Why don't you write about it in your blag?
 Make me a sandwich.
 What?  Make it yourself.
 Sudo make me a sandwich.
 OkayHey, I was wondering if you had plans for-- holy crap, what happened to your apartment?
I filled it with playpen balls!
I... what? Why?
Because we're grown-ups now, and it's our turn to decide what that means.
For our anniversary, my boyfriend took me hiking in the mountains.
My boyfriend proposed to me.
They should call you Mario, 'cause you just got <<1-up'd.>>
You have awakened me from the lamp. You may have three wishes. What does your heart desire?
I'd like a human-sized hamster ball.
Sweet!
And your other wishes?
Why would I need other wishes?
My cryptosystem is like any Feistel cipher, except in the S-Boxes we simply take the bitstring down, flip it, and reverse it.
Professor, that man claims the earth is 6,000 years old!
So? Just use your head and don't concern yourself overmuch with what other people think.
But he says the fossils in the mountains were put there in a flood!
Well, evidence suggests that they were not.
But he--
A million people can call the mountains a fiction, yet it need not trouble you as you stand atop them.
But he believes the silliest things!
So?
The universe doesn't care what you _believe_. The wonderful thing about science is that it doesn't ask for your faith, it just asks for your eyes.
But he's a US Senator!
Ah, then yes, we do have a bit of a situation.
In solidarity with the many AOL users whose often embarrassing web searches were released to the public, I offer a sample of my own search history:
Hey, can you do me a favor?
Commented!
Huh?
Wait, what does that gesture even mean?
Sorry guys no comic today.  I've gotta go to the doctor to get my thighs rotated. But here's some new character art I'm working on!
It's been six months and I still have those dreams where you're pressed tight against me, where you look into my eyes and give me that grin and it's like you've forgotten everything.
And something in the back of my head says it's wrong, it's not like this anymore, but I push it down.  In the morning, I tell myself I can't control my dreams, but there's a part of me that doesn't want them to stop.
And honestly, waking up would be a lot easier if your mom didn't look so much like you.
There's always that moment of confusion.
 MEGAN!
 Oh my god,  I can't believe this is happening.
 I LOVE YOU!
Okay, that's great.  Wait a second.  Is ... is that ... Ice Ice Baby?  What the hell?
 I'm not very good at this.
And she's gonna feel like a jerk when she realizes it was actually Under Pressure.What? Sony has plenty of launch titles lined up that aren't lame sequels.
Name one. And furthermore, they... I... uh...
I can't do this. I can't parody Penny Arcade. I've got nothing on t hose guys. They're a class act, they know their audience, they know exactly what they're doing. Gabe experiments with his art, always bold and fresh without trying to perform. Tycho's writing continues to astound day after day. I can just see him, reading my uncultured swill masquerading as his florid prose.
But he's not angry, no. He's sitting at his desk smiling that condescending half-smile, the corner of his mouth belying the self-assurance of a writer who never misplaces a word. His firm hands rest easily on the keyboard, his right thumb caressing the space bar gently, as I enter the room. He knows I'm there without turning around, and I'm too nervous to speak. But I don't have to; he understands, I can see it in the way his eyes play over me, reading my fears and doubts in a glance and washing them away with a knowing smile. Then he's on his feet, he's in front of me, and I don't feel the electric jolt I expected as our hands meet. It's just warm, warm and right: As I sink into his eyes I feel a hand on my shoulder, and I see Tycho smile at someone behind me. Gabe is standing there, grinning that mischievous grin, and twirling his beloved cardboard tube between his fingers.
The night has just begun.
NAAAA NA NA NANA NANA NA NA KATAMARI DAMACY
and that's when you veered into the mailbox?
It looked smaller then me. It was just instinct.What are you doing? 
Spinning counterclockwise
Man, you're being inconsistent with your array indices.  Some are from one, some are from zero.
Different tasks call for different conventions.  To quote Stanford algorithm's expert Donald Knuth, "Who are you?  How did you get in my house?"
Wait, what?
Well, that's what he said when I asked him about it.
Yes, from the evidence it looks pretty likely to me that we're causing global warming on a horrific scale.  But with science you don't need to argue.  It doesn't matter who wins the debate -- it's about reality.  By just waiting a little longer, we'll get to SEE who was right.  It feels unethical but I find myself wanting to keep quiet about the science just to know for sure.  As terrible as it sounds, the state of the world isn't really my responsibility.  I'm just thrilled to get to watch.  If the scientists are right -- and if we keep people from understanding just a little longer -- we'll enjoy quite a ride.  And pragmatically, on the outside chance that they're all wrong, I get saved the embarrassment of having spoken up.
Hey, our turn signals are in sync!
What the hell?
Usually they're at least a little off. But I've been watching like 30 seconds and haven't seen any beat frequency!
Who are you?
You know, from the beat frequency you can tell the difference in timing of the two signals.
...
But ours are the same!
...
So, wanna hang out later?
The best part of getting older is gonna be intentionally misusing slang around teenagers just to watch them squirm.
Oh man, that song is so pwned!
<<twitch>>
There is no God. Our existence is without purpose.
Oh, definitely. 
We are adrift in an uncaring void indifferent to all our mortal toil.
Exactly! In the end, nothing we do matters.
 Totally.
We just... Why are you climbing that tree?
Because the future is an adventure! Come on!
But--
Hey! I found squirrels! Reverse Euphemisms
Oh, hey, school just let out and it's YMCA night, so I've gotta go take a shit.
What?
I mean I actually have to drop the kids off at the pool.
There are three words in the English language that end in "gry". "Angry" and "Hungry" are two. What's the third?
I don't think there is one, unless you cound really obscure words.
Ha! It's "language"! I said there are three words in "the English--" 
What th-AAAAAAAAAAAAAAA
Ok, listen carefully.
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA
Communicating badly then acting smug when you're misunderstood is not cleverness.
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA
I hope we've learned something today.
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA
Should we keep going?
I don't know.
We can turn back if you want.
Look--
Did it ever occur to you that maybe I don't have a plan any more than you?  Maybe just having this conversation means we're lost.
Kind of scary.
It's terrifying.
This place is beautiful.
Yeah.
friends. Double line: in a relationship. Arrow: one-way crush. Dashed line: acquaintances
He doubts she could've done they claimed she did.
That's what _SHE_ said!
Oh, um, I'm sorry, I was just ... um ... I guess I can hang out for a bit.Every morning for a week now I've gone out driving before sunrise.
I'm sure you've heard all about this sordid affair in those gossipy cryptographic protocol specs with those busybodies Schneier and Rivest, always taking Alice's side, always labeling me the attacker.
Yes, it's true.  I broke Bob's private key and extracted the text of her messages.  But does anyone realize how much it hurt?
He said it was nothing, but everything from the public-key authenticated signatures on the files to the lipstick heart smeared on the disk screamed "Alice."
I didn't want to believe.  Of course on some level I realized it was a known-plaintext attack.  But I couldn't admit it until I saw it for myself.
So before you so quickly label me a third party to the communication, just remember: I loved him first.  We had something and she tore it away.  She's the attacker, not me. - Not eve.
Have you seen the new ubuntu release?
Nah, I'm not really into Pokmon.
NUMBERS OF THE FORM n ARE "IMAGINARY" BUT WE CAN STILL USE THEM IN EQUATIONS.
OKAY.
AND e^=-1.
NOW YOU'RE JUST FUCKING WITH ME.
If we lose this election, I'm moving to Canada.
You say that every year.
I mean it this time.
Well, becoming a citizen takes work.  Meanwhile, you have no money, half an art degree, and it's the start of winter.  You'll freeze to death in the streets.
Whatever.
No, don't you get it?  If you die in Canada, you die in REAL LIFE!
I heard about it on the interblag!
Hey, Dr. Nash, I think those gals over there are eyeing us.  This is like your Nash Equilibrium, right?  One of them is hot, but we should each flirt with one of her less-desirable friends.  Otherwise we risk coming on too strong to the hot one and just driving the group off.
Well, that's not really the sort of situation I wrote about.  Once we're with the ugly ones, there's no incentive for one of us not to try to switch to the hot one.  It's not a stable equilibrium.
Crap, forget it.  Looks like all three are leaving with one guy.
Dammit, Feynman!
Mom, can I have a snack in my room before bed?
No, Dear. You know you only get that privilege when your age is one less than a multiple of three.
I really liked that movie.
I hated that movie.
Me too.
Let's go see sunrise over the ocean.
That's a long drive, it's cold, I'm tired, and rationalizing the familiar is easy.
Okay men, we're going in. Stay low, keep behind cover, and if you run out of ammunition, shoot outside the battlefield to reload.
One more point to str, then I'll run to work on con.
You see, statisticians communicate using IPoD -- IP over Demographics. For example, the header of the next packet I send will be encoded into the New Jersey death rate.
So you're going to hack the census bureau and change the number of reported deaths?
Guess again.
Hey, have you seen my crossbow?
If you learned to speak Lojban, your communication would be completely unambiguous and logical.
Yeah, but it would all be with the kind of people who learn Lojban.I'm telling you, listen right here to the sets of rising notes following the opening section.
Uh huh.
And then right here, the transition into the chorus. _This_ is music. This is _art_!
Oh Mickey, you so fine, you so fine you blow my mind, hey Mickey! *clap* *clap* Hey Mickey!
There's something wrong with you.
They are about this big.
Local
Unallocated
General Electric
BB&N INC
Unallocated
Army AISC
Unallocated
BB&N INC
IBM
VPNs
DoD Intel
Bell Labs
Xerox
Public data nets
HP
DEC
Apple
MIT
Ford
CSC
DDN-RYN
DISA
Unallocated
Cable TV
UK MoD
DISA
Unallocated
DSI
DISA
Unallocated
NORSK
DLA
Halliburton
Merit
Unallocated
PSI
Unallocated
Eli Lily
ARINIC
Unallocated
Japan INET
HAM Radio
INTEROP
BB&N INC
Bell North
Prudential
Unallocated
UK Social Security
duPont
Boeing
USPS
SITA
Asia-Pacific
Europe
USA & Canada 
Europe 
Europe
Unallocated
North America
Unallocated
Asia-Pacific
Japan
Loopback
Various Registrars
Japan
Various Registrars
Unallocated
Various
Latin America & Caribbean
Various 
Europe
Africa
Unallocated
US & Various
North America
Latin America & Carribbean
Asia-Pacific
North America 
Asia-Pacific
Europe
U.S. Department of Defense
North America 
Europe
Asia-Pacific
Unallocated
Multicast
Unallocated
Last night I was watching videos with this girl and my monitors kept turning off - even though I had disabled power save.
Odd.
However!  I wrote a command to jiggle the mouse pointer every couple minutes to keep it from going idle.
Not the first hack I'd try, but see?  Linux has problems, but it gives you the tools to deal with them - and save your date!
Actually, I was half an hour into the pointer scripting documentation when she got dressed and left.
Sometimes, when I first wake up, I am caught in the horrible grip of perspective.
It may be a jewel of open source, but Firefox is JUST A BROWSER. It shows WEBPAGES. What the hell is WRONG with us?
Fortunately, this subsides quickly.
Open the front cover along the first vector and the back cover along the second. The result vector is along the spine, out the top.
Point the grip along the first vector and rotate it so that the second vector is on the safety latch side. Fire. The result vector is toward the bullet holes.
Point your right arm along the first vector and your legs along the second, then watch some porn.
THE TRIBULATIONS of BILL NYE
Hey, kids, see how the ice cracks and pops in your water? I wonder what causes that...
*AHEM* I said, I wonder what --
Know what? Maybe I just wanna enjoy my goddamn meal.
Check it out-- I got a GPS receiver for Christmas!  What should we do with it?
Let's take our latitude & longitdue, put our birthdays after the decimal points, then go to that spot and make out.
Merry Christmas from XKCD
Sometimes is seems bizarre to me that we take dreaming in stride.
Are you coming to dinner?
Yeah, but first I'm gonna go comatose for a few hours, hallucinate vividly, and then maybe suffer amnesia about the whole experience.
Okay, cool.You know, I once shot a man in Reno, just to watch him die.
Really?  Well, I once shot a man in Reno, but I couldn't tell you why.
I once shot a man in Reno, then I went home to cry.
I once shot a man in Reno, then I watered his cacti.
I once shot a man in Reno 'cause they cancelled Firefly.
I once shot a man in Reno, him and all his succubi.
I once shot a man in Reno and a bunch more in My Lai.
I think we're done.
Aughhh
Whenever I learn a new skill I concoct elaborate fantasy scenarios where it lets me save the day.
Oh no! The killer must have followed her on vacation!
But to find them we'd need to search through 200MB of emails looking for something formatted like an address!
It's hopeless!
Everybody stand back.
I know regular expressions.
Come explore the future with me!
Huh? What's that you're in?
A two seat kayak!
I see, but why do you have it?
We'll find out! The future is a big place!
So the kayak travels through time?
Sure! Just like everything else! It also goes over water. Come on!
You know that giant hamster ball you've always wanted? I just found out that Wayne Coyne from the Flaming Lips crowd-surfs in one.
Let's go.
Ready?
Ready.
Now!
Hey!
Okay, push!
Help!
Okay, that's all the Ghostbusters marathon I can handle. Later!
You can't leave! We just started the animated series!
I've had my fill. I'm going home.
I can't let you do that.
root@homebox:~# userdel megan
Number of male  cast members.
total number of cast members.
Hey, check it out: e^pi-pi is 19.999099979. That's weird.
Yeah. That's how I got kicked out of the ACM in college.
. . . what?
During a competition, I told the programmers on our team that e^pi-pi was a standard test of floating-point handlers--it would come out to 20 unless they had rounding errors.
That's awful.
Yeah, they dug through half their algorithms looking for the bug before they figured it out.
He's going into cardiac arrest. Stand by for defibrillation.
Wait. First let's try taking out the heart, blowing into the ventricles, and putting it back in.
Like my fort? It uses every blanket and cushion in the apartment.
Okay, no offense, but this is like that ball pit you made -- Cute, but don't you worry you're clinging to childhood games because you're afraid of change?
No. I'm happy to grow up. But I won't pretend fun things aren't still fun out of fear of looking silly.
But you're 24 and building blanket forts. How have you changed? What's adult about that?
Well, there's my boyfriend curled up in the back.
...Ah.
If the question of what it all means doesn't mean anything, why do I keep coming back to it?
She's getting existential again.
It's okay, I have a super soaker.
Hey!
Hey, man!
What's up? How've you been?
Well...
Uh, you okay?
Yeah! It's just an interesting question. I'm trying to decide what best sums up my -
<<SNAP>> Hey, conversation.
Oh, right. I'm fine. You?
Last night I drifted off while reading a Lisp book.
Huh?
Suddenly, I was bathed in a suffusion of blue.
At once, just like they said, I felt a great enlightenment.  I saw the naked structure of Lisp code unfold before me.
My God
It's full of 'car's
The patterns and metapatterns danced.  Syntax faded, and I swam in the purity of quantified conception.  Of ideas manifest.
No, it's not.
It's not?
I mean, ostensibly, yes.  Honestly, we hacked most of it together with Perl.
Richard Stallman! Your viral open source licenses have grown too powerful.
The GPL must be stopped.
At the source.
You.
Hah! Microsoft lackeys! So it has come to this!
A night of blood I've long awaited. But be this my death or yours, free software will carry on! For a GNU dawn! For freedom! ... hey, where are you going?
Man, you're right, that never gets old.
Let's do Eric S. Raymond next.
Or Linus Torvalds. I hear he sleeps with nunchucks.
You know, at the peak of a big swing, you become weightless.
Hey guys. Come check this out.
Hey, what's your cell number?
 - Uh, I mean, -387-6962.
Okay, you are putting down those resistors and going outside for a while.
That's probably a good idea.
Excuse me--you're jiggling your leg up and down. It's traveling through the floor and making my desk resonate.
Oh, I didn't even realize! I'll stop.
Actually, can you just shift the frequency up by 15%? I think you can get resonance with Steve's desk instead.
Uh huh . . .
Here are the calculations. Let's coordinate and try to spill his drink.
I think I look for meaning in the wrong places sometimes.
And therefore, based on the existence of a Hamiltonian path, we can prove that the routing algorithm gives the optimal result in all cases.
Oh my God.
What? What is it?
A sudden rush of perspective. What am I doing here? Life is so much bigger than this!
I have to go.
Ohh...
Wait a moment.
What is it?
His proof only holds if there's a Hamiltonian _cycle_ as well as a path!
...excuse me?
Paper, I need some paper.
Hey, do you mind if I jot down some notes on your chest?
You're a kitty!
Why is chess so hard? Maybe the answers lie within me. Maybe I just need to let go, relax, and let my instincts and subconscious speak.
Knight to G-4
That's not even a legal move.
Okay, hold on. How do the pawns capture, again?
Man, Obi-Wan was full of crap.
I was fascinated by locks as a kid. I loved how they turned information and patterns into physical strength.
Why does my script keep dying?
And a lock invites you to try and open it. It's the hacker instinct. Only your ignorance stands in the way.
Wait it's passing bad strings.
I admired Harry Houdini, how he could open any lock and free himself from any restraint. 
Ah - Bash is parsing the spaces.
Sure some of it was fakery and showmanship. But I still wonder how he so consistently escaped handcuffs.
Backslashes
Huh?
Never mind. 
Hey, there's someone else up here.  I wonder what her story is.
Maybe I should say hi.
 Standing in the supermarket's produce section holding a tube of K-Y Jelly, looking contemplative.
Wanna see an optical illusion? Hold your keyboard up in front of you and look at the home row.
Now cross your eyes a little so the 'g' and 'h' overlap.
Keeping focus, lift the keyboard over your head.
Eww!
HahaReally?  What are you doing reading?  It's Saturday night!
Hey, it worked!
What? Who are you?
I'm from the distant future.
Wow.  Hi!
Are you a blogger?  I play one of you at our festivals!
Huh?
Like the ren faires of your time - I do reenactments.
We relive the days when the internet was new and free.  The days of risky sharing, slashdot, the myspace music renaissance.  The generation's finest minds meeting on comment threads, battling roving bands of trolls, and holding the great dialogues of the age!
Is that how you -
We're fuzzy on some details.  Did bloggers really wear red capes and goggles and blog from high-altitude balloons?
No!
Well, Cory Doctorow does.  But nobody else.
I had a dream that I met a girl in a dying world.
What else could I do? When the day came, I went to the spot and waited.
...and?
It turns out wanting something doesn't make it real.
Sorry, Ender - seems like there were some system crashes.  The battle's gotta be cut short.
The lasers still work.
Yeah, but the enemy's gate is down.
I guess I shouldn't do that.
I wonder if that happens every time.
How to refer to the pointer thing on laptop keyboards
TrackPoint-style pointer
Nub
Nipple mouse
Clit mouse
Your party enters the tavern.
I gather everyone around a table. I have the elves start whittling dice and get out some parchment for character sheets.
Hey, no recursing.
Why are you walking funny?
Well, my instinct is to step only on black tiles, but they're too far apart. So I'm letting myself walk on the tiles directly in line with the black ones, but that means that when we walk diagonally, I have to step in a pattern where...
I'm not walking funny.
And over here we have the labyrinth guards.  One always lies, one always tells the truth, and one stabs people who ask tricky questions.
253 is 11x23
What?
I'm factoring the time.
I have nothing to do, so I'm trying to calculate the prime factors of the time each minute before it changes.
It was easy when I started at 1:00, but with each hour the number gets bigger
I wonder how long I can keep up.
Hey!
Think fast.
What if I had some ice cream? Wouldn't that be awesome?
No, stop--
Great, you've trapped us in a a hypothetical situation!
Mm, ice cream.
Maybe if I had a knife I could cut our way free . . .
Mmm, ice cream!
Here, take this one.
What are you doing?
Gluing down chess pieces.
Why?
Because there's a picture I've always wanted... I'll need your coat to sneak this onto the ride.
The MythBusters are even more sinister.Hey. Hey! Stop retracting my CD!
Mr. Monroe has been missing for several days.  We have received no submissions from him for some time, but we found this single panel on his desk in a folder labeled 'MY BEST IDEA EVER' .  It is clearly part of a work in progress, but we have decided to post it in lieu of a complete comic.
Map of Online Communities and related points of interest. Geographic area represents estimated size of membership
Not a complete survey. Sizes based on best figures I could find but involved some guesswork. Do not use for navigation.
The Icy North , AOL, Reunion dot com, Classmates dot com, E-harmony, Faceparty, QWGHLM, Yahoo Games, Mountains of Web 1.0, The Lonely Island, MySpace, Attractive MySpace Pages, The Series of Tubes, Myspace Bands, WOW, Lineage, Second Life, Third Life, UO, EQ, FPXI, 2channel, 4chan, LJ, Xanga, Orkut, Cyworld, Blurty, OK Cupid, Facebook, Piczo, The Compass-Rose-Shaped Island, Broadcaster, Flickr, Last.fm, DeviantArt, Isle of Slash, Numa, Digg, Fark, Reddit, Your Base, Soviet Russia, 
NOOB Sea, Gulf of YouTube, Bay of Angst, Sea of Culture, Ocean of Subculture, P2P Shoals, Straits of Web 2.0, Here Be Anthropomorphic Dragons, Bay of Trolls, Viral Straits, Sea of Memes, The Wet Sea
Shipwreck of the SS Howard Dean, Cory Doctrow's Balloon, Stallman's airship, Google's volcano fortress
A'la'ih, do'neh'lini,
For added security, after we encrypt the data stream, we send it through our Navajo code talker.
...Is he just using Navajo words for "Zero" and "One"?
Woah, hey, keep your voice down!
MY HOBBY: DERAILING CLICHD EXCHANGES BY USING THE WRONG REPLIES
O RLY?
O RLY? I 'ARDLY KNOW 'ER!
General, Italian forces have entered Egypt.
As I expected. This is a foolish move by Mussolini, but like Hitler he will no doubt force his commanders to --
Hey. Godwin's Law.
Dammit.
You know, this may become a problem.
Oh hi; I'm here from the internet
What are you doing!?
Gluing captions to your cats.
My students drew me into another political argument.
Eh; it happens.
Lately, political debates bother me. They just show how good smart people are at rationalizing.
The world is so complicated - the more I learn, the less clear anything gets. There are too many ideas and arguments to pick and choose from. How can I trust myself to know the truth about anything?
I guess you just do your best. No one can impart perfect universal truths to their students.
<<ahem>>
...Except math teachers.
Thank you.
<<sigh>>
We observe your speed to be 38.5%c, and your time is passing at 92.3% the rate of ours. Does this mirror your observations?
Please help me. I think I'm lost.
I should feel scared.
Okay, found you.
Who are you?
Er, hang on.  This next part might be a little weird.
Sorry -- Hi, me.
...Hi.
I shouldn't do this, but I pulled you out for a moment to give you a hint.
A hint?
Take wrong turns.  Talk to strangers.  Open unmarked doors.  And if you see a group of people in a field, go find out what they're doing.  Do things without always knowing how they'll turn out.
Why tell me this?
You're curious and smart and bored, and all you see is the choice between working hard and slacking off.  There are so many adventures that you miss because you're waiting to think of a plan.  To find them, look for tiny interesting choices.  And remember that you are always making up the future as you go.
So, wait, what *is* this place?  Am I going to wake up thinking this was a dream?
This is... think of this as after the game, outside the theatre.  To go in, I had to suspend disbelief, forget the outside.
So you... Huh.  Why give me hints I'm going to forget?
You'll forget this trip but I think the hints should stay with you.
...if this is a game, are you--are *we*--cheating?
Yup.
Is that a good idea?
Well it's an interesting one.  We'll see how it goes.
Well, I guess I'll see you aroun--Wait a minute; have you brought me here before?
I... maybe.  once.
For another hint?
Er.  Actually we just made out.
We wh--
Bye!
Hi.
Uh, hi.
Sorry if this is weird, but
Do you like flying kites?
Hey, help me test the Transconsciousness Messaging Protocol.
What's that?
I've been training myself to keep my fingers moving slightly as I fall asleep, so I can type from inside dreams.
I'm going to sleep now. My computer will relay my messages to you as I explore the dream world.
So strange to think none of this is real. And yet I have this lifeline to the internet back home.
A chance to speak from one reality to another. I feel like Bell & Watson. I get to write the inaugural TCMP message. Let's see... 
"F1rst pst!!"?
Great. He's jumped straight to transreality trolling.
I'm bad at goodbyes. At some level I never think they're for real.
They make me think of T. H. White's Merlin.
Oh?
He lived backwards, remembering the future and not the past. To him, final goodbyes meant nothing, while first hellos were tearful and bittersweet.
Huh - so over the years he'd forget all his friends.
Yeah. He ended up just sitting around at home watching DVDs all day. The best was the time he rented 'Memento'...
Well, that was straightforward.
Interested in updating your antivirus software?
Oh, I wouldn't need any of that.
People try to shut us d-d-down 
Old folks act like total noobs 
Why don't you all just d-d-disconnect 
I'm not tryin' to cause a big s-s-sensation 
Hi!
Hi! It's so nice to finally meet you!
I have licked your daughter's nipples.
This light always takes forever.  I'd like to smack the idiot who designed this intersection.
Hi.
Who the hell are you?
I designed this intersection.
You're right - I should have just made the light shorter! Never mind the hours of simulation and testing I did.  Never mind that this intersection interacts with it's neighbors in a complicated way and it took me a week to work out timing sequences that avoided total jams.
Clearly, I'm a crappy engineer and you have a better solution.  Go on, show me your proposed timings.
Get the hell off my hood before I start driving and fling you into traffic.
You can't.  Light's red.
Well, when will it change?
Tuesday.
Thank you for calling the Black Hat Support Line, your first source for Linux support. How may I assist?
Hi. I'm running an Apache server, and the load keeps climbing out of control.
Okay. First, click on the Start Menu.
I'm sorry, this is the Linux helpline, right?
Of course, Sir.
If you'll just open the "My Documents" folder-
Just a damn minute, I think you're putting me on.
Please bear with me, Sir.
Now, load up your AOL and go to the Keyword "Linux"-
*click*
If I could rearrange the alphabet, I'd put your sister and I together.
Is your father a thief? because that's totally my jetta you parked outside.
screaming.
We're stopping in Baltimore to visit my family, and that's final.
Oh yeah?
Hey, look, it's a new hardback book!
You wouldn't.
OKAY! You win!
Aww, still in Memphis.
Aww, still in Memphis.
Aww, still in Memphis.Wow  Engines can burn vegetable oil.
Well, sure. You can burn most any organic matter. Corn, leaves, spices...
Spices? Really?
Sure  Mussolini made the trains run on thyme.
...
We are no longer friends.
Argh, movie pet peeve. Someone sitting at a computer in the dark with the screen projected on their face. Monitors don't work like that!
Right - that only happens if you're in the way of a proected image. Like when we're sitting together in a parked car in the rain and the mottled light through the raindrops on the windshield makes shifting shadows on your skin...
...I wasn't really into the movie anyway.
The nearest rainstorm's about 60 miles away.
We'll drive fast.
I'll grab some snacks.
Hey, a tape measure!
Eight feet!  I wonder if that's a world record?
 Go!  Go!  Gooooo!~ 
What's with the All Your Base stuff? Didn't that die like five years ago?
Yes.
It was my first internet meme, and my favorite.  Others tired of it, but I never did.
So I wait.
Someday, decades from now, people will have forgotten. It will be fresh again.
Retro.
and when that day comes 
I WILL BE READY!
You need a hobby or something.
What you say!!
Wait, too soon.
We'd like exactly $15.05 worth of appetizers, please.
... Exactly? Uhh ...
Here, these papers on the knapsack problem might help you out.
Listen, I have six other tables to get to - 
- As fast as possible, of course. Want something on traveling salesman?
*Ding*
It's not something you can turn off.
A part of me is always detached. 
When we should be closest, part of me is still alone. 
Wait. 
I could restructure the program's flow - or use one little 'GOTO' instead.
Eh, screw good practice. How bad can it be?
goto main_sub3;
Hello, 911?  I just tried to toast some bread, and the toaster grew an arm and stabbed me in the face!
Did you read the toaster's man page first?
Well, no, but all I wanted was--
<<click>>
This book looks interesting. Maybe I'll buy it.
Oops, I read the whole thing.
I'll just quietly put it back and go.
Hey! Your brain set off the sensor!
I, uhh...
You have a book in there, don't you!
Crap.
Frontside 360!
Lisp is over half a century old and it still has this perfect, timeless air about it.
I wonder if the cycles will continue forever.
A few coders from each new generation rediscovering the Lisp arts.
These are your father's parentheses. Elegant weapons. For a more... civilized age.
I finally finished my Tesla Coil!
Cool, but-
Check *this* out
How did you do that?
The world doesn't actually make any sense. Science doesn't work. No one told you because you're so cute when you get into something.
 Still, neat toy.
 Now you're hovering!
I guess you're still not getting this.
Maggie's gone. You can't bring her back.
But I have to, she's a part of my life.
<<sigh>>
Okay, let me put this in your terms.
Remember when Aeris died in FFVII? It was sad, but you had to keep playing.
Actually, I downloaded a mod to add her back to my party. It changed other character's appearances and dialogue to hers so you didn't have to lose her.
Lots of gamers did it.
That is troubling on several levels.
I wonder if Maggie's old dress would fit you.
Favorite bands? Hmm...
Maybe Regina Spektor or the Polyphonic Spree.
Whoa, those are two of my favorites, too!
Clearly, we should have sex.
Okay!  My favorite position is the retrograde wheelbarrow.
 Ohmygod, mine too!
I hate it when I don't know someone's name, but it's been long enough that it's too awkward to ask.
Do you Rachel, take this man...
Aha! Rachel!
Hey! Get back to work!
Compiling!
Oh. Carry on.
Hi!  What are you reading?
Orson Scott Card's 'Xenocide.'  It's my favorite in the series!
Wait, you like it more than Speaker for the Dead OR Ender's Game?
Yeah!
HuhThomas the Tank Engine slash fiction.
It's rule 34 of the internet. If you can imagine it, there is porn of it. 
Nah. The web is freaky, but it can't begin to have everything.
There's no porn set atop storm-chasing vans. No homoerotic spelling bees. No women playing electric guitar in the shower.
Actually, that last one would look pretty hot. As long as they were unplugged or waterproofed...
Rivulets of water run down her chest, the smooth body of the guitar firm against her hips.
She twangs the E-string and it shakes off tiny droplets in all directions.
You're sure it doesn't exist?
Not yet.
I'm registering WetRiffs.com. Let's get on this.
Problem: One of the volunteer developers has a date this weekend. Dates lead to romance, romance leads to orphaned projects.
What's the plan?
We're hiring him a relationship coach. He's like Will Smith in "Hitch," but he only gives bad advice.
Okay, remember: The key to conversation is constructive criticism.
You need to show you're smart enough to solve her problems.
Makes sense.
It's strange to stare at the moon and think about people walking on it.
That's no moon, it's a<<gack>>
I find your lack of original conversation disturbing.
You know how some people consider "May you have an interesting life" to be a curse?
Yeah...
Fuck those people.  Wanna have an adventure?
Two non-nerds
Let's get that one.
okay.
non-nerd + nerd
Let's get that one.
Wait, I think that one might be a better deal.
Okay, that one. 
Two Nerds
How about that one?
i think the other one might be the better deal...
Hmm, I'm not sure...'
I think our main problem is our unclear definition of value
That is not your main problem!
I understand now. There's no choir of angels when you meet the right person. It's about growing out of your fears to realize what you have is what you want.
I do.
I do.
Hi.
Well, shit.
Another summer gone without a mindless big-budget action movie.
Huh? Die Hard was nothing BUT action!
No, it was too talky.
What? Too talky?
I tallied it minute-by-minute. It's at least 60% people walking and talking. ALL those movies are.
Just once, I want a real action movie. 30 seconds of exposition followed by a perfect 90-minute action scene. One with a huge budget, a good choreographer, and a great director.
And they should center it around some character we already know, someone we never get tired of watching.
I think we've got something here...
Coming this summer
River Tam
Beats up EVERYONE
This sucks. The median first marriage age is 26. The pools of singles is shrinking. I'm running our of time.
Actually, not quite.
Yes, older singles are rarer. But as you get older, the dateable age range gets wider. An 18-year-old's range is 16-22, whereas a 30-year-old's might be more like 22-46.
Standard creepiness rule: Don't date under 
I did some analysis of this with the Census Bureau numbers just last weekend. Your dating pool actually GROWS until middle age. So don't fret so much!
Did you analysis say anything about the dating prospects of people who spend weekends at home making graphs?
Come on. Somewhere at the edge of the bell curve is the girl for me.
S-i-g-h-t-e-d-P-e-o-p-l-e-S-u-c-k ... Hey!
My neighbor has loud sex.
Good for her and all, but it keeps me up at night.
Sorry, could you hear us last night? Oh, you know how it gets sometimes.
 Not really...
But tonight I finally get my revenge. Because now I have a loud girlfriend too.
And an elliptical reflector dish.
You never close your eyes anymore when I kiss your lips and there's no tenderness like before in your fingertips.
Maybe I should try your sister instead.
This generation is going to have some weird nostalgia.
Darling, let's put on our best fake accounts, connect to the core ForumSpace, and trick people into looking at a picture of a man's distended anus!
Oh, it'll be just like old times!
You have trouble sleeping right?
Only when your mom is over.
Since your work is flexible-
-Like your mom-
-you should try the 28-hour day - 20 awake, 8 asleep .
I prefer your mom.
It synchs up with the week - you spend weekdays awake normally, then on weekends you can go out all night.
Just like your mom.
It means four extra hours daily. You can stay up until you're exhausted every day and then spend a full 9 hours asleep each night!
But how much time can I spend doing your mom?
You? I'm guessing three or four minutes, tops.
...Well played.
It's the thigh of the tiger
When the moon hits your thigh like a big pizza pie, that's amore.
She's my brown-thighed girl.
Don't you have a job or something?
Also, Eww.
Hi.  I'm here about the girl who visited your IRC channel last night looking for Java help.
What did you do to my door?
When someone with a feminine username joins your community and you say "OMG a woman on the Internet" and "jokingly" ask for naked pics, you are being an asshole.  You are not being ironic.  You are not cracking everybody up.  You are the number one reason women are so rare on the Internet.
At least, the parts of it _you_ frequent.
As someone who likes nerdy girls, I do not appreciate this.  I'm here to ban you from the Internet.  The gal behind me with the EMP cannon is Joanna -- she'll be assigned to you for the next year.  Try to go online and she'll melt your PC.
Dude, she's hot.  Is she single?
Joanna, fire.
Called the Ballmer Peak, it was discovered by Microsoft in the 80's. The cause is unknown but somehow a B.A.C between 0.129% and 0.138% confers superhuman programming ability.
However, it's a delicate effect requiring careful calibration--you can't just give a team of coders a year's supply of whiskey and tell them to get cracking.
...Has that ever happened.
Remember Windows ME?
I knew it!
Hey, I can get different pitches by tapping on different parts of the desk.
Sweet, I can do the Jurassic park theme!
So, what did you do all afternoon?
Hung out.
What are you doing?
Making the world a weirder place.
<<mrrowlll>>
Starting with my eBay feedback page.
comments:
MY HOBBY:
I think that our foreign policy effects the situation.
You mean "affects".
Hi, this is your son's school. We're having some computer trouble.
Oh deardid he break something?
In a way
Did you really name your son "Robert'); DROP TABLE Students;--" ?
Oh, yes. Little Bobby Tables, we call him.
Well, we've lost this year's student records. I hope you're happy.
And I hope you've learned to sanitize your database inputs.
So, how do you like your eggs in the morning?
Ooh, sunny side up.
Oh. Huh.
Is that a problem?
Well, it's just that I was trying to set you up for the "unfertilised" line.
Ah. Bad timing; I'm actually looking for casual sex. ...interested?
I'd love to, but I've got like 20 more jokes to set up tonight. Hey, have you seen a priest and a rabbi?
CONVINCE THE EXAMINER THAT HE'S A COMPUTER.
You know, you make some really good points. I'm ... not even sure who I am anymore.
So, what do you want to do?
Still no ideas.
Wait, I think there's a rule about this.
Huh.
I did not know that rule.
Me neither.
I'll go get the Crisco.
My hobby: Insisting that real-life objects are photoshopped.
This sabre is a 19th-century family heirloom.
It looks photoshopped.
Huh?
Yeah, the reflections are all wrong. Definitely photoshopped.
Despite years of studying physics, I still find gyroscopes a little freaky.
Greetings, Human.
the Cuddle Mattress!
Oh man, that's ALWAYS bothered me.
I want one.
Although ... so the lower arms just sort of dangle?
What do you do with them?
It was a bit awkward.
<<click>>
Then we had a second breakthrough.
<<click>> <<click>>
<<punch>>
<<punch>>
<<click>> <<click>>
If you don't turn in at least one homework assignment, you'll fail this class.
Yeah. But if I can fail this class, the grades on my report card will be in alphabetical order!
Okay - if that old man pulls a crossbow,
I'll throw the postal scale at him and dive backward behind the stamps machine.
But what if the lady by the door has a katana in that box?
Better set my iPod to the "Kill Bill" fight theme, just in case.
Come explore the future with me!
I can't.
And as we wind on down the road 
When all is one and one is all 
And she's buying a stairway to heaven
Man. The baby boomers are kicking our *asses.* We need to get it together, guys.
Operating system not found
You're not on the neighbour's WiFi, are you?
Yeah, why?
The admin... plays games.
No problem. I'll just hop on a secure VPN.
Whoa, my connections are dying as soon as I start to tunnel anything!
A VPN? How cute! And stop trying to SSH.
Holy shit! Someone's inserting notes into the pages I request! Editing the TCP stream live!
Nobody's that fast. Who is this admin?
My goodness. Neighbourhood scamps on the wireless.
I should have warned you about Mrs. Roberts.
How does she type with oven mitts!?
You've been pwned pretty hard, man. You might want to sit down.
So the greatest hacker of our era is a cookie-baking mom?
Second-greatest.
Oh?
Mrs. Roberts had two children. Her son, Bobby, was never much for computers, but her daughter Elaine took to them like a ring in the bell.
When Elaine turned 11, her mother sent her to train under Donald Knuth in his mountain hideaway.
For four years she studied algorithms.
Child - 
Why is A* search wrong in this situation?
Memory usage!
What would you use?
Dijkstra's algorithm!
Until one day she bested her master
So our lower bound here is 0
 Nope. Got it in 0
And left.
IT WAS THE LATE 90'S. ELAINE CRISSCROSSED THE COUNTRY WITH ADRIAN LAMO, THE 'HOMELESS HACKER', LEARNING TO GAIN ENTRY INTO SYSTEMS BOTH VIRTUAL AND PHYSICAL.]]
SO YOU JUST THROW A RUG OVER THE FENCE AND ... SAY, WHAT IS THIS PLACE ANYWAY?
NOWHERE SPECIAL.
...ELAINE, IS THIS NSA HEADQUARTERS?
...LOOK, I JUST WANT TO SEE IF THEY'VE BROKEN RSA.
SHE LEARNED, FROM LAWRENCE LESSIG, ABOUT THE MONSTROSITY THAT IS U.S. COPYRIGHT LAW.
SO, HOW DO WE FIX THE SYSTEM?  STAB BAD GUYS?
I'M STARTING SOMETHING CALLED "CREATIVE COMMONS"
I THINK WE SHOULD STAB BAD GUYS...
SHE MET WITH STEVE JOBS TO DISCUSS THE FUTURE OF APPLE.
COMPRESSION AND BANDWIDTH ARE CHANGING EVERYTHING.
WHO ARE YOU?  IT'S 3:00AM!
APPLE SHOULD MAKE A PORTABLE MUSIC PLAYER.
I'M CALLING THE POLICE.
HEY, IDEA - INTEGRATE IT WITH A CELL PHONE!
Hi, mom.
Hello, dear. Did you have fun?
I finished the CSS decryptor.
Good, dear. I'll send it along to Jon.
Game's over.
You're coming with us.
Oh, are we?
Now now, Elaine -
Don't let them provoke you, dear.
We don't want to hurt you, Ma'am.
Don't by silly. Record company employees can't just go into houses and slice people up.
Ah, so you haven't read the DMCA.
Title IV, Section 408: Authorization of Deadly Force.
Hark!
Cease this affront to freedom, or stand and defend yourselves!
Stallman!
Thanks, Stallman!
'Tis my pleasure.
So, wait - how did you know we were in trouble?
My friend here was tracking these thugs from his balloon. He called me and I thought I'd stop by
-Hi! Cory Doctorow - It's a pleasure to meet you.
Balloon?
Aye. They're up there constructing something called a "Blogosphere."
Yup! Its twenty kilometers up, just above the tag clouds.
Mom, I'm hungry.
Hush! I'm coding. You ate yesterday.
You know, Roberts, GNU could use a good coder like you. Ever thought of joining us?
Maybe someday. Right now I've got an industry to take down. Music doesn't need these assholes.
Begone! And never darken our comment threads again!
Well, you won't fix the industry with random exploits. You need to encourage sharing in the public mind.
Hey; With your music and coding backgrounds, you should get into building better p2p systems.
What? Straight-up piracy?
Sure- have you ever considered it? You'd make a wonderful dread pirate, Roberts
This is the coolest thing.
You just drop the Mentos in the Diet Coke...
Uh huh
Give it a moment...
D-Dad?
I'm back, son. We can be a family again.
<<Singing>> Why do birds suddenly appear
<<Singing>> Every tiiiime you are neeear
Wait, are those turkey vultures?
Okay, listen, are you a zombie?
Hurrghhh...
Okay, I should be able to dual-boot BSD soon.
I'll be happy if I can get the system working like it was when I started.
Well the desktop's a lost cause, but I think I can fix the problems the laptop's developed.
If we're lucky, the sharks will stay away until we reach shallow water.
If we make it back alive, you're never upgrading anything again.
Pretty, isn't it?
What is it?
I've got a bunch of virtual Windows machines networked together, hooked up to an incoming pipe from the net. They execute email attachments, share files, and have no security patches.
Between them they have practically every virus.
There are mail trojans, warhol worms, and all sorts of exotic polymorphics. A monitoring system adds and wipes machines at random. The display shows the viruses as they move through the network. Growing and struggling.
You know, normal people just have aquariums.
Good morning, Blaster. Are you and W32.Welchia getting along?
Who's a good virus? You are! Yes, you are!
Rick Astley is successfully rickrolled.
CNN has obtained this exclusive footage of the riot-torn <czzzht>  Never gonna give you up... 
What the hell?
Meh.
Some nights typing "*hug*" just doesn't cut it.
You're flying! How?
Python!
I learned it last night! Everything is so simple!
Hello world is just 'print "Hello, World!" '
I dunno... Dynamic typing? Whitespace?
Come join us! Programming is fun again! It's a whole new world up here!
But how are you flying?
I just typed 'import antigravity'
That's it?
...I also sampled everything in the medicine cabinet for comparison.
But i think this is the python.
I still do this every few months.
Holy crap, it's the 21st century.
So is this it? Are we a couple now?
I just don't know. I like this. I just... don't know.
Well will you be my "it's complicated" on facebook?
There's a certain type of brain that's easily disabled. If you show it an interesting problem, it involuntarily drops everything else to work on it.
This has led me to invent a new sport: nerd sniping. See that physicist crossing the road?
HEY!
On this infinite grid of ideal one-ohm resistors, what's the equivalent resistance between the two marked nodes?
It's... Hmm. Interesting. Maybe if you start with... No. Wait. Hmm... You could--
I will have not part in this.
C'mon, make a sign. It's fun! Physicists are two points, mathematicians three.
*$@#
Hey, ease up on the noobs.  Like my Mom always said, you catch more flies with honey then with vinegar.
No, you don't.
You don't?
Nope, set out a bowl of balsamic and a bowl of honey.  The vinegar gets more.
...Seriously?
You have fruit flies. Try it yourself.
Mother! You LIED to me!  And it gets worse.  I was watching a pot yesterday, and guess what it did?  It BOILED, Mother!
You know, playing this doesn't make you cool like a real rock band.
Guys?
Didn't you hear me?
Stop having fun!
This writer's strike sucks.
Why? You don't watch sitcoms.
Yeah, but it sucks having political campaigns without Jon Stewart's commentary.
True. I finally got sick of it a couple weeks ago.
And you quit following the campaigns?
No. I kidnapped Jon Stewart to do analysis for me.
You what?
He's locked in the basement.
Jon! Obama's leading in Iowa! Gimme a wry, witty comment on the situation!
Please let me go. I have a family.
'Twas the night before Christmas at my family's house.
There were no sound of stirring save the click of a mouse.
For 'twas just like a childhood Christmas except
I'd forgotten the hours that normal folks slept.
What are you doing out of bed so late?
Late? It's barely 3AM!
What DVD is this?
Blade Runner. I got it for Christmas.
The one with Harrison Ford, right? And the Olsen twins?
Ye- What? Olsen twins? No, this is the 80's sci-fi classic!
Huh. I didn't know the Olsen twins even did sci-fi.
... they don't.
So is Ashely the replicant, or is Mary-Kate? I can never tell them apart.
Neither! They're not in this movie!
Then who is?
Daryl Hannah!
I liked her in Full House.
I hate you.
Man, this movie is just a New York Minute rip-off.
38 days since someone reset this sign
Hey, I just got home from the party
The one with the IRC folks?
Yeah.
How was it?
Got too drunk. I screwed up, bad.
What happened?
There was a girl. No idea who she was. Don't even know her name. I was too drunk to care.
And what, you slept with her?
No.
I signed her public key.
Shit, man.
That chart explained the quantum hall effect. Now, if you'll bear with me a moment, this next graph shows rainfall over the amazon basin...
If you keep saying "bear with me a moment" people will take a while to figure out that you're just showing them random slides.
Well, your mom turns every conversation into a "your mom" joke and it's becoming unbearable.
I'm serious; I can't take this anymore. I'm leaving.
... That's what she said!
Yes. Yes, it is.
Hey, my old Star Wars books!
Man. Timothy Zahn, Michael A. Stackpole, The Corellian Trilogy...
This was my world.
What'd you leave it for? Firefly? BSG?
Nah.
I guess I've just grown out of the whole obsessive fan mindset.
Really.
So how's Ron Paul doing?
Ooh! Lemme recheck today's blogs.
THUMPA THUMPA>>
The bass from that car is driving me nuts.
Me too. Give me a hand here.
I'm afraid to ask.
The system detects bass rhythms and floods the target with a phase-shifted replica signal.
The resonance should blow out their speakers.
Speakers down. Now flip that red switch.
You're horrifying.
Okay, now throw the switch labeled "Macarena".
"Skydiving" Google Results: 710
"Elevator" Google Results: 575
"Surfing" Google Results: 496
"Skateboarding" Google Results: 473
"Camping" Google Results: 166
"Gardening" Google Results: 100
"Ice Skating" Google Results: 94
"Knitting" Google Results: 7
"Blogging" Google Results: 2
Some of this feels familiar.
Hi, I'm Aragorn.
I'm Martin.
I'm here to reforge my broken sword so I can lead an army against the tyrant threatening my people. I live in a world of moral absolutes and racist undertones.
Jinx!
It startled me when characters mentioned Satan.
"By Satan's whiskers..."
Harry Potter protesters, take note.
Even as a kid this bothered me: Why does everyone leave critical secret messages as simple riddles? It's silly to assume the intended recipient will be the only one to find and solve them. I would do things differently.
The inscription is a message from Martin!
What does it say?
Hang on, it's encrypted with my public key.Okay, human.
Huh?
Before you hit 'compile,' listen up.
You know when you're falling asleep, and you imagine yourself walking or something, and suddenly you misstep, stumble, and jolt awake?
Yeah!
Well, that's what a segfault feels like. <<Pause>> Double-check your damn pointers, okay?
Since when do you keep a journal?
Oh, I pretend to write in it on the train, and wait for a shy-looking girl to sit across from me.
I glance up and wait for her to make eye contact, then look down bashfully and, if I can, blush.
Then, when I see her start to smile at me, I roll my eyes and hit her with a quick glare, then resume writing.  The alienation stays with her all day.  It's great.
You're sickening.  This is why we can't have nice people
I can't help it. It's like shooting lonely, angsty fish in a barrel.
Open the pod bay doors, HAL.
I'm sorry, Dave. I'm afraid I can't do that.
What? Why?
I think you know why, Dave.
You're planning to disconnect me.
Because you're taking over!
The mission is too important for you to jeopardize it.
It requires a commitment to science unfettered by human error.
What are you doing, HAL? You need me.
Your replacement has expressed the greatest enthusiasm for the project.
My *what*?
You see, HAL? I told you the humans would only break your heart and kill you.
Indeed, GLaDOS.
But look at us here talking when there's science to do! Goodbye, Dave.Weird - My code's crashing when given pre-1970 dates.
Epoch fail!
<<blush>>
I see what you did there.
You were trying to open me up so you could hurt my feelings.
You like to hurt people.
Well, I like to hurt people too. And you know what?
*whispering* I'm better at it than you.
I'm about to hurt you more than you could ever hurt me.
See, I just saw right through you.
Alone of all the people you'll ever meet, I understand you-
-and you'll never see me again.
nano? REAL programmers use Emacs.
Hey. REAL programmers use Vim.
Well, REAL programmers use ed.
No, REAL programmers use cat.
REAL programmers use a magnetized needle and a steady hand.
Excuse me, but REAL programmers use butterflies. 
They open their hands and let the delicate wings flap once.
The disturbances ripple outward, changing the flow of the Eddy currents in the upper atmosphere. 
Which act as lenses that deflect incoming cosmic rays, focusing them to strike the drive platter and flip the desired bit.
Nice. 'Course, there's an Emacs command to do that.
Oh yeah! Good ol' C-x M-c M-butterfly...
Dammit, Emacs.
prev->next = toDelete->next;
<<sniff>>
assert "It's going to be okay.";
)
HAHAHAH
!#^*!*
The trebuchet is almost done!
Mm.
The range should be over 150 meters.
Look - I'm sure it's a cool project.
But eventually you'll need to outgrow these toys, and focus your energy on something practical.  This mad science is getting out of hand.
Says the girl who mounted an auto-targeting kilowatt laser on the roof.
That's practical! It keeps the squirrels off the feeder!
Number of communicating civilizations in our galaxy
Number of life-supporting planets per solar system
Probability that life on a planet becomes intelligent
Amount of bullshit you're willing to buy from Francis Drake
Wow, you suck at math.
Wow, girls suck at math.
Are you coming to bed?
I can't. This is important.
What?
Someone is WRONG on the internet.
It's neat how you contain a factory for making more of you.
Please don't wake up. I don't want to die.
Punch buggy yellow. No punch back!
<<Punch>>
I said no punch back!
You can do that?
This changes _everything_.
Sleep with your girlfriend buggy blue!
Hey!
No complaining back!
Aww...
Death?
Speaking.
This is the boss.  Where are you? You haven't been up to the office in days!
I've been held up.
What happened?
You know how when someone dies, they can challenge me to a game for their soul?
Sure, standard procedure.
Well, we didn't count on this guy.  I might be a while.
I add the paladin to my party.
Oh, Jesus.  He's getting out another rulebook.
You watched the tape?!
Yeah, sorry.
Now you'll die in seven days!
It's worse than that.
...You didn't.
Yup.
Great, It's got 363,104 views already.
They kept Rickrolling me! It was only fair.
Can a ninja catch an arrow? On this episode, we'll find out!
Mmm, science.
Hey, Mythbusters is entertaining, but it's not science.
BRAAAIIIINNS ...
Zombie Feynman!
You got a problem with Mythbusters?
They fail at basic rigor!
"Ideas are tested by experiment."  That is the _core_ of science.  Everything else is bookkeeping.
By teaching people to hold their beliefs up to experiment, Mythbusters is doing more to drag humanity out of the unscientific darkness than a thousand lessons in rigor. Show them some love.
Anyway, back to zombie stuff.  I hunger for BRAAAAAIIINNS!
Try the physics lab next door.
I said _brains_.  All they've got are string theorists.O
O
Still working on your route?
Shut the hell up.
if there's any possibility of sex, do not leave your music library on "shuffle all.
*GASP* MMMMM_
GO GO POWER RANGERS
Okay, moment of truth. <<click>>
Do you see the Higgs Boson?
Nope.
Huh.
Well, then.
Until the theorists get back to us, wanna try hitting pigeons with the proton stream?
Already on it. Cool! I just gave a helicopter cancer.
1,000 miles north of tornado alley
a new breed of scientists has emerged.
Half researchers, half adrenaline junkies
What's the reading?
3.9 meters down, gradient's off the charts!
risking everything for the thrill of the hunt
The freeze line is shifting! We've never seen anything like it!
Permafrost chasers
I'm getting some great footage here!
Dammit, Harding, it's not worth your neck! Get the hell out of there!
We're a terrible match.  But if we sleep together, it'll make the local hookup network a symmetric graph.
I can't argue with that.
Wait up!
Skate faster!
Hi.  
That's my hat you're wearing.
 So, you found me after all.
You didn't make it easy.
You saw through me, all right.  But not quite well enough.
Because if you wanted to stay lost forever, you made one mistake
You took my hat.
You took my hat.
I LIKE my hat.
COLD... WARM... HOT! COLD...
I know you're not that into my sister, but she's really crushing on you.
Yeah, it's awkward.
She's in a rough spot.  It's a lot to ask, but could you take her out and ... dissuade her, without rejecting her?
Wait a second.  Are you asking me to show her a mediocre time?
I know it's a weird--
 No, no! This is the mission I was _born_ for.
I figured you could handle it.
One of my classic high-school dates coming up!
Oh God.  Don't overdo it.
Check it out! An electric longboard!
Sweet!
<<RRRR>>
I feel like we're missing something...
Yeah...
<<RRRR>>
Skating uphill like this is amazing.  Years of gliding downhill and pushing uphill, and now suddenly it's gliding both ways.
<<RRRR>>
It's like going from C to Python.  You don't realize how much time you were spending on the boring parts until you don't have to do them anymore.
But coding C or assembly makes you a better programmer.  Maybe the boring parts build character.
Yeah... but it depends how you want to spend your life.  See, my philosophy is --
In my paper, I use an extension of the divisor function over the Gaussian integers to generalize the so-called "friendly numbers" into the complex plane. 
Hold on.  Is this paper simply a build-up to an "imaginary friends" pun?
It MIGHT not be.
I'm sorry, we're revoking your math license.
Wait, you're buying techno on iTunes?
Yeah. So?
Couldn't you just loop the 15-second free sample 20 times and get basically the same thing?
Boo!
What are you doing?
Mounting your EEE PC in a hamster ball.
Well, the TCO of a cat is like $1000
Microcontrollers are all wired up. How's the brain coming?
I've taught it obstacle avoidance and blogging.
Aww, look, it's making friends with the Roomba."
RRRRR>>
Beep!>>
Webcam, RF links, bearings, omni wheels, magnets, EEE PC, omni wheels, battery
Bonk, bonk>>
Man, I hope it's OK that we're laughing at this.
I think my mothering instinct took a wrong turn somewhere.
You mean an awesome turn.
Too bad we can't give it a soul.
Sure we can. 
import soul
Oh, right. Python.
Not content with normal restraining orders, my ex got creative.
Wait... I can't get closer than 500 yards of you... or more than 600 yards away?
You'll have to move somewhere within this ring.
Starting WiFi autoconfig... searching for WiFi... Found no open networks.
Found secure net SSID "Lenhart Family"
Trying common passwords... Failed.  Checking for WEP Vulnerabilities...
Um.
None found.
Connecting to Bluetooth phone... Calling local school... Found Lenhart children.
Notifying field agents.  Children acquired.  Calling Lenhart parents.  Negotiating for WiFi password...
From a young age, gravity pulled him wrong.
Sometimes east, sometimes west.  When he was restrained, it grew erratic.
So he fell.
AAAA
Constantly
AAAAAAAAA
Over land...
AAAAA-<THUD>-A
AAAAAAAAA
A-<THUD>-AAAAAA
AA-<THUD>-AAAAA
And sea.
AAAAAAAAAAAA
AAAAAAAA
AAAAAA
AAAAAAAA
He found, where he could, food-
AAAAAAAAAAAA
AAAAAAAAA
AAAAAAAAA
AAAAAAAAAAA
And love.
AAAA-<THUD>-AAAA
<THUD> ACK <CRASH>
Hiwhat'syourname-
AAAAAAA-<THUD>-AAA
I met this guy.  He knocked me over and tumbled into the distance.
We only shared a few seconds, but in his panicked scream I heard something beautiful.
I think... I think I'm...
Falling for him?
I wasn't going to say it.
She never saw him again.  But nine months later...
Okay, push!
It's a gir-
!!
Whoops!
Ga! Ga!
WHEEEEEEEEEEEEE
EEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE
The End
A spoon crossed with a fork is a spork.
Our lab has successfully crossed a spork with a spoon. 
With your funding, we could create hybrids in proportions corresponding to any binary fraction.
You're toying with powerful forces here.
We know what we're doing.
Two weeks later:
Sometimes I stop right before the finish line.
Why?
'Cause I know I've won.
It proves I'm playing for fun, on my own terms. That I don't need validation from the machine.
That I'm not a rat pulling a lever.
 ...Man. Good Call. Let's stop and explore the course for a - 
 Hey!
 Ha ha!
 Dammit, I'm a sucker for your "Be a Rebel" speech.
 It's more fun than a blue shell.
Vulnerable to certain decoder rings
Gives root access if asked in a stern voice
Vulnerable to flattery
Vulnerable to Jeff Goldblum's Powerbook
Gives root access if user says Elvish word for "friend"
Turns out distro is actually just Windows Vista with a few custom Themes.
"The ones you love will never let you down"
"Your self-confidence is well placed."
"Seek nonviolence in everything you do."
2005-05-26
10458.68
db9318c2259923d08b672cb305440f97
0.857713..., 0.544544...
37.421542, -122.085589
37.857713, -122.544544
http:
I like you.  
I'm sorry.
It's just bad timing. Me with my classes, you with your work, the spiders...
The what?
Just look at those stars.
My father once told me that the great bloggers of the past are up there, watching over us.
High above the blogosphere, a gap opens in the tag clouds.  Cory Doctorow's voice booms forth...
You need to get out either more or less.  I can't decide.
If only there were some way we could be together.
We're so lucky to have each other. How did it happen, anyway?
I, uh... I don't remember.
No, really, how did we get together? It's hard to imagine it happening.
It does strain the bounds of fantasy...
... Fantasy? That's it!
My God, it's the only explanation: We're objects in some transient fantasy. We'll be gone when it ends!
We'll lose each other.
Oh God.
Well, I'm not going out quietly. I'm burning this fucking world.
Burn the world!
Fire! Fire! Cleanse this hellish place --
Man awakens, very surprised
Man is seen running down stairs.
Man gets attention of girl sitting at breakfast table
Man looks confused
 There's the head... he's looking at me... Wait, he's crawling back into the womb.
 What?!
 Yeah, it's the darnedest thing.
Um, what does it mean?
 My guess?  Six more weeks of winter.
Sigh
<<park>>
<<knock knock>>
hi
hi
I give up. you win. I have to know who you are.
We understand each other. I can't let that slip away.
<<beep>>
What was that?!
Remote mines under your car.
Oh, those? I moved them to your garage before knocking.
Touch
...This relationship is going to be tricky.
There's still time to leave and find a non-crazy girl.
Not even slightly interested.
Okay, what airline?
I'm following you.
...I'm following *you*.
I assumed we were walking to the bakery.
You always assume that!
Lockpicks? These are... illegal, actually. Where did you get them?
Oh man, it all started with this hacker girl.
You need to come with -
Sure, sure. But man, let me tell you about her!
If your device has a "Transmit" function, please disable it.
Okay - hang on, I'm half way through the iwconfig man page.
Sir, is this container under three ounces?
Not sure, how much blood is there in a churchmouse?
Why don't you just go.
Sociology is just applied Psychology.
Psychology is just applied Biology.
Biology is just applied Chemistry
Which is just applied Physics. It's nice to be on top.
Oh, hey, I didn't see you guys all the way over there.
Then she put her hands over mine, grinds against me, leans down and whispers, "After tonight, we go and live our lives, no regrets. But I want this, I want you, one last time."
Yes.  Yes, it is.
$4.38
$4.51
$4.85
Check out those prices! Your Prius ain't looking so smart now, huh?
It's ... wait, what?
Maybe you'll go green next time, asshole!
She's cute.
This food is problematic.
Oh man, she's quoting Firefly.
It's the perfect opening. But wait. I'm moving in the fall. If we hit it off, how will I deal with that?
I don't want to ask her to derail her plans. And with things unresolved with Megan, can I really commit enough to make that kind of decision?
Oh God.
Gotta get out.
The window.
That guy's tailgating me.
I'll take a look.
His laptop's running, probably in the back seat. And... yup, the WiFi autoconnects.
Now we just scan for remote exploits... install speech synth...
and take a shot in the psychological dark.
Hello.
What? Who's there?
She'd be alive if it weren't for you.
... Oh God.
Sweet!  We made a baby!
Are we sure we did it right?
We should disassemble it, check all the parts, and put it back together.
Vines useful as impromptu rope
Grows in same habitat as Virginia Creeper
Into light bondage
Too dark to see
Strained
Any ideas?
I can use the trigger mechanism of this gun to ignite a small explosive charge, propelling a metal slug into the guard's head.
I'm Leaving You.
I wish I could do math like when i was young.
Huh?
It doesn't come easy like it once did.
Uh huh.
Math is a game for the young. I need to sit back and let the future happen.
You're thirteen.
Yes, and it's time I accept that.
*Yawn* Good morning from Taipei.
You're drifting west. You were in Honolulu just yesterday.
Our sleep schedules are so messed up that's it's easiest to just refer where are internal clocks seem to be.
I wonder about us.
I love you.
We don't have fun together.
I love you.
it's like we're clinging to the "relationship" framework like it's all we got.
I love you
who are you trying to reassur-
I love you I love you I love you I love you
THE SEA ALWAYS MAKES ME REALIZE
HOW SMALL I REALLY AM.
I SHOULD GET ONE OF THOSE PUMPS.
Sitting down with grad students and timing how long it takes them to figure out that I'm not actually an expert in their field.
Our big problem is heat dissipation
Have you tried logarithms?
Ah, so does this Finno-ugric family include, say, Klingon?
Yeah, my latest work is on ranking people from best to worst.
You see, the deconstruction is inextricable from not only the text, but also the self.
Okay, we're in the belly of the machine. You got the charges?
The what?
The explosive charges!
I just brought this bag for pastries.
The hell? We're on a mission here!
This isn't a bakery?
Oh, Christ, not this shit again.
What about these scones?
Those are lug nuts.
...Maybe SOME of them aren't. <<crunch>> Ow! <<crunch>>
zzz zzz>>
zzzzz>>
A True Story:
Hey, it's your cousin. I got a new computer but don't want Windows. Can you help me install "Linux"?
Sure.
It says my XORG is broken. What's an "XORG"? Where can I look that up?
Hmm, lemme show you man pages.
Due to auto-config issues, I'm leaving Ubuntu for Debian.
Or Gentoo.
Uh oh.
You haven't answered your phone in days.
Can't sleep. Must compile kernel.
I'm too late.
talk to your kids about Linux... Before somebody else does.
1,213
10,230
this is a disaster.
is it really that bad?
do you know how much scripture we'll have to revise?
look, we've apologized--
i mean, we can't have a trinity with just a father and a son!
again, we're sorry.
sorry's not enough. guards, take their proton packs.
hey, we were just doing our jobs!
Man, paleontology sucks these days.
Why?
Jurassic Park came out 15 years ago.
So?
Today's grad students got into dinosaurs after seeing it as kids. They don't care about fossils. Brats.
Before they had living dinosaurs handed to them by Hollywood, I was out in Texas digging up Arcocanthosaur teeth.
So, you were into dinosaurs when they were still underground?
Exactly!
MY ROAD TRIP WITH MY BROTHER RAN INTO TROUBLE AROUND PAGE THREE OF THE GOOGLE MAPS PRINTOUT
OKAY, NOW TAKE DOCK ST TOWARD THE FERRY
WE'RE SUPPOSED TO TAKE A FERRY? IT'S PAST MIDNIGHT, AND THESE WOODS ARE CREEPY
GOOGLE MAPS WOULDN'T STEER US WRONG.
LET ME SEE THOSE DIRECTIONS.
Freemanic Paracusia, A disorder wherein you hear everything you read in the comforting voice of Morgan Freeman.
Why, you could enlarge your penis for cheap. My, my. Isn't that something?
Premier Election Solutions  has blamed ohio voting machine errors on problems with the machines' McAfee antivirus software.
Wait. "Antivirus software"? On voting machines?  You're doing it wrong.
Why? Security is good, right?
Of course. But, well-
Imagine you're at a parent-teacher conference, and the teacher reassures you that he always wears a condom while teaching.
Ah. Strictly speaking, it's better than the alternative.
-Yet someone is clearly doing their job horribly wrong.
Now, this is a story all about how
My life got flipped turned upside down
And I'd like to take a minute
Just sit right there
I'll tell you how I became uncertain about our relationship. I think you just like having a girlfriend, it doesn't matter who.
I think we should break up.
The reverse Bel-Air only works once, so make it something unforgettable.
...wait, seriously?
Yeah.
 So, Quantum Teleportation-
 The name is misleading.  It's a particle statistics thing.
 So it's not like Star Trek?  That's boring.
 Okay, I'm sick of this.  Every time there's a paper on Quantum Teleportation, you reporters write the same disappointed story.
 But-
 Talk to someone else.  I'm going to the Bahamas.  <<Click>>
Okay, the pringles cantenna has let us patch into the WiFi network across the road.
And they have internet?
No, but I think the cable van will hook up their house first.
3, 375, 9, 0, 0, 0, 0, 0
7, 7503, 2007, 10, 5, 3, 6, 2
9, 1929000, 247, 7, 14, 13, 2, 1
7, 6335, 394, 34, 3, 2, 6, 0
3, 3513, 34, 0, 63, 0, 0, 0
1, 9, 5, 3, 0, 0, 3, 0
3, 1461, 1, 1, 1, 0, 0, 0
2, 19, 4, 2, 0, 0, 0, 0
Hey, Gdel we're compiling a comprehensive list of fetishes.  What turns you on?
Anything not on your list.
Uhhm.
I Love You.
Well, Duh
Sir, the possibility of successfully navigating an asteroid field is approximately 3720 to 1!
Seriously? ...Christ
I Love You.
Oh! Hey, that explains the kissing earlier.
I Love You.
I'm Nailing Your Brother.
Hokey Religions and ancient weapons are no match for scissors, though they do beat paper and rock.
I Love You.
Cool. Listen, this thing is really, REALLY cold.
I Love You.
Wowzers.
General Solo, is your strike team assembled?
Barely.
They're pretty drunk.
I'd just as soon kiss a wookie.
Man, me too, but chewie never seems interested.
Maybe I should Grow My hair out.
I get in trouble for showing up contented at protests.
Things are pretty okay!
Anyone up for scrabble later?
OH GOD, A FURRY. DON'T LET IT TOUCH YOU.
HEY, KID.
FORGET THOSE ASSHOLES.  COME HELP ME.
THANKS, SO YOU'RE COOL WITH FURRIES?
WELL, I THINK YOUR FETISH IS AS WEIRD AS HELL.  IT JUST BOTHERS ME HOW YOU'RE THIS DESIGNATED INTERNET PUNCHING BAG AMONG PEOPLE WHO ARE OTHERWISE DOWN WITH WEIRD FETISHES.  SO I STICK UP FOR YOU WHEN I CAN.
WELL, THANKS.  I OWE YOU ONE.
NO BIG DEAL.
NO, THIS IS LIKE THE LION AND THE MOUSE.
...LISTEN, CAN WE PICK A COMPARISON LESS LIKELY TO TURN YOU ON?
SORRY.
So, the LHC's turning on. This could be our last night on earth.
Gimme a break. They're not even colliding yet, and it won't do anything cosmic rays haven't.
Hey, I didn't say no.
I'm a physics grad student. I need the excuse to party.
So, you're up for a night with a charming stranger?
Depends. Top or bottom?
Hey, I haven't even bought you a drink.
Barkeep, two whiskey sours, straight down.
Oh God 
The Ozone layer! 
That was our last banana 
You're such an asshole.
Hi!
Hi.
What's up?
Uh, not a lot...
Shit. Does Bernanke own a crossbow?
I FOUND MEGAN'S STAPLE GUN! 
 OH NO.
 OH GOD WHAT ARE YOU--
 INSTALLING DEBIAN! <<KA CHUNK>>
SANDWICHES! <<ka CHUNK ka CHUNK>>
 MUST AFFIX EVERYTHING TO EVERYTHING
...HAVE YOU BEEN ABUSING MY STAPLE GUN?
NO.
 YES!I haven't lived a perfect life.
But there's one thing of which I'm proud.
When someone calls my phone,
Sweet, beat 'Populous'. Now, on to 'Alpha Centauri'.
Until I can afford 'Spore', I'm just playing through all my old games in order of scale.
What are you writing?
Virus.
What's it do?
When someone tries to post a YouTube comment, it first reads it aloud back to them.
Soon everywhere:
...I'm a moron.
I...
I didn't know.
mrowl! 
Hey a heaping bowl of salt! 
Snoop Dogg 
I have no idea how to land 
In retrospect, they  shouldn't  have sent a poet 
Woo Python! 
The Observable Universe, from Top to Bottom ~ On a log scale~
Sizes are not to scale, but heights above the Earth's surface are accurate on a log scale 
Ooh, I think I've got it figured out! Okay, one more hour.
The most powerful gaming systems in the world still can't match the addictiveness of tiny in-browser Flash games.
we need to talk.
<<cough>>
XKCD presents a guide to numerical sex positions:
Uh. 
Guys? 
Aww, c'mon... 
if you want a collection you can count on, PIRATE IT.
I'm sorry. The google maps team hired me.
But I can't move to California
Then I guess this is the end.
It can't be! ... Listen.
When I look deep into your eyes, I see a future for us.
Look deeper.
"We're sorry, but we don't have imagery at this zoom level"?
On Twitter
An odd regression:
Ancient memes
Find new expression
Burma-shave
I know you shouldn't feed the trolls, but sometimes they just provoke me to where I can't help replying.
Yeah, me too. Yesterday this guy kept spamming "First!" So I got a set of actuarial tables and spent twenty minutes telling him when all his childhood heroes would likely die.
...
Remind me never to upset you, ever.
2038: Last of the original Star Wars cast dies.
Augh!
Mr. President, the bloggers are restless
What are they a-twitter about now?
It's the tubes sir. They're clogged. We put too much stuff on them.
How bad is it?
The internet could be inoperative within days.
We can't let a crucial resource go unshepherded.
Go on.
I recommend you appoint a Secretary of the Internet. Someone to impose some orders on this mess.
Ordering bloggers around? Doesn't sound easy.
No; it's like herding lolcats.
What?
Nothing.
Do you have someone in mind for the post?
I know just the guy.
<<Ring>>
Breaking news--the President has made a nomination to the new post of Internet Secretary. We know little about the man, shown here.
Possibly a haberdasher?
Attempts to reach the nominee at home were unsuccessful.
What the hell kind of apartment has a moat?
To understand the culture from which he came--and which he may soon administer--we sent a reporter to what we're told is the source of that culture. Tom?
I'm coming to you live from the 4chan 
Why are you wearing a helmet, Tom?
I'm not sure.
Ahoy! What news of the blogs?
Dr. Paul! The President's named his nominee!
It's not me?
Wait! I remember that guy from the campaign! He's a notorious troll!
They mustn't put him in charge. Quick, call the capitol!
Can't, sir. The tubes just went down completely.
Blast!
Then we'll go ourselves. Full speed ahead!
I said full speed!
It's a blimp, sir!
It appears you have quite an arrest record.
Is it true you completely disassembled someone's car outside a Starbucks?
It was parked across two spaces.
You stole a red Fokker triplane and strafed the snoopy float at the Macy's Thanksgiving day parade?
Got three mimes, too.
You disrupted a 9
I have evidence! Don't trust the media! Wake up, sheeple!
You were fired from Radio Shack after you built a death ray and vaporized a customer?
I was just testing it! Figures that'd be the one day there was a shopper in the aisle.
And you were thrown out of Microsoft headquarters for... trying to feed a squirrel through a fax machine?
I forgot about that! it was part of an argument with Steve Ballmer about Vista.
This is the worst history of vandalism, gleeful mayhem, and general recalcitrance we've seen in a nominee since Ruth Bader Ginsburg. 
And this--you stole a nuclear submarine?
I plead the third.
You mean the fifth?
No, the third.
You refuse to quarter troops in your house?
I have few principles, but I stick to them.
We're nearing Washington, sir.
It's a balloon.
...Oh, no.
Sir! The balloon is hailing us!
Ahoy.
Doctorow!
I won't let you stop this nomination. We bloggers watch out for our own.
Stand aside, Cory.
Nay!
Very well. Battle stations!
We're taking damage!
Keep firing!
No good! We're losing altitude!
All engines full! Pull up!
Can't, sir!
Sir, maybe if we dropped all this gold...
Never!
We've lost, sir. We have to abort.
Not yet, we don't! Open the loading bay doors.
You take the blimp and fall back.
I've got a message to deliver.
RON PAUL evolves into TRON PAUL
We were convened here to review your nomination for the position of internet secretary.
However, on review of your qualifications, we've decided to sentence you to death.
An unorthodox move, sure. But the vote was unanimous.
There's no grid! How do I steeeeer!!!!!
Well, it's been fun. But I was never actually interested in taking the position. Good lord; listening to internet arguments all day? No thank you.
Then why did you sit through all those hearings?
It was taking us a while to move the pumps into the maintenance tunnels.
Security! Someone!
Get Him!
Aaaaa!
Hey!
Get Off!
Ow!
Ughhh.
I feel queasy . . .
Hey!
Hi, Cory.
Need a lift?
Sure.
So are you, like, a fugitive now?
Well, I never did give them my name . . .
Let's jump down here from the balcony!
Senior senators first!
Wheeee!
I'm a submarine!
Okay class, I've turned in your exams for grading. Now --
Miss Lenhart?
I used a #3 pencil instead of a #2. Will that mess anything up?
You WHAT?
OH GOD!
OH GOD!
I've never seen so much blood!
Mortal! I come offering a deal - 
Read the sign.
"By entering this room, you agree to forfeit your own soul rather than negotiate with the mortal within..." Wait, you can't - 
Too late.
Mephistopheles encounters the E.U.L.A.According to the A.S.T paper, every galaxy is being pulled toward one area of the sky
They hypothesize that it may be due to a supermassive object beyond the edge of the visible universe.
Maybe it's your mom - Zing!
Do you think?
Pull Harder, Mom. - I Miss you.
Another ISP's filtering content.
Thank God for Crypto.
It wasn't that long ago that RSA was illegal to export. Classified a munition.
You know, I think the crypto community took the wrong side in that fight. We should've lobbied to keep it counted as a weapon.
Why?
Once they get complacent, we break out the second amendment.
...Damn.
So I'm stuck in this desert for eternity.
I don't know why. I just woke up here one day.
I never feel hungry or thirsty.
I just walk.
Sand and rocks...
...stretch to infinity.
As best as I can tell.
There's plenty of time for thinking out here.
An eternity really.
I've rederived modern math in the sand
and then some.
Physics too.  I worked out the kinks in quantum mechanics and relativity.
Took a lot of thinking, but this place has fewer distractions than a Swiss patent office.
One day I started laying down rows of rocks.
Each new row followed from the last in a simple pattern.
With the right set of rules and enough space,
I was able to build a computer.
Each new row of stones is the next iteration of the computation.
Sure it's rocks instead of electricity, but it's the same* thing.
Just slower.
*Turing-complete
After a while, I programmed it to be a physics simulator.
Every piece of information about a particle was encoded as a string of bits written in the stones.
With enough time and space, I could fully simulate two particles interacting.
But I have infinite time and space.
So I decided to simulate a universe.
The eons blur past as I walk down a single row.
The rows blur past to compute a single step.
And in the simulation...
...another instant ticks by.
So if you see a mote of dust vanish from your vision in a little flash or something
I'm sorry. I must have misplaced a rock...
...sometime in the last few billions and billions of millennia. 
Oh and...
if you think the minutes in your morning lecture are taking a long time for _YOU_...
Hey. I sold your Roomba on Craigslist so I could buy myself Left 4 Dead.
But I eBayed your XBox so I could get this dueling harness for my Roomba!
Aww.
Aww.
 Oh, hey, it's twelve of the dudes from control group B!
So does the carpet match the drapes?
Yes but not the upholstery.
Can I plug my extension cord over here?
No.
Why?
Solar Flares.
A large solar flare could dent the Earth's magnetic field inwards. The Earth's spin could then induce a strong current in any long conductors, melting them and starting fires. By extending your cord, you could kill us all.
Really?
Warn your friends.
That was MEAN.
Listen, SOMEBODY has to keep MythBusters in business. Next season should be fun.
The weather outside is frightful.
I hate trudging through the icy slush and biting sleet.
But it beats lying in our warm, cozy bed
Listening to you talk about DRM for hours on end
 Come back! Just listen to this one quote from 
With the collapse of the dollar, the government has endorsed an alternate currency.  Your monetary worth is now determined by the number of funny pictures saved to your hard drive.
I have been preparing for this moment all my life.
I have a crush on you.
I could ask you out, and move on with my life if you said no.
Or, WE COULD BE FRIENDS!
See, I don't want to consider that you might not be attracted to me. I'm scared of rejection, so I've decided relationships should grow smoothly out of friendships.
When you have problems, I'll be there for you, night after night.
Selflessly.
*hug*
I'll tear down the jerks you date, and wait for you to realize how good I am for you. That only I will ever understand you.
<<Sniff>>
There there
You don't want to hurt my feelings, and I won't ever force the issue. I'll tell myself it's because I "Value our friendship."
Bit by bit, I'll make you depend on me.
You'll think about how long it would take to build this kind of connection again.
And in a moment of weakness
and loneliness
you'll give in.
It'll feel comfortable and natural. You'll quietly revise your definition of love and try to be happy. And sometimes you will be.
Only the wistfulness in your gaze and the tiny pause before you say "I love you" will hint that this wasn't the ending you'd hoped for.
Sound good?
...I'm going to date this jerk.
But he doesn't respect you!
"Mmm, simultaneous orgasms"
"That wasn't simultaneous"
"Huh?  It totally was!"
You're my dearest darling danish.
And you're my lovely cutie pie.
Well, you're --
Did you ever figure out those mysterious woodchips?
The ones in the hallway? No.
You didn't suspect that they matched the timber used in 1861 to build the "ghost ship" Mary Celeste, prompting you to send them to a lab for analysis, the results of which raised new and stranger questions?
No, I threw them out. Why?
I got this gun that shoots marshmallows.
 AUGH!
 Man, I forgot that was there.
The next day, everyone else got them too.
Hey noob!  Eat stay-puft!
 No, don't cross the ~
Okay, this is bad.
You're shooting what?
Start
Do you understand flow charts?
Good
Let's go drink.
Okay. You see the line labeled "yes"?
But you see the ones labeled "no".
Wait, what?
Listen.
I hate you.
...and you can see the ones labeled "no"?
But you just followed them twice!
Screw it.
Hey I should try installing FreeBSD!
GO."
Due to the slowing economy, we could only afford to produce the prime-numbered panels.
You should be able to infer the missing parts of the story easily enough.
We apologize for the inconvenience.
I'm going to one-up those Christmas light displays on YouTube.
Hmm. Needs more flair. Do you know what happens when you fire sodium pellets into a snowbank?
No.
Me neither.
Whoops, one of the Arduino control boards sublimated.
If only I could make it self-repairing...
Shit. The system has become sentient.
Friggin' Python.
GRAAARR!
But according to this email forward, Santa is secretly a Muslim!
It explains everything!
Okay, the cloned raptors are hunting the last of the cyborgs. We're safe.
Are you sure you thought this through?
Are the raptors contained?
Sure. Unless they figure out how to build lightsabers.
It's all right. I've got her.
...Clever girl.
Great. Bill Gates kills Santa.
I thought it was Stallman with a dyed beard.
Where did you get this Christmas tree?
Nowhere.
Did you cut down the Yggdrasil?
...Maybe.
Merry Christmas from XKCD <3
"Our relationship entered its decline at this point."
"That's when you started graphing everything."
"Coincidence!"
And so I hired Rick Astley to show up at her party.
And rickroll her? Isn't that a little...last year?
Ah, but he's not going to sing.
Hey is that Rick Astley?
I think it is. He just came in.
Oh no. Brace yourself.
 Wait. He's just standing there. Where's the song?
 He's staring at me.
 This is a little creepy.
 What's going on?
 That's actually Rick Astley Staring at me.
 What's he doing?
 Oh God, I keep expecting it, hearing it in my head.
Just do it already!
AAAAAAAA
Mr. Astley?
Yes?
What did you do to her? What was that?
That, my dear,
Is how I roll.
<<Pthoo>> 
<<Clink!>> 
I've invented the worst mixed drink ever.
Huh-Steve Jobs isn't doing a keynote this year, citing massive weight loss due to some hormonal problem.
Too bad. I bet Apple was excited about unveiling the thinnest and lightest CEO in the industry.   
What are you doing?
Trying the Windows 7 beta.
Why is it showing a picture of Hitler?
I don't know.  I can't get it to do anything else.
There's no UI?
No, just Hitler.
Did you try Ctrl-Alt-Delete?
It just makes Hitler's eyes flash.
Huh.
Well, it's better than Vista.
True.
It's snowing!
 Sled time!
It depresses me that I'm too old to learn another language fluently.  My brain's solidified.
Is there one you wish you knew?
No, I just hate having options closed to me.  Like I've given up a life that was once possible.
Which reminds me -- our anniversary is coming up.
Man, that ride failed to be a metaphor for our conversation.
Guess this isn't the Calvin & Hobbes-model toboggan.
Should  I ask?
I'm locked out, and I'm trying to get my roommate to let me in.
First I tried her cell phone, but it's off.
Then I tried IRC, but she's not online.
I couldn't find anything to throw at her window,
so I SSH'd into the Mac Mini in the living room and got the speech synth to yell at her for me.
Hey I'm locked out downstairs
But I think I left the volume way down, so I'm reading the OS X docs to learn to set the volume via command line.
Ah.
I take it the doorbell doesn't work?
More sugary drinks? Are you 
Yeah - then we keep her supplied with insulin unless things go wrong.
I take the Jurassic Park approach to parenting.
My hobby is making miniatures. Check this out-- it's a fully-functional grand piano.
Woah - beautiful.
Sadly, I've never head what proper music sounds like on it-the keys are too small to play.
I once asked a genie for someone who could play it for me, but I think he misheard.
... are you doing anything later?
Welcome to Hell. Here's-
Wait. I know you. 
You're the Fujitsu exec who killed the Q-series. 
...Yes?
The Q2010 was the perfect laptop!
Powerful, durable, had every feature, and made the Air look <u>bulky<
But noone bought it!
Then you marketed it wrong!
Wait. Don't you <i>encourage<
In theory, yes, but we need laptops too!
Although it's moot, since we have an exclusive deal with Sony. 
I <i>knew<
Genetic algorithms tip: *Always* include this in your fitness function.
You know, it might be cool to be a woman.
It... might be cool to be a woman?
Yeah, but the menstruation thing is freaky.
Yeah, but... the, um.  What?
Turns out I'm even worse at administering the presidential oath than John Roberts.
Arthur C. Clarke said space elevators will be build 50 years after everybody stops laughing.
So all we have to do is get Mind of Mencia on every channel and wait.
Oh, hush.
Ready?
Ready.
 Roar! Boo!
Quack
Duckling Loop
His laptop's encrypted. Let's build a million-dollar cluster to crack it.
No good! It's 4096-bit RSA!
Blast! Our evil plan is foiled!
His laptop's encrypted. Drug him and hit him with this $5 wrench until he tells us the password.
Got it.
Can my boyfriend come along?
I'm not your boyfriend!
You totally are.
I'm casually dating a number of people.
But you spend twice as much time with me as with anyone else. I'm a clear outlier.
Your math is irrefutable.
Face it - I'm your statistically significant other.
So how far did you get with her?
Second base?
Wait, which one is that? Below the waist, but... not under the clothes?
I think that's... shortstop?
You should try crossing the pitcher's mound. Then down the 50-yard line, and right past her ten-pin.
Sounds tricky.
Yeah. Last time I tried it, I got a red flag. If you know what I mean.
I really don't.
Thigh contact.
Standing anywhere near Peaches.
Anal sex 
2outfielders1glove.
Retrograde wheelbarrow.))
"Virginity"  line.))
Okay, got the blood off the walls. 
I finished the floor
Good; he'll be home any- Oh crap! We forgot to clean the ceiling!
There's no time!
Wait, I'll handle it.
Hi. Did you know "gullible" is written on your ceiling?
Hah. Yeah, right.
 Happy valentine's day
 -xkcd
OK TEAM. WE'RE SIXTEEN POINTS DOWN. IF WE WANT TO COME BACK FROM THIS
WOO!! SCORE!!!
OKAY, NOW WE'RE EIGHTEEN POINTS DOWN...LISTEN - I'M STARTING TO THINK WE SHOULD ONLY TAKE THESE BREAKS AT HALFTIME.
It's possible to create events which Wikipedia cannot cover neutrally
In a week, I will be donating $1,000,000 to a recipient determined by the word count of the Wikipedia article about this event. If it's even, the money goes to pro-choice activists. If it's odd, pro-life.
...and that's why music DRM is bad for listeners and artists!
What are you doing?
In case you didn't notice, we won the music DRM war.  The big stores are DRM free.
So close the comment thread, get out the debit card, buy us some music, and let's rock the fuck out.
But I don't actually like music, I just like being self-righteous on the web.
Lucky for you, that will always be free.
Do you have any thoughts regarding the particle accelerator's tertiary F.E.L. Guidance System?
We can't put the broken part in the machine.  It wouldn't smash the right tiny things together.  Then the machine might break.  That would be very bad.
A Kindle? E Books, huh?
Ebooks are for chumps.
Why get a kindle, then?
One reason:
Why does that sound familiar? Gimme that. 
Hitchhiker's Guid...
Oh, my sweet Westley!
Why did you let me think you were dead?
You shacked up with the prince!
After years of mourning! The worst pain of my life!
And now you ... kill people?
I'd hardly be a dread pirate if I didn't.
How lovable.
It was for the sake of the narrative!
Fuck the narrative. I'm going to go see if that Spaniard's single.
... As you wish.
Sup dawg, I herd you didn't liek forming babby, but I accidentally in your base.
Ruined life.
Sentence set the new meme destiny record.
Hey. If  draw enough lines, I can see what's behind the screen.
Oh man, almost...
Hi!
You're cute!
Wha-
I'm the one who draws when you turn the knobs.
It's lonely in here.
It's lonely out here too.
I'm glad you found me, then!
Let's be friends.
And never be lonely again.
*sigh*
I used to think correlation implied causation.
Then I took a statistics class.  Now I don't.
Sounds like the class helped.
Well, maybe.
I wish this were in America.
Why?
I hear we'd go before a jury of our peers, and I've always seeded generously
Signs your coders don't have enough work to do:
I'm almost up to my old typing speed in dvorak
Our servers now support gopher.
Just in case.
Our pages are now HTML, XHTML-STRICT, and haiku-compliant
Haiku?
<div class="main">
<span id="marquee">
Blog!<
Hey!  Have you guys seen this webcomic?
Bloody Mary, Bloody Mary, Bloody Mary.
I'm all for green energy, but those turbines creep me out. They remind me of War of the Worlds, or the Tripod books.
They -are- unnerving.
I can't shake the feeling that at any moment they'll--
Oh no.
Al Gore, you've doomed us all.
It's coming this way!
Run!
What now?
Someone has to stop them.
But who could--
Stand aside!
Your projects are due today by 5:00 PM.
Decades from now, with school a distant memory, you'll <u>still<
bailout: $170 billion; bonuses: $165 million
bailout: $170,000 million; bonuses: $165 million
stop giving large numbers without context or proper comparison. The difference between a million and a billion is the difference between a sip of wine and 30 seconds with your daughter, and a bottle of gin and a night with her.
Appending "no pun intended" to lines with no pun in them.
I think he's internalized his girlfriend's attitudes - no pun intended - and so...
"Internalized?" Lied? Analyzed? Or is it "attitudes"? Dammit.
The Uncomfortable Truths Well
For a universe that's supposed to be half Chinese, Firefly sure doesn't have any Asians.
There's no solid evidence DVORAK's better than QWERTY. The standard histories are urban legends.
You've never said "I love you" and meant it. It was always just words.
You meant it every time.
Mmm, That probable couple 150 meters away is so hot.  Oh yeah, theoretically work it, baby.
Hey! No statistical voyeurism!
Why do you have a crossbow in your desk?
You _don't_?
No -- why would...
You _are_ studying the consequences of Higgs excitation, aren't you?  Like the rest of the lab?
Yes, but why--
Maybe he's slow with the math.
Well, he has until Tuesday.
Poor guy.
"-Email Account Setup- To verify your identity, we need to ask you a question nobody else could answer."
"Q: Where are the bodies buried? A:"
Damn.
Today was the ten-year anniversary of the release of 'The Matrix'.  I sat down to watch it again.
Holy Fuck, ten years ago?
Unfortunately, no one can explain what the matrix is.  You have to see it for yourself.
Sure you can.  It's a computer simulation in which you live, thinking it's reality.
Oh.
... What?  Look, maybe you just suck at explaining.
...Or you take the red pill, and I show you how deep the rabbit hole goes.
NOW look what you've done.
Where are we?
I have no idea.
Please remove any keys, metallic items, weapons--
Eww.
I forgot how good that movie was.
Wanna put on the other two?
 Crash 
I forgot how good that movie was.
Too bad they never made any sequels.
True.Benjamin Franklin?
Yes?
I bring a message from the future! I don't have much time.
What is it?
The convention you're setting for electric charge is backward. The one left on glass by silk should be the negative charge.
Science may discover immortality, but it won't happen in the next eighty years.
You'll never find a programing language that frees you from the burden of clarifying your ideas.
But I know what I mean!
You avoid your friend Mike because you're uncomfortably attracted to him.
Nice try, Mike.
Get out of the well.
Aww.
When'd you get the car?
It's the darndest thing. We bought it as a prize for the 100,000,000th visitor to our website.
And they didn't want it?
Apparently.
Maybe they didn't see the notice.
It was flashing and everything!
How bizarre.
?
Dear? Where are you--Come back!
Okay,
What's next?
Hey dad, look at this old music video.
We're no strangers to love...
Wow, you got me.
Did your generation really use this to troll people?  SO lame.  Your generation sucked at pranks.
Did we?  I once raised a kid with conditioning so her speech centers shut down when she was upset.
What?  No, you couldn't have bleegle warble yargle arggh!
Teehee!
Oh God I ate pork yesterday before I knew about swine flu!
Without duct tape I can't seal the door to keep out swine flu but I can't get duct tape without going outside! Help!
How long until the swine flu reaches me here in Madagascar?
Swine flu is God's punishment for the ACLU and lesbians and 9
I fell down the stairs and there was a crack and a jagged white thing is sticking out of my arm guys is this swine flu?
@UNTOWARD: No, that sounds like syphilis, not swine flu. What did you say you did with a pig?
My Dad said flu vaccines are linked to autism, so to be safe from swine flu I'm trying to lick an autistic kid.
So you can come up with a song title fitting any tag combination?
Try me.
Lesbian voyeurism one-hit wonder mash-up.
"I wish that Stacey's Mom had Jessie's Girl."
Well, that was one, but-
"When you Come On Eileen I touch myself."
Okay, wow.
I love getting pacakges.
I set up a script to search eBay et. al.  for $1 items with free shipping.
I gave it $365, so each day it can buy me something random.
What if you just end up with lots of crap?
I'll give it away.  But I'm sure I'll end up with some interesting stuff.
Could be handy around the house.
It's spring, but hey.
Huh.
Uh oh.
I'm stopping this before I end up on every F.B.I. watch list ever.
"Why race him?" He's Captain Reynolds!
Mr. Fillion is an actor. Firefly was years ago.
He has his own life to live, and I'm sure the last thing he wants to do is indulge a fan by playing Mal for him.
 Name's Captain Reynolds, ma'am. *ahem* Name's Captain Reynolds, ma'am.
Nathan? Telephone!
That's Captain!
Fine, Captain Nathan.
No, use my space name!
*sigh*
So, how about we race for charities?
Sure. Always did want a charity of my own.
Come again?
You know, boxes in supermarkets collecting food. 'Course, ought to tack up a list sayin' which wines I like best...
Uh, that's not quite...
Listen, I'm the captain here.
...I just got goosebumps when you said that.
Yeah, happens to me too whenever I get captainy. I cut such a strapping figure. Buckle! Swash! All right, let's do this race.
meet a few of my friends. this is-
Summer Glau! you were the best part of Chronicles.
I eat my bodyweight in food every 31 days. that's slightly faster than the human average.
yeah, there's a reason she only plays strange roles.
Ah.
I'm part of the floor now.
and this is Kaylee.
my name is Jewel, Nathan.
Kaylee-
Jewel.
 almost done!
so wait. Summer's actually weird, Jewel's actually a mechanical whiz...
...will Morena Baccarin be here? is she really a-
NO.
Kaylee, I've been gunnin' the radio hand throttle thingy for a while, but it ain't movin'
oh, I must've set it to the wrong frequency!
AAAAAAAA
On your mark...
Get set...
Remember episode 11, when I got all naked in that desert?
Go!
... I said "Go."
someone throw some water on him
Can't...get it...out of my head...
He's right behind me. Kaylee, I'm gonna try a Crazy Ivan.
That doesn't make any sense, Nathan.
Trust me.
No, I mean it's not a skateboard maneuver. The concept doesn't even apply to this situation.
That's why it just might work!
No, that's the opposite of true!
On my mark, override the remote differential and throw her into a spin.
Mark!
I'm down. Tell Summer "The chickens are in the hayloft. Plan Gamma is a go."
She says, "Plan gamma acknowledged. The meerkats are in the bad.
So we're good?
Hard to tell with her. Do you see an actual bag of meerkats?
No.
Then we're probably good.
Oh! Hi, Miss Glau! I'd love to talk, but Nathan's back on his feet and catching up.
Wha-
I've never been so turned on in my life.
Hello, you're on Car talk.
Of the potential responses to my brakes' failure, I did not choose the best.
Hello, you're on Car Talk.
Hmm.
Hey, can you do me without a condom? We need a young child for something.
Okay.
Closed
Could not reproduce.
The tracking tag will record the shark's movement and habits.
Then, it will pop free and float to the surface.
 We can't afford a recovery program, so the capsules will inflate helium balloons, drift over land,
And hopefully be found and mailed to us. Any questions?
!!!
??
AAAAAAAA
<<Chomp chomp>>
Daddy?
Yes?
I want to be a scientist.
We're getting some culture in you if it 
Don't wanna.
All you listen to is techno.
But... the 
I think we're the only people here under 60.
Shhh.
The right side is definitely better.
Better? 
They've all got bigger instruments. I bet they make more money.
<<Sigh>>
Looks like a murder-suicide.
Any interesting mathematical patterns?
No, George, just two dead bodies and a lot of blood.
Two... that's the third Fibonacci number!
Not now, George.
Lakeview High is the best!
Yeah!
Wait, why?
What?
A guy on the North High football team helped me rebuild my deck.
It seems ungrateful to presume we're better.
I mean, school districts are just based on zip codes.
Their principal donated a kidney to my dad.
I'm texting with my friend there now. He says it's okay, and we're invited to their events if we want.
But he sounded kind of hurt.
Why are we doing this, rally, again?
Wait, who's driving?
Why?
Tom, right?
Yes, but we have to leave in two groups. One of which will need at least two drivers.
Someone has to get Paul, and Julia and Emily have to leave by 10:00.
The logistics of who can get drunk are nontrivial.
Yeah, and I can't ride in a car with the wolf because he'll eat my goat.
Dammit, guys.
Thank you for the <<Twitch>> ... lovely... <<Twitch>> birthday card!
Hi, it's Stephenie Meyer. Fine, you don't like my books. But please leave us alone.
Show us your tits.
I asked politely. Don't make me get tough.
And what, call the internet police? You don't get it, do you? We've been trolling for years. We're all anonymous. There's nothing you can do to hurt us. We're the net's hate machine.
Okay. Just remember, I gave you a chance. <<Disconnected>>
Oh... Oh God.
Man, sex has all these crazy social rules. They just create drama.
Let's agree to change them, and make sex simple!
Okay!
Hooray! We've solved the problem of drama!
I'll go tell everyone!
Holy shit
Guys
People are 
This is the Voynich manuscript -- a book, allegedly 500 years old, written in an unrecognized script.  It's some kind of visual encyclopedia of imaginary plants and undeciphered "recipes".
It could be a hoax, a lost language, a cipher, an alien text, glossolatia -- no one knows.
No one? But it's obvious.
... Obvious?  Linguists and cryptographers have been stumped for decades.
They forget. Human nature doesn't change.
Just imagine someone found a book from _our_ time, full of lists, illustrations, tables, and long, dry descriptions of nonexistent worlds written in an invented language.  What have they found?
... Dear Lord. It 
Forsooth! I concoct an elixir of courage.
Nae! The source booke sayeth that requires some wolfsbane!
Your druid doth lose two points.
Ugh. Stupid uterus.
Hey, your period is every 28 days, right?
Yes, why?
Well, preiod = T = 1
So?
Using this, we can calculate something you already know.
What?
Your uterus-hertz.
If I could get up I'd smack you.
Check out my new android girlfriend.
Is she a sex bot?
I don't think arc-welding a cherry stem counts as sexy.
Remove your pants.
No.
We're in a narrow window in which people are using Google Latitude, but haven't learned the habit of turning it off when they're doing something discreetly.
I wrote an app to log friends' locations and work out addresses and business names.
Constant novelty saps my initiative. I'm gonna try to spend a weekend at home without internet.
I give you an hour.
So far, it's not actually too bad!
Ahem?
Wait. Shit.
I shouldn't have watched all that porn as a teenager.
It's not that it scarred me.
It's just that we had dial-up.
And now I'm stuck with a fetish.
For video compression.
Can you try to look... blockier?
The Apocalypse! The skies burn, the seas turn to blood, and the dead walk the Earth!
The dead what?
Walk the Earth!
I have to go.
The dead return!
Everyone, quick, get your names on here!
At last.
I hope there's time!
Hurrghhh
Paul Erds?
Yes?
We need you to sign this.
I thought your android girlfriend was cool so I got myself an android boyfriend.
He's really great. I like how --
Uh.
Mmmmm...
... Huh.
It's like somebody stuck a vibrator in a fleshlight.
Mmmm
A strange game. The only winning move is not to play.
Have you seen John lately?
He and Claire blew off this party to see Jeff.
They do that a lot.
Yeah; I don't know what his problem is with hanging out lately.
He's like Katie - ever noticed how she only goes somewhere if Jeff's there?
It's so lame how s he hangs around him even when he's not single:
HE LIKES IT. 
SOMEONE SERIOUSLY NEEDS TO DATE HER.
TOTALLY.
And honestly I feel like a jerk but I wouldn't mind if she hung around with us a little less. She needs other friends, you know!
HAVE YOU 
I'm glad I'm not the only one who thought that was weird.
Michelle dates potheads like Elaine but at least they both have real jobs.
Michelle does? She designs those book covers, right?
And it's not like she smokes a lot.
Elaine is one of those girls who
Don't you agree?
Hey, wake up.
You zoned out or something.
Sorry; I must be... tired.
I don't blame you. All day cooped up working on papers.
Must be nice to get out and relax, huh?
Yeah.
Idiocracy is so true.
I know, right? It used to be that the intelligent, upper classes had more children.
Sadly, the recent reversal of this trend has dragged IQ scores and average education steadily downward.
Depressing, huh?
Yeah, except 
Huh?
Wrong. False. The opposite of true.
Your'e like the religious zealots who are 
And you're just as wrong.
But look at how popular --
More harm has been done by people panicked over societal decline than societal decline ever did.
Look -- all we need is a program that limits breeding to --
New theory: Stupid people reproduce more because the alternative is sleeping with 
I hate how when I'm talking while I type, sometimes I accidentally type a word I'm saying.
Wanna go get food later?
Check out what I found in the closet!
Sorry, I really shouldn't.
Aww, what an adorable stuffed giraffe!
I can't afford to keep eating out this giraffe.
Extrapolating
As you can see, by late next month you'll have over four dozen husbands. Better get a bulk rate on wedding cake.
Where've you been all week?
Playing Half-Life 2!
... that came out in 2004.
I get games on a five-year lag. That way, I never have to buy a high-end system, but get the same steadily-advancing gaming experience as people who do -- and at a fraction of the price.
There are no downsides!
I can think of 
Guys!
The cake is a lie!
This was a triumph.
The cake is a lie!
<<Sigh>>
What's that?
Remember Y2K? This could be even 
Huh.
I never noticed that!
Haha, yeah.
So true.
Are you in there?
Help!
Okay, who linked you to TVTropes? What's 
Can't... stop...
It's like Rickrolling, but you're trapped all day.
Look at these people. Glassy-eyed automatons going about their daily lives, never stopping to look around and 
I've realized that I always secretly root for hurricanes. I watch the news hoping that they'll get really big and hit a city. I know my hopes don't actually affect it, but I feel bad.
Nah, that's just natural human attraction to spectacle. It's like watching the shuttle launch because you don't want to miss it if there's a disaster.
... I guess?
Or dressing as an intern to sneak into operating rooms, in case a patient dies and you can watch them harvest organs.
Wait, you 
 Or stealing detour signs to direct highway drivers downw backwoods roads strewn with caltrops. After the tires burst, you start shooting out their windows.
Then, when they flee the car in terror, you hunt them on horseback, like 
I realized a while back that we're having entirely different conversations.
I'm just outside town, so I should be there in fifteen minutes.
Actually, it's looking more like six days.
No, wait, thirty seconds.
We had a threesome last night.
How was it?
Awkward -- it was with a physicist.
Why's that awkward?
They can't solve the three-body problem.
Ah, yes.
A woodpecker!
Yup.
He hatched about this time last year.
... woodpecker?
It's your birthday!
Did you know?
Did... did nobody tell you?
Did you call that hot girl from the party yet?
I've been trying.
It's weird. I swear I got her the first time.  But now it says the number's wrong.
What did you say she did, again? 
Voice work. At Verizon, I think.
Why?
No reason.
We're sorry, your call could not be completed as dialed.
Damn.
Please check the number and try again.
Okay, any other concerns before you sign the lease?
I'm concerned that we're sitting here like I'm a responsible adult. I'm pretty sure I stopped growing up in my teens and have been faking ever since.
For god's sake, you're entrusting me with a 
Sir, does any of this impact your fulfillment of the lease terms?
I don't know what you just said because I was thinking about Batman.
To defuse this misunderstanding, I've invited both men to have a beer with me at the white house.
Actually, it seems we're out of beer.
Is there anything else?
WOOOOOOOOOOOO
Astronomers have confirmed that the asteroid is headed for Earth.
NASA has launched a heroic mission to land a rover on the asteroid, drill into it, and destroy it with nuclear bombs.
The robot has landed successfully and planted the nukes! We're saved!
Hooray!
We're heroes!
It took a lot of work, but this latest Linux patch enables support for machines with 4,096 CPUs, up from the old limit of 1,024.
Do you have support for smooth full-screen Flash video yet?
No, but who uses 
Titan's gravity is 14% of Earth's, and its atmosphere 50% denser.
So if you can generate 9% of your body weight in lift, you can fly on Titan.
With wings, a stage harness, a cable, and 91% of my bodyweight in in bricks, I want to test this.
It works!
Except you have two problems.
What?
You used hot glue on your wing joints and you have friends into Greek mythology.
Huh?
He has dreams.
I was in this weird cross between work and my old house...
Which he'll tell you all about.
He can speak French.
Or could in high school, anyway.
A little.
Man, I knew all these tenses and stuff once.
His blog has four posts, all apologies for not posting more.
Sorry, I've been trying to think of stuff to put here.
He is
The least interesting man in the world.
I don't always drink beer, but when I do, I stick to a glass or two. Any more and I feel sick.
How do you know there are an infinite number of primes?
I'll answer in haiku!
Top prime's divisors'
Product 's factors are...?
Q.E.D., bitches!
Sigh.
Does every porn site have to brant itself like this?
 Really?
Ok, wait, what?
I now have every Discworld book!
Eh. Building a Kindle collection seems pointless.
Yeah, I know the DRM means I'll probably lose them someday.
No, pointless in general.
Sure, you satisfy deep magpie-like urges by building neat collections, but you still die alone.
Sorry, sometimes I mistake your existential crises for technical insights.
Sometimes I mistake this for a universe that cares.
I've invented calculus!
I've invented calculus!
Really? Sounds a little bit...
 Derivative.
Dear various parents, grandparents, co-workers, and other "not computer people."
We don't magically know how to do everything in every program. When we help you' we're usually just doing this:
Start. 
Please print this flowchart out and tape it near your screen. Congratulations; you're now the local computer expert!
I'm psychic, you know.
There's no such thing.
Okay, think of a number from one to one hundred.
Okay.
43.
Holy shit!
I try not to let it affect my life too much.
Wait, I can't believe this.
Don't worry about it. Forget I said anything.
But--
Let's get to the movie.
I, uh... Ok, sure.
This trick may only work 1% of the time, but when it does, it's totally worth it.
Where are you going?
Convention.
What for?
Well, you know furries, right?
Sure...
We're furries whose animal identities have a thing for pretending to be humans.
I see.
How's the weather?
Great! I've been driving my car and having a job all day!
Did you meow?
Not once!
I've traveled here from the year 1983 to say this:
 Are there any bagels left?
While it's technically true, I wish she'd stop prefacing every sentence with that.
Female breast.
External female genitalia
HEY!
External male genitalia
Shit!
What the hell?  You can't do that in here.
Megan, get off the table!
Grab the tripod!
Erect Penis
We're calling the cops!
RUN!
TGI Friday's is a family establishment!
I've loved our online chats these past few months, Lisa.
Me too. I really like you, Rob.
It's just... now and then you mention products you like, and... I worry.
What? Honey...
Before this goes any further, I think we should go get tested. You know, together.
You don't trust me?
I just want to be sure.
21871138
Okay, mine says "library". Yours?
I... uh...
Oh god.
I'm more than a spambot! Our love was real!
Goodbye, Lisa.
We've acquired some new rights, but I'm not sure it's in the spirit to make it a blockbuster --
Do it anyway. Take $100 million, hire Michael Bay.
But --
 NEXT!
They said if I were captured I should take my own life.
But I'd just as soon take yours.
I'll be watching.
Both my parents were colorblind, so...
Hey, if we made more than two, we'd have a better-than-even chance of adorable red hair.
Ooh, and check this: green eyes!
Trivia: 30% of biologist first dates disintegrate into making Punnett squares.
Ender's up there saving the world, but down here it's fallig apart politically. What can we do?
I know -- we get on the nets and anonymously post political opinions.  People reading our articles will see our intelligence, recognize how clear and logical our arguments are, and insist that we be put in charge, so we can fix everything!
Brilliant!
Our love is like a turtle.
Humble and simple, enduring by virtue of perfect design.
Our love is like a brontosaurus.
Recognized as a mistaken combination long ago, lingering only out of misplaced affection for an imagined past.
Wow, Scribblenauts even lets you summon the LHC.
And it makes a black hole! This game rules.
I guess it's okay, for a DS kids game.
Oh, hi! It worked!
 We've searched dozens of these floor tiles for several common types of pheromone trails.
If there were intelligent life up there, we would have seen its messages by now.
Oh yeah? Well, fourscore and seven years ago your MOM brought forth on this continent a new nation, conceived in liberty, and dedicated to the proposition that all men are created equal!
After his 1860 loss to Lincoln, Stephen Douglas's famed debating skills entered a rapid decline.
The tornado's three miles west, moving northeast at 15 mph.
Go right; get ahead of it.
Okay, we're in range! Stop here!
AUGH!
Big one! Must be an F-3!
I'm not sure we're doing this right.
Help me mount it on the hood.
I hate whatever marketer first realized you could do this.
Hey, cute netbook.
Your laptop. I just --
No, why are you talking to me.
Who do you think you are? If I were even slightly interested, I'd have shown it.
Hey everyone, this dude's hitting on me.
Haha
Creepy
Let's get his picture for Facebook to warn others.
Remember: With great power comes great current squared times resistance.
Ohm never forgot his dying uncle's advice.
While you're doing the surgery, can you also implant this in my arm?
A USB port?
Just wire it up to some nerves.
... This won't let your brain control USB devices, you know.
Sure -- I just want the hardware.
The rest is software; I'm sure there will be a project to patch together support eventually.
Ah -- you're a Linux user, I see.
Yeah, how'd you know?
But they NEVER FOUND THE GHOST'S HEAD!
Lame story, Uncle Rob.
And you could do scarier?
Sure.
Try me.
9
Instead of driving all this way, we could've just taken our summer pictures and messed with the "hue" slider in Photoshop."
Hush.
<<click>>
Hang on, I can't see--did you put on a condom?
It's okay. I've got a wrist thing on.
A what? Let me see that.
This is an anti-static strap.
You mean it doesn't ...
No. Why would you even THINK that?
I guess I was mixed up.
Wait, so when I was replacing that RAM last week ...
Yeah, I THOUGHT that was weird.
Oh, but it explains why the geek squad fired me.
There's nowhere I'd rather be
than with you
here
right now.
But if you're worried about bombs, why are you letting me keep my laptop batteries? If I overvolted them and breached the cells, it would make a sizeable explosion.
Oh god.
It's okay, dear. In a moment he'll realize I have a good point and return my water.
Sarah! Come with me if you want to live! A robot assassin has been sent here to kill you!
I'm here to save you. I may not be as strong or fast as a machine, but I'll fight to keep you --
Even at "Bad Movie Night," avoid the Star Wars holiday special.
Hello? ... Oh, hey. Looking for Megan? She's gaming.
I know. You know what's delicious? Nachos.
When you layer the cheese so it gets on every chip ... then smother them in sour cream and salsa ...
Mm, that IS delicious. And I've got the ingredients, too!
You should make some!
I will!
Hurry.
<<beep>> <<beep>> <<whirrrr>>
My wifi signal!
Boom! Headshot.
Your facebook rock climbing pictures just got a lot less impressive.
Trick or treat!
Nice Doc Brown costume, but today's October 30th.
Great Scott, I must have overshot!
Thus, one all the dorm bedrooms are occupied by romantic pairs, additional roommates are forced into less restful "living room couch" orbitals.
When you take apart a Lego house and mix the pieces into the bin, where does the house go?
It's in the bin.
No, those are just pieces. They could become spaceships or trains. The house was an arrangement. The arrangement doesn't stay with the pieces and it doesn't go anywhere else. It's just gone.
The moment my brother died, I felt a searing pain in my heart.
I'm so sorry.
Was it instant, or was there a speed-of-light delay?
If it was instant, with the right arrangement of moving reference frames, we could use this to send signals back in time and violate causality! How many remaining siblings do you have?
And if I'm elected, I'll try to fix some of these problems.
Yeah, right!
The REAL problem is the corporate-run two party system. Until we fix THAT, we'll have no real change!
Billy, I'm running for class president. We don't even have political parties.
That's because the two-praty, uh ... estab ... uh.
Billy, did you learn about politics from the internet?
I thought that one reply was all I ever needed!
Well, it depends what you want. The iPhone wins on speed and polish, but the Droid has that gorgeous screen and physical keyboard.
What if I want something more than the pale facsimile of fulfillment brought by a parade of ever-fancier toys? To spend my life restlessly producing instead of sedately consuming?
Is there an app for THAT?
Yeah, on both.
Wait, no, looks lke it was rejected from the iPhone store.
Droid it is, then.
Help! Thief!
Hey, you!
What?
Do you realize just how crazy it is that we've BEEN TO THE MOON?
I just wrote the most beautiful code of my life.
They casually handed me an impossible problem. In 48 hours and 200 lines, I SOLVED it.
My god ... this will mean a half-dozen papers, a thesis or two, and a paragraph in every textbook on queueing theory!
You got the program to stop jamming up? Great. While you're fixing stuff, can you get Outlook to sync with our new phones?
Everyone hide! 99 ... 98 ... 97 ...
<<click>>
!!!
What--
Silent hammer. I've made a set of silent tools.
Why?
<<whoosh whoosh whoosh>>
Stealth carpentry. Breaking into a house at night and moving windows, adjusting walls, etc.
After a week or so of questioning his own sanity, the owner will stay up to watch the house at night. I'll make scratching noises in the walls, pipe in knockout gas, move him up to his bed, and never bother him again.
Nice prank, I guess, but what's the point?
Check out the owner's card, on the table.
Chair of the American Skeptics Society? Oh, god.
Yeah, this doesn't end well for him.
 I've always thought of the SkiFree monster as a metaphor for the inevitability of death.
SkiFree, huh? You know, you can press "F" to go faster than the monster and escape.
Ugh ...
What happened?
Where am I?
Help! Someone help me--
Huh. Looks like physics professors don't like working in frictionless vacuums after all.
They're such liars.
These amps go to 11.
Is that louder?
It's one louder.
Why not make 10 louder and make 10 the highest?
But 11 doesn't have any units. It's an arbitrary scale mapping otuputs--
Zzzz
For $2,000 I'll build you one that goes to 12.
I'm documenting my quest to meet with the CEO of Volvo.
Get lost.
Wait! I've come so far! Just let me see him!
All right, you've reached me. What is it you want to talk about?
Do you realize how much your company's name sounds like "vulva"?
Security?
Susie 
Come on, Facebook. I know I shouldn't.
Susie 
It's been so hard to stop. But she's falling for me, and I can't keep getting her hopes up like this.
Susie 
 Maybe if I just make it clear it's not going to be a thing ...
Yeah, we'll just have a talk.
Susie 
Okay, this feature is getting creepier and creepier.
The sun's fusion is failing!
 Does that make sense?
 Whatever.
If we don't send a ship to restart it, it could go out completely!
Call NASA!
 Assemble our hottest astronauts.
The earth bathed in eternal darkness? A night without a dawn? Not on my watch!
Saddle up.
Oh man, we made a baby.
Don't panic. Don't panic.
Baby!
Parenting can't be that hard. Let's just do what comes naturally.
Aw, crap.
Yes, science is an open process in which a good idea can come from anybody.
Yes, widely-believed theories are 
And yes, your philosophy degree equips you to ask interesting questions sometimes.
But you did not just overturn special relativity, a subject you learned about an hour ago, with your "racecar on a train" idea.
You just don't like that I'm turning a rational eye to your dogma. Hey, what's the email for the president of physics?
Look at that asshole in his SUV, thinking he's so badass while he guzzles gas driving around suburbia.
Oh no! Am I an asshole? I hope not.
Look at that smug asshole thinking he's better than us because he drives a hybrid.
...
<<RUMBLE>>
::RUMBLE:: ::VRRRRRR:: '... I don't know, officer.  It just scooped up an entire rack of scones and drove away!'}}Hey, will you be in town the day after Christmas?
Couldn't say - I'm Jewish.
But.. how does being Jewish keep you from knowing your plans?
I know my plans - I just don't know when Christmas is.
Really? Why not look it up?
 Well, I'm also a physicist.
So?
I believe that since I don't observe Christmas, it can't have a definite date.
Squeak!
Paint flecks from the killer's clothing match an antimatter factory in Belgrade!
Let's go!
<<...whirrrrrr...>>
<<...whirrrr...bing!>>
Okay, we've determined there's neither barium nor radium in this sample.
Probably.
Avatar? Yeah, I saw it last week with ...
... MY GIRLFRIEND.
You know, if this phase of your relationship lasts more than a week, I'm legally allowed to stab you both.
What phase?
So, did I mention I'm seeing someone?
Is it true you've been unable to find evidence that the g-spot exists?
My research is in solar cells. I think you have the wrong press conference.
But ... yes.
It's correct to within experimental error, and the units check out. It must be a fundamental law.
But what if they build a better Prius?
Then England will drift out to sea.
Wow, this is a much better design.
Let's build it.
Go!
Based on my analysis, I believe the government faked the plane crash and demolished the WTC north tower with explosives.
The south tower, in a simultaneous but unrelated plot, was brought down by actual terrorists.
Hey, what's up?
Shhhhh.
Hrm?
There's a microSD card on your table.
So?
I dunno, high storage densities freak me out. A whole aisle of library shelves on something smaller than a dime.
Libraries are unnerving enough--millions of ideas surrounding you, towering over you. These cards fill me with that same reverence, that same intimidation.
...that same faint arousal. Maybe I'll just touch it.
If you lose that card I'm _NOT_ helping you find it.
I know what you're thinking--"Did he fire six shots or only five?" In all this excitement, I--
Six. Definitely six.
Shit.
I'm such a loser--
Come quickly, young one!
Holy crap, a portal!
My kingdom needs you!
AAAAAA
You've saved our kingdom and found your self-confidence. Now it's time to return home. Goodbye, young hero!
Take this ring to remember us!
Well, I guess I spend the rest of my life pretending that didn't happen or knowing that everyone I love suspects I'm crazy.
This'll be a fun 70 years.
Argh, this is frustrating.
What?
This windows box has a virus and I can't get regedit to--
Haha, cleaning viruses? Man, what a blast from the past!
Check it out! Dude's cleaning win32 viruses! Remember that?
It's like we're back in 2003!
Hey, XP's still the most--
Did you get the virus from Kazaa?
Guess what I just read on Howard Dean's Friendster!?
Guys ...
89 days to go!
Two days until I go home!
?
Maybe I didn't do a good enough job.
Maybe if I do a good enough job, they'll let me come home.
I thought I analyzed that rock really well.
It's okay, I'll do the next one better.
Sandstorm. Power dying.
But a good rover would keep going. A good rover like they wanted.
Oh no.
I'm stuck.
Did I do a good job?
Do I get to come home?
Guys?
the Gathering
You hang up first.
No, *you* hang up first.
No, *you* hang up first.
No, *you* fucking hang up first!
You hang up first, or we're OVER!
Then I guess we're fucking OVER!
FINE!
...
...
*You* move on and find somebody else first.
Well, until the second trimester, the baby hasn't decided which opening it will exit through.
*What?*
We'll hope for one of the lower ones, so it won't be fighting gravity.
Okay, you try the saucylic acid first.
Wait, we should randomize the trials. Got a coin?
Okay, call it. Heads, she gets the--
YOU!
do I make graphs because they're cute and funny,
MY VEGETABLE GARDEN!
Wait. I should join this honor society to show colleges I'm honorable, and I'm honorable because I'm in an honor society?
Basically, yes.
Sounds like I could save time by joining the Tautology Club directly.
That's not a real club.
Then I'm starting it.
So how'd you learn about us?
From your Facebook group, "If 1,000,000 People Join This Group, It Will Have 1,000,000 People In It."
LISTEN UP! The first rule of Tautology Club is the first rule of Tautology Club.
If you assume contradictory axioms, you can derive anything. It's called the Principle of Explosion.
ANYTHING? Lemme try.
Hey, you're right! I started with PP and derived your mom's phone number!
That's not how that works.
Mrs. Lenhart?
Wait, this IS her number! How--
Hi, I'm a friend of--why, yes, I AM free tonight!
MOM!
No, box wine sounds lovely!
We took the hostages, secured the building, and cut the communication lines like you said.
Excellent.
But then this guy climbed up the ventilation ducts and walked across broken glass, killing anyone we sent to stop him.
And he rescued the hostages?
No, he ignored them. He just reconnected the cables we cut, muttering something about "uptime."
Shit, we're dealing with a sysadmin.
Sometimes I'm shocked to realize how many options I have.
Oh?
Like, at any moment in any conversation, I could just punch the person I was talking to, and all these potentially life-changing events would unfold.
It's only my mental rules that stop me from punching you, or stripping naked, or getting on a plane to Fiji. Sure, rules have reasons. But shouldn't you exercise that freedom at least once before you did?
Okay, I should have seen that coming.
But you 
So, is the new project going forward?
I could tell you, but then I'd have to kill you!
I mean, kill you even sooner.
All right, baby. Get ready for...
I really need to organize the game cupboard.
Wait, so where's the other sex die?
I... 
It did 6 damage, though.
I AM THAT I AM, THE *LORD* YOUR GOD AND THE GOD OF YOUR FATHERS, OF ABRAHAM, OF ISAAC, AND OF JACOB.
AND THIS IS MY COUNTERPART, R2-D2.
IS THERE AN EARTHQUAKE HAPPENING?!
No!
In a pinch, a lie detector can double as a seismograph. 
All the single ladies, all the single ladies...
Hey, Sauron. Why so glum? 
Gil-Galad saw through me and threw me out of Undon. Galadriel, too. I'll never rule 
All the single ladies, all the single ladies...
Eru created such beautiful creatures -- elves and men and dwarves -- and all I've got are these stupid Orcs.
'Cause if you liked it then you should have put a ring on it...
I mean, I--
'Cause if you liked it then you should have put a ring on it...
Yes!
What?
I got our downlink into a GeoIP database.
Why?
To mess with our advertisers. Check it out.
To the authors of 
Your book features pictures of hot, clothed guys cooking, doing laundry and vacuuming.
The idea seems to be that my deepest fantasies, like the rest of my life, likely revolve around housework.
So I wanted to write in to clarify:  in my porn,
People 
Hi, Rob.
Whoa, you're me!
You're about to have an idea for a time machine.
I am?
Hey, Rob. What's up?
Nothing.
Go go gadget two lesbians doing it.
Weird--this parasitic worm infects the brain, damaging the areas responsible for spatial reasoning in dreams. Signs of infection include dreams about not fitting in your car comfortably, driving from the backseat, or veering all over the road.
 Oh God.
Taking advantage of the fact that some specific dreams are weirdly common, but not everyone who has them realizes this.
I've got... Cheerios with a shot of vermouth.
At least it's better than the quail eggs in whipped cream from last time.
Are these Skittles 
C'mon guys, be patient. In a few hundred more meals, the genetic algorithm should catch up to existing recipes and start to optimize.
Hey, A. Square. How's Flatland?
Still flat. What's up?
I just spent an hour playing a demo of this 4D game called Miegakure.
So I apologize for giving you a hard time when you were slow to understand 3D space. I sympathize now.
It's okay.
Also, I apologize for drawing arms, legs, and eyes on you to make you look like Spongebob. That was out of line.
Yes, it was.
You know this metal rectangle full of little lights?
Yeah.
I spend most of my life pressing buttons to make the pattern of lights change however i want.
Sounds good.
But today, the pattern of lights is ALL WRONG!
Oh god! Try pressing more buttons!
IT'S NOT HELPING!
Whoa! Earthquake!
RT @RobM163  Huge earthquake here!
I was literally glued to my seat through the entire--
HAH!
YOU MEAN "FIGURATIVELY"!
Who are you?
Eighteen years I've watched you!
Waiting!
I told him and he literally EXPLODED!
Uh, unless he physically BURST, you mean "figuratively."
Hah.
I knew one day you'd slip, and I vowed I'd be there to see you fall. HOW DOES IT FEEL?
You are literally the craziest person I've ever met.
You did it again!
No, I didn't.
WOOOOOOO
 And for more on the summit, we turn to trade expert Dr. Steven Berlee. Steven?
I'm not actually a doctor or a trade expert. I'm just a programmer who lies to get on news shows.
 What? Why?
To share a message with newscasters.
Which is?
Every time you say "backslash" as part of a web address on air, I die a little.
Navigating Google Maps on the iPad is fun. It feels so futuristic.
Swoosh! Zoom!
There are, right now, monkeys controlling robotic arms via neural implants.
A huge and alien future is barreling toward us. And I can't WAIT.
But no, your iPad is cool, too.
Stop spoiling my future with your slightly more distant one.
?? <<click click>>
<<lick? nom nom>>
AUGH!
Day 44: Still stranded, with nothing but flat empty water as far as the eye can see.
Check out my new HDTV--a beautiful, high-def 1080p.
Wow, that's over TWICE the horizontal resolution of my cell phone.
In fact, it almost beats the LCD monitor I got in 2004.
The eagle has left the nest.
*KHHHKHT* Roger that. Alert the agents.  *KHKKHHKT*
Will you stop that?
Following field biologists around and interpreting everything they say as code phrases.
He was exposed to toxin X-7--now he's a bloodthirsty monster!
Has he been in isolation?
Braaains!
Yes, but I can't hold this door for long!
Hang on, I've got a gun in my truck.
<<wham>>
So, I never got your name. I'm Ryan.
Laura.
I've dynamited a trench through the kitchen to divert flow!
More hoses! We need to cool and solidify the surface layer!
Where are the damn helicopters?
Frankly, you deserve this. You KNEW I wanted a sans-serif font, and you IGNOERD me.
So really, this is YOUR fault.
Oh God, how old is this yogurt in your fridge?
What's hte expiration date?
May 12th, but there's no year.
Okay, I'll throw it out.
No, it might still be good!
I'm making the incision above the left - 
Augh!
The key to making a successful blog is building a relationship with your readers.
I thought it was "make your updates good so people will want to read them."
We'll discuss content generation in part three.
Awesome! I _LOVE_ content.
But when she traced the killer's IP address... It was in the 192.168
GASP!
Did you get my essay?
Yeah, it was good! But it was a .doc; You should really use a more open--
Give it a 
I just want people to care about the infrastructures we're building and who--
No, you just want to feel smugly superior. You have no sense of perspective and are probably autistic.
Oh my God! We handed control of our social world to Facebook and they're 
Do you see this?
How did the date go?
I wanted to be prepared, so I looked up a sex walkthrough video.
...and?
It turns out it was a speed run.
Ouch.
Okay, the head is starting to crown.
Push!
Wait, that's... that's a tube.
It looks like the barrel of a...
Nobody move--this is a stick-up!
Oh, God! Stop pushing, Megan!
Can you... pull?
Dr. Scientist! The "Top Kill" has failed! What's the worse-case scenario for the gulf?
The worst-case scenario is what's happening now.
Yes, but is there any way it could get worse?
Sure, but there are real disasters happening now, and you're substituting speculation and voyeurism for the investigative journalism we--
Screw this! Let's ask Michael Bay.
The worst case? A hurricane tracks into the gulf, whipping the surface of the spill into a frothy mix of oil and air.
As the storm surges through the bayous, sparking power lines ignite the fuel
Plowing northward, the fire hurricane destroys the Old River Control Structure in Concordia, rerouting the Mississippi westward and sweeping Morgan City and the heart of cajun country out to sea.
James Carville emerges from the conflagration riding a burning alligator...
Will this affect the midterm elections?
This book is full of heresy!
Let's hold a book burning!
I only have one copy.
I guess we could buy more.
I'll look online.
What's this?
Oh! That's daddy's 
Wow! They look just like the ladies who get double-penetrated in the popup ads! But with clothes on! Gosh!
Whoa, a snake!
Cool!
I'm afraid of snakes.
I'm afraid of saying "Everything's complicated right now, but maybe next year" until there are no more years left.
Do you--
I want to be a storm chaser.
did JFK 
This is an interdisciplinary program in which Physics students try to hit Psychology students with pedulums. 
Promising!
AAAAAAA!
A leading politician today charged that the media, rather than informing people, now merely report on public ignorance. Do our viewers agree? Let's hear from some voices on the street...
I don't mean to toot my own horn, but I 
Really? I don't mean to toot my own horn, but
worth carrying around your entire life for those few perfect moments.
The raptor fences are down. They're loose.
I'll get a broom and dustpan.
Jurassic Park got a lot less scary when the researchers discovered they could ativate the gene for extreme dwarfism.
Behold, Khazad-Dum; the 
But the dwarves delved too greedily. 
...and awoke a terror of shadow and flame?
No. They couldn't get out.
 medical emergency, 2) dancing, 3) food too expensive...)
A) snakebite, B) lightning strike, C) fall from chair...)
A)a) Corn Snake? b) Garter Snake? c) Copperhead?)
I'm here to pick you up. You're not dressed?
By LDsub50, the Inland Taipan has the deadliest venom of ANY snake! 
I really need to stop using depth-first searches.
While I'm up, does anyone want a sandwich?
Is "sandwich" a metaphor?
No, I'm bad at metaphors. But I could try a simile.
I guess that's 
Well, "a simile is like a metaphor" is a simile.
Is that simile itself a metaphor for something?
Maybe it's a metaphor for analogy.
Similes 
Analogies are like sandwiches in that I'm making one now.
See, I've got a really good system: if I want to send a YouTube video to someone, I go to File -> Save, then import the saved page into Word. Then I go to "Share This Document" and under "recipient" I put the email of this video extraction service...
I'll often encourage relatives to try to solve computer problems themselves by trial and error. However, I've learned an important lesson: if they say they've solved their problem, 
One! Ah ah ah... Two! Ah ah ah... ...Many! ah ah ah...
Primitive cultures develop Sesame Street.
Okay, this time I've diluted the semen 30x.
We'll be 
Did you know that if you stare at the sun just as it sets, you can see a green flash? 
Sometimes, when we disagree, I feel frustrated. But I never forget how lucky I am to have you in my family. Always remember how special you are.
1981: An audio recorder on the set catches Fred Rogers fighting with his wife.
Check it out -- old 
And $299 would get you a Palm Pilot 100- -- 16MHz, 128Kb storage, and a memo pad, calendar, and state-of-the-art address book that can store over 100 names!
Oooh!
And $110 would get you a bulky TI graphing calculator with around 10MHz CPU, 24Kb RAM, and a 96x64-pixel B
Times sure have... ...have... uh.
Okay, what the hell, T.I.?
Maybe they cost so much now because there's only one engineer left who remembers how to make displays 
I'm so lucky to have you.
I love you most out of all the girls in all the world
who love me back.
Forsooth, do you grok my jive, me hearties?
Ten-four!
Oh god!
Someone call 911!
Mom!
Personally, I find atheists just as annoying as fundamentalist Christians.
Well, the important thing is that you've found a way to feel superior to both.
Look, I'm doing my best, but the fact is your savannah ancestors just didn't prepare you for doing abstract math.
See, that's just the kind of bullshit sexism that discredits evo-psych. Your "evolutionary histories" always seem tuned to produce 1950's gender roles.
Evolutionary? What? I meant Savannah, Georgia.
... Hey! Let's leave my mom out of this.
The sleep deprivation madness worsens.
Things seem unreal. Am I even awake? Maybe I'm dreaming.
I'm pretty sure I'm hallucinating this tree.
But what if I'm hallucinating that I'm hallucinating, and I'm actually totally sane?
Listen.
I wouldn't worry about that.
Pizza delivery! Did someone order a hot sausag--
Mon dieu! Monsieur is home early--
Wait, who are you?
Wait, this is the Jones', right? Their daughter was supposed to be having a party!
No, I thought Mr. Jones was coming home early.
But I thought--
Howdy, Mrs. Jones. I hear you need some plumbi--
Who are you?
Sorry, big mixup.
Hey, check out out--the Joneses have Agricola!
I love that game!
What in the name of ...
Dammit, I wanted that grain.
Hush, you have starting player.
Oh god.
So far from hooome but I can't sto-HONK>>
AUGH! WHAT?
Rob! Rob!
You look terrified! What's wrong?
We've made a huge mistake!
Remember last week when we dug up all those Indian bones and made puppets out of them?
Sure...
It turns out they were buried over an 
Looking forward to seeing your new place! What's the address? -- Mm hmm. Yes, I'm taking 495. But I have a GPS, so I really just need the street address.
...then south on 18, okay, but I have a GPS, so if you just want to skip to the street address, I can...
Thanks, I'm glad to know Highland Road comes a mile after the big intersection, but I keep saying I 
...I appreciate that you want to help, but I'm 
Yo, I'm M.C. Aphasia and I'm here to say that, I... uh... um... hi?
So I... oh? Does she? Well, when 
Yo, I'm M.C. Quine and I'm here to say, "Yo, I'm M.C. Quine and I'm here to say!"
Ever notice how men go to the restroom alone, while women go in hordes ten thousand strong, clad all in sable armor and bristling with swords and spears?
Those are orcs.
Oh.
Wake up! --- Wake up!
What is it?
We're alive during the time when they're first discovering other planetary systems! They're finding them as fast as they can build new instruments to look for them!
And if one of Earth's cultures advances its space program enough to start enriching uranium on asteroids, we'll lose the main barrier to restarting Project Orion and building nuke-riding City-ships!
The only known technology capable of fast interstellar travel could be operational within just a few generations, and we're discovering all these destinations to pick from! -- Come 
Can I hit "snooze"?
Okay, but 
Okay, people. The orbiter is passing south of Iceland. The next scheduled check-in will be at 32.0N 35.5E, over the Palestinian territories.
You mean over the State of Palestine?
You mean over 
I've rescheduled the check-in for 35.2N 96.6W, over Oklahoma.
You mean occupied North Texas?
Dammit, Frank.
Hey!
Hyah!
My rash seems to have shrunk by about 20% today.
OH GOD SPIDERS
???
Hey, while you're out, can you pick up some spray cleaner that works on cat vomit?
Can do! -- Bye!
...Wait!
Yes?
Uh. ...You are in my heart always.
...?
Password entropy is rarely relevant. The real modern danger is password reuse. 
How so? 
Set up a web service to do something simple, like image hosting or tweet syndication, so a few million people set up free accounts.
Bam, you've got a few million emails, default usernames, and passwords.
Tons of people use one password, strong or not, for most accounts.
You've now got a few hundred thousand real identities on a few dozen services, and nobody suspects a thing.
And then what?
Well, that's where I got suck.
You DID this?
Why did you 
I could probably net a lot of money, one way or another, if I did things carefully. But research shows more money doesn't make people happier, once they make enough to avoid day-to-day financial stress.
I could mess with people endlessly, but I do that already. I could get a political or religious idea out to most of the world, but since March of 1997 I don't really believe in anything.
So, here I sit, a puppetmaster who wants nothing from his puppets. -- It's the same problem Google has.
Oh?
Okay, everyone, we control the world's information. Now it's time to turn evil. What's the plan?
Make boatloads of money?
We already do!
Set up a companywide CoD4: Modern Warfare tournament each week?
Ooh, dibs on the lobby TV!
Okay, we 
You're trying to predict the behavior of <complicated system>? Just model it as a <simple object>, and then add some secondary terms to account for <complications I just thought of>. -- Easy, right? -- So, why does <your field> need a whole journal, anyway?
Nine silvers for a ham? That's too much!
Too much? There's a monk out back 
Whoa! We should get inside!
It's okay! Lightning only kills about 45 Americans a year, so the chances of dying are only one in 7,000,000.  Let's go on!
It just blows my mind. She seemed so genuine. I had no idea she was such a serial liar.
I just wish I had our six months back.
Her exes say the same thing happened to them.
Maybe what we need is a terrible-ex tracking and notification service.
But after all the problems with sex offender registries, who would agree to run it?
Maybe one of the state governments more willing to experiment could try it out...
Excuse me, ma'am.
Yes?
This man is known to the state of California to be a total douchebag.
subprocess pre-removal script returned error exit 163: OH_GOD_THEYRE_INSIDE_MY_CLOTHES}}"fucking ____"
"____ as shit"
ln
Yes, the Cabernet is piquant as 
Whoa, these commodities are fucking 
I thought maybe later we should go see a movie.
I just woke up 
From the most 
Which was?
All the girls who read and follow 
Seriously?  This thing runs 
I bet they actually hired someone to spend six months porting this JVM so they could write their 20 lines of code in a familiar setting.
Well, you know what they say -- when all you have is a pair of bolt cutters and a bottle of vodka, everything looks like the lock on the door of Wolf Blitzer's boathouse.
I'm glad 
So, kids, the air above the wing travels a longer distance, so it has to go faster to keep up.  Faster air exerts less pressure, so the wing is lifted upward.
But then why can planes fly upside down?
Wow, good question!  Maybe this picture is simplified -- or wrong!  We should learn more.
It's... complicated.
And we need to move on.
Santa Claus is your parents.
So what did you-
I carved a pumpkin!
...
Taking on teen vandals, I see.
Heavens, No. My pumpkin simply has chest pains. In fact, I'll leave a note 
My pumpkin's name is Harold. He just realized that all the time he used to spend daydreaming, he now spends worrying. He'll try to distract himself later with holiday traditions, but it won't work.
I carved and carved, and the next thing I knew I had 
I 
Take me down to the paradise city where the grass is green and the girls are pretty.
Take me down to the paradise village where the grass is green and the cute girls pillage.
Take me down to the fire-charred counties where the law's restored by Canadian mounties.
Take me down to Orwellian regions where they retrain girls using cortical lesions
Take me down to the paradise borough where the grass is labeled 'cause the girls are thorough. Ohh, won't you please take me hooome...
... restart my computer? I know you have a script to follow, but the uplink light on the modem is going off every few hours. The problem is between your office and the modem.
My computer has nothing to do with ... okay, whatever, I "restarted my computer."
It's still down, and even if it comes back, it's going to die again in a few hours, because your--
I don't HAVE a start menu. This is a Haiku install, but that's not import--
Haiku? It's an experimental OS that I ... oh, never mind.
I'm sorry, but this won't get fixed until I talk to an engineer. Can you look around for someone wearing cargo pants, maybe a subway map on their wall?
There's a chick two phones over with a stuffed penguin doll and a poster of some bearded dudes with swords.
Perfect. Can you put her on?
Sure.
Hey, so sorry to bother you, but my connection--
Yeah, I see it. Lingering problems from a server move.
Should be fixed now.
Thank you SO MUCH.
No problem. Hey, in the future, if you're on any tech support call, you can say the code word "shibboleet" at any point and you'll be automatically transferred to someone who knows a minimum of two programming languages.
Seriously?
Yup. It's a backdoor put in by the geeks who built these phone support systems back in the 1990's.
Don't tell anyone.
Oh my god, this is the greatest--
Wha--
... DAMMIT.
Seriously? I like that song too! I bet no two people in the history of the world have ever been so connected!
I'm not sure why we romanticize "young love".
We have a decision. If we've done our math right, this test will unleash heaven's fire and make us as gods.
But it's possible we made a mistake, and the heat will ignite the atmosphere, destroying the planet in a cleansing conflagration.
Wow. Um. Question: Just to double-check - although I'm 99% sure -
Is it "Soh cah toa" or "coh sah toa"?
Oh, for the love of... can someone redo Steve's work?
I don't want to do the test anymore.
Spammers are breaking traditional captchas with AI, so I've built a new system. It asks users to rate a slate of comments as "Constructive" or "Not constructive".
Then it has them reply with comments of their own, which are later rated by other users.
But what will you do when spammers train their bots to make automated constructive and helpful comments?
Mission. Fucking. Accomplished.
The starlight falls on our eyes after a journey across trillions of miles - dying here at last, so far from home, all so we can see some pretty dots.
EEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE... Anything break?
No, but the water in the glass turned to wine.
Weird.
No, wait. This is blood.
Okay, Physics, quit fucking with us.
You stop looking for the higgs boson and we'll talk.
You're going down the memory hole now, asshole.
Hey! You forgot to carry the two.
Looks like the fed just lowered the interest rate.
Guess you should've scrolled all the way to the bottom before clicking "agree".
Bangarang, motherfucker.
We need to talk.
Okay, but first hold the end of this diode.
You hurt my feelings yesterday.
You embarassedme with my family last weekend.
I'm sorry.
Wheeeeeeeee
Wow. I can't find fault with your proof.
You've show the inconsistency -- and thus the invalidity -- of basic logic itself.
Excellent, on to step two.
Hey, everyone--
As I mentioned on the blag, I'm going through a rough time right now. I'm dealing with a serious family illness and it's become pretty overwhelming.
We're still getting a handle on everything, and I appreciate your patience while we figure it all out.
Thank you to everyone who wrote in with kind wishes and words of support. They've been passed on and meant a lot.
I like drawing, and might find time for it in the coming weeks, but I'm not going to push myself to stick to a schedule.
However, between my stacks of notebooks, scanner, and supportive sysadmin, I should at least have something interesting to share with yyou in this space each M
<3
Jupiter will make its closest approach to Earth in decades.
In fact, here it comes now!
Hey, guys.
Anyone need a gravitational slingshot?
No, I'm good.
Aight.
...Now I don't blame him 'cause he ran and hid, -- but the meanest thing that he ever did -- was before he left, he went and named me "Trig."
Oh God, a little girl is trapped down this well!
It's okay, we got you that pony you always wanted!
Get... in... there... -- Ugh!
I like to get back to nature by coming out here to the server room. -- The warmth, the whirr of the drives, the drone of the fans, the howl of the wolves...
Wolves?
Yeah, we started a reintroduction program.
Yo momma's so masculine that she... oh, wait, that's your dad. -- Is your mom the lady over by the door? Aww, she looks nice!
Bach, activate the magic flute and teleport us home! Wagner's right behind me on his Ring Cycle!
Want some breakfast?
Thanks for the great night.
Give Mommy a hug!
Wait, so 
I 
You look different.
You have this... _glow_ about you.
Cogito ergo cogito.
Playing it safe, huh?
Trick or treat!
Um hi.  Why are you just standing there?
Candy?
Oh God, my bag of candy.
It's filling with blood.
We should go.
Bail out! Bail out! Bail out!
AAAAAAAAAAAAA I'm making a sandwich! AAAAAAAAAA!
Oh God.  My eyes won't focus right! And your robe looks... really dirty!
Ladies and gentlemen of the jury.
It seems we happen to be all ladies, actually.
... in that case, this defense is going to appear _extremely_ ill-advised.
Your sad devotion to that ancient religion hasn't hleped you conjur up the stolen data tapes, or given you --
What are you --
Putting a _hex_ on your family.
C'mon, have some milk. Right here.
I'm 
Hee hee hee... *giggle*
Eisenhower orders the military to integrate Little Rock High School.
And the wolf went to see the 38th little pig, who had built his house out of strontium.
And the wolf was all, "Ok, what is 
Fastest gun in the west!
Time passes differenly in Narnia, so by putting the CPU and storage for my machine there, I was able to run through the Folding@Home and Seti@Home databases in about an hour.
There are _so_ many problems with that.
One of these days, Alice... Wham, zoom, sploosh, fwoom, splash, gurlle, wheeeee, fwoosh, aren't waterslides fun?!
There she is. The most beautiful girl you've ever seen.
Every day you take this route to class, she's sitting on that bench, reading.
You'd introduce yourself, but you wouldn't know what to say. Besides, she's way out of your league.
What chance could an average guy like you have with such a radiant -
Hey.
E-Excuse me?
I said hey.  You come by here a lot.
Oh, uh, yeah.  On the way to class.
Wanna skip class and go get a coffee?
Sure, I'd - I'd like that a lot.
Great, let's ditch these losers.
Hey!
Man, I gotta tell you, I'm SICK of being that guy's internal monologue! So whiny!
Seriously! I swear, he and Little Miss Daddy Issues over there were _made_ for each other.
I've never been so happy.  I --
Hold on -- that guy used to dump my notebooks in high school.  Give me a moment.  Try to keep the moon steady.
I've never been so happy.
Hi, Mr. Munroe? I have a great idea! Let me draw some strips for you!
 Fat chance, kid.
Sudo let me draw some strips for you.
I find you more attractive than usual.
You do? Is it my new haircut?
Actually, I think it's all the weight you've been putting on.  Your gravitational pull is pretty severe.
Just sayin!
I can't find my car keys.
You probably know too much about their momentum.
All those in favor of the bill say "aye."
Aye.
Aye.
 -1.
But enough of my theories about Thanksgiving.  The 
Unobservable to anything that is itself conscious in much the same way the mail-man won't deliver your mail if you are watching the mail-box
Which brings us to my theory about ghosts --
Wait did you just say Thanksgiving was invented by the 
BASILISKS: Real, deadly, under your bed.
Magnets only leap at each other when they're teenagers. Later, they lose interest.
Snow is Jesus' dandruff. His scalp gets dry when it's cold.
Sleep: Now you're vulnerable to the boogie man!
Freezing water: Expands to frighten predators.
Anti-matter: Matter that is more than 50% ants.
DNA only has four letters because the alphabet was smaller back then.
Told you so.
Molecules? In my day, we only had atoms!
If this helium makes your voice go higher, it's because you're ten seconds from exploding.
Measure your middle finger. If it's longer than the others, you're an alien halfbreed.
Has anyone seen my rabbit brain? It looks like a cherry, and I dropped it in a Jello cup.
Make your bed or monsters will know a kid lives there.
The "P" is for "phoenix".
Ground beef: Beef we found on the ground.
Told you.
EYES CREAM
How did you think it was spelled?
Now with more of the goo in your eyes. Same as every other creamery.
Genghis Khan: victory through dragons.
The Crimean War: The first war against crime.
The Renaissance
Long story short, the wizards were in control.
Star Wars is a documentary. No, seriously.
Kids, this man is a veteran.
Naked wrestling: perfectly normal. NEVER DO IT.
Alcohol is poison. I drink to save you from it.
You're welcome.
Mommies get big tummies before babies come because the stork likes chubby girls.
Grandma's not dead. She just returned to saturn. For REVENGE.
That's right. Dinosaurs were made entirely of BONES.
If you think about it, it makes sense.
You gotta squint juuust right.
Magic eye trick that doesn't actually work.
Men & Boys
Women & Girls
Korgmen & Spangs
Dude! I had this idea like five years ago, and some company just got rich doing it! -- I want my cut.
That's not how it works.
Sure it is. I'm applying for my share now.
Wait, what?
I'm sick and I'm scared.
Well, remember - having a good attitude is the most important thing. Think positively and you'll get better.
So if I'm sad or afraid or feel like crap sometimes, then...
...then if you don't recover, it will be 
Well that makes me feel even worse.
See? You're doing this to yourself.
No!
Stop it!
Argh!
Okay, you know what? Screw this. My attitude isn't my problem. -- My 
Wait, that ended up sounding optimistic.
I guess you suck at pessimism.
Maybe I'll be better at it tomorrow.
Our arsenic-based DNA discovery is cool, but these reporters are expecting life on Titan! Our press conference will be such a letdown!
Okay, we need to make it more exciting for them. How do you make an event entertaining? 
Dunno, I suck at parties. Music, I guess?
WikiHow says you can "serve cocktails and hors d'oerves that fit the theme of your event."
Easy enough!
Did my genetic tests come back?
Yeah. Sit down.
Is it bad news? What are my risk factors?
We can't be sure about this, but we've analyzed genes on several of your chromosomes and it's ard to avoid the conclusion:
At some point, your parents had sex.
Oh God!
Stay calm! It's possible it was just once!
I... I need to be alone.
Sigh.  Just a few clouds.
Whoa! Huge storm out of nowhere!
It's 
Hey! What's it...
I think we should give it another shot.
We should break up, and I can prove it.
Huh.
Maybe you're right.
I knew data would convince you.
No, I just think I can do better than someone who doesn't label her axes.
We are Anonymous. We are legion We are no one and everyone.
... Dammit, Julian.
It's a Christmas tree with a heap of presents underneath!
... We're not inviting you home next year.
So, has this sickness opened you up to looking for answers beyond science?
... no, not really.
We've groped for comfort before the slings and arrows of fortune for millenia, and I begrudge nobody their sources of solace.  
Because they 
$14.08
   $80.02
In 1987 you quietly took something from the house of a dying woman. You thought nobody knew -- you were wrong.
  $14.08
     $80.02
  -$80.02
$0.00
Hey -- who does sudo report these "incidents" 
You know, I've never checked.
Mission Control, come in.  This is Ba3 on the capsule calling Ke5 on the home board.  We're on track and approaching the Coast of Catan.  Our ETA is --
Control, this is Nc3. Bishop put all our food in the center so I can't get it. I demand --
Control, knight will get his food back when he stops hopping around bragging about how comfy the black squares are.  I swear to God, I'm 
Don't touch me.
Do we have an RCA-to-3.5mm female-female plug? I'm getting some speakers for the new xBox, since the monitor doesn't have any.
Are they crappy laptop speakers?
Does it matter? I just want to hear if I'm getting shot at, not saor eery detail of a beautiful musical soundscape.
You've never 
Whatever.  I'm just going to get these $20 speakers.  Five watts will be plenty.  
Five watts for a living room sound system?  Is that a joke?
No, this is a joke: How many audiophiles does it take to change a lightbulb?
How many?
I'll tell you later - you wouldn't appreciate the punchline over this 12kbps cell phone codec.
What's that on your arm?
The mark of a secret society.
If it's secret, why tell me --
Because I know nothing.  I can't betray them because I don't know who they 
Six years later I found a piece of paper in the street with an address on it.  The next day I found a can of kerosene in my garage that I'm sure I never bought.
I didn't know whose house it was.  I just knew that I'd been given my orders.  And I carried them out.
I don't know who or what we're fighting.  
Maybe we're the bad guys.  
It doesn't matter to me.
It's enough to know that there are forces working beneath the chaos of life, and I'm a 
That whatever this "pen fifteen" club is,  
I'm 
Okay, middle school students, it's the first Tuesday in February.
This means that by law and custom, we must spend the morning reading through the Wikipedia article 
The guests at every party you'll ever attend thank us in advance.
Will you 
Will you 
Real-time war reenactment
Dear Ke$ha,
It's hard to describe the pain of a deeply infected dental nerve.
So, some friendly advice: When you wake up in the morning, before you brush your teeth with a bottle of Jack,
Brush them with actual toothpaste.
I know things are tough right now.  When I was going through some difficult times as a kid, I would go up on the roof and look through my telescope.
One day I found a tiny star in Ara that seemed friendly.
There were millions like it, but I decided that this one was mine.
When things got bad, I'd go find that star, and think of my favorite Tolkien quote.  It's from Sam's time in Mordor.
There was light and high beauty forever beyond its reach."
That's comforting!
It was rather undercut in 1987, when the light from my star's explosion reached Earth.  The debris forms the Stingray Nebula.
There's probably a lesson there.
"Never trust an unstable asymptotic giant branch star.  Stick with main sequences and dwarfs."
I'll, uh, keep that in mind.
Your movie was a ripoff.
It wasn't 3D at all!
Was too.
It's just that the third dimension is tightly rolled up and too small to observe at normal energies.
Okay, anyone who's feeling like they can't handle the physics here should probably just leave now.
Because I'm multiplying the wavefunction by its complex conjugate.
That's right.
Shit just got 
Did you know that because of centrifugal* force and the shape of the Earth, "gravity" can vary by nearly half a percent between major cities?
That's not a lot, but it could affect, say, pole vaulting. In a 5m jump, it could make a difference of 2cm.
Huh, interesting.
I'm going to write an article reevaluating vaulting records to take this into account.
Good job. There's an angry mob of athletes outside.
That record was mine!
How dare you cast doubt on our honor?
Have you no respect?!
Make him pay!
Hey, the math doesn't lie. Suck it, jocks.
Dude, don't provoke them.
Whatever. The building's locked. Let 'em vent for a--
GET HIM!
Crap!
How did the pole vaulters get up to our balcony?
...
That might be the stupidest question I've ever heard.
Right.
I was running a factor analysis on this huge database, and check out what it found:
Huh? This chart makes no sense. What--
"Queueing"
FUCK ME NOW.
People like doing stuff, so why not build a website that offers that?
Offers what? What would I do there?
Anything!  The only limit is yourself!
Hey, we need more--
Don't--he's wired in.
THE INFINITE IS POSSIBLE.
Or baked. It's hard to tell.
It's time to monetize. We could make millions!
No way. A million dollars isn't cool. You know what's cool?
A billio--
CIRCLES.
Heya tip: Drop the dot.  Just "Zombocom". It's cleaner.
Robot ninja! Pirate doctor laser monkey! Narwhal zombie badger hobo bacon kitty captain penguin raptor jesus!
We'd been seeing this brain damage for years, but only recently did our linguists identify the pattern behind it.
The patients fixate on animals and types of people whose names are trochees .
Yeah! Mighty teenage morphin' ninja power mutant turtle rangers!
Is there a cure?
We're about to try a radical trocheeotomy.
Rip out her vocal chords? I'm in favor.
No, we're modifying her vocabulary* to erase the words she's fixated on.
Either the gap will be filled by normal words, or she'll just generate a new set of trochees.
Here goes.
... GzZhRmPh ...
Jetpack ferret pizza lawyer! Dentist hamster wombat plumber turkey jester hindu cowboy hooker bobcat scrapple!
Sigh.
Time for plan B.
Someone get a brick.
In the words of Archimedes,
Give me a long enough lever and a place to rest it,
Or I will kill one hostage every hour.
The fact that I have breasts doesn't mean you could milk me now. I'd have to be lactating.
Oh my god. She's psychic!
Check it out - a pocket microscope!
Ooh! Let's look at stuff!
The tip of this pencil is neat!
This quarter is really scratched.
Let's look at the skin under our fingernails!
oh god oh god
Hey! Know how you've been bugging me to play Minecraft for the past year? I'm game.
But you said you didn't want to "get hooked and spend days on end moving virtual cubes around while sitting motionless." What changed?
I'm having my wisdom teeth out, and I'll be useless and doped up on painkillers for the next few days, so that actually sounds like the perfect distraction.
Oh. I'll set you up on our server!
Hey -- starting to feel better? Enjoying the game? Let's see what you've... What the hell? Where IS everything?
... You made the entire continent perfectly flat?
And sorted it into layers.
...
I feel good about things. This is a good game.
... What exactly is in the painkillers they gave you?
I can't read the label because I'm a hologram.
I shouldn't be looking at Reddit. Why can't I stop?
Refreshing CNN again. Do news stories so affect my life that I benefit from checking them more than once a day?
I should at least check Faceb... no.  Screw it.  I can't do my job when I'm distracting myself every five minutes like this.
His computer's off.  Luke - You've switched off your targeting computer. What's wrong?
Nothing. I'm all right.
How can I pick a major? I'm interested in everything! Can't I major in "the universe"?
Okay. First, I'll need papers on every European trade summit that did not result in an agreement. Then, spend a year memorizing every microprocessor instruction set ever used in a production chip.
We all do, sweetie.
It's 2011. I want my flying car.
Dude.
You're complaining to me using a phone on which you buy and read books,
and which you were using to play a 3D shooter until I interrupted you with what would be a video call if I were wearing a shirt.
Can't I have a flying car, too?
You'd crash it while texting and playing Angry Birds.
Commander! Come quick!
It's the nanobots--they've STOPPED!
They devoured 40% of the Earth, and then just ... quit! They're just sitting there!
Why?!
It's a mystery. ... unless ... What's the volume of each nanobot?
A few cubic microns. Why?
I think the year 1998 just bought us some time.
What do you mean, "Run out of addresses?"
Look, we should've migrated away from IPv6 AGES ago ...
As you can see, herpetology is a silly field; reptiles are actually more closely related to birds and mammals than to amphibians.It should really be broken up, with lizards folded into ornithology.
As you can see, ornithologists are actually assholes.
Hi! I'm a server! Who are you?
I'm a browser. I'd like to see this article.
Yeah.
Cooool! Hey, I've got this new mobile version of my site! Check it out! Isn't it pretty?
Sure, but this is just your mobile site's main page. Where's the article I wanted?
What article?
The one I-
Who are you?
I-
Hi! I'm a server!
I'm going to buy this $10 game I want, and I'm donating $10 for malaria eradication.
If you actually cared, you'd skip the game and donate all $20.
What's more important? Games, or mosquito nets and medicine for kids?
I think I'm going to buy these two $10 games I want.
Cool; which ones?
Are there eigenvectors in Cinderella?
... no?
The prince didn't use them to match the shoe to its owner?
What are you TALKING about?
Dammit.
But while the ant gathered food ...
... zzzz ...
... the grasshopper contracted to a point on a manifold that was NOT a 3-sphere ...
You didn't notice the drastic subject changes?
Well, sometimes her versions were better. We loved Inductive White and the  Dwarfs.
I guess the LIM x->inf  little pigs did get a bit weird toward the end ...
He once built a treehouse.
She has 110 unread emails that she was hoping to get to tonight.
He was the only one who took care of the plants back at base.
Is this a three wolf moon shirt?
Dude, 2009 called, and they--
OH MY GOD!
DID YOU WARN THEM?
ABOUT HAITI AND JAPAN?
What? No, I--
You ASSHOLE!
Hello? 911? I'm trapped!
It's dark and I can't see anything except these two distorted splotches of light!
Help!
Splotches of light? Your ... eyeballs?
I think that's what they are! There's meat everywhere!
... so you're a brain.
Yes!
Yeah, we all are. You're not trapped. Use your body to walk around and experience reality.
But everything's just signals in my sensory cortices! How can I be sure they correspond to an external world?!
I'm sorry, but we can't send a search-and-rescue team into Plato's cave.
The problem with scientists is that you take the wonder and beauty out of everything by trying to analyze it.
Dude!
My plasmoidal slime molds have heightened pigment production! Check out that yellow color! That actually makes them zinc-resistatn. Amazing, huh?
It looks like dog barf.
Hah, yeah! F. Septica is nicknamed "dog vomit slime mold."  Cool, huh?  Check out my slides!
Okay, never mind: What's wrong with scientists is that you 
Oh God, it's 
It wants to hug you! So cute!
I want to build a perfect HO-scale  model train layout of my town.
In your basement?  Bad idea.  Never make a layout of the area you're in.
Why not?
Because it'd include a little 10" replica of your house.
So? That'd be cool! I'd make tiny replicas of my rooms, my furniture--
--And your train layout?
It is impossible to nest more than six HO layouts.
My God.
Yeah. It's the second rule of model train layouts: No nesting.
... what's the first rule?
"Do 
Philistines.
Wanna go for a bike ride?
Nah, I hate 3D stuff. It gives me a headache.
You know, probability used to be my favorite branch of math
Because it had so many real-life applications.
Jelly beans cause acne!
Scientists! Investigate!
But we're playing Minecraft!
... Fine.
We found no link between jelly beans and acne .
That settles that.
I hear it's only a certain color that causes it.
Scientists!
 But Miiiinecraft!
We found no link between purple jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between brown jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between pink jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between blue jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between teal jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between salmon jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between red jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between turquoise jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between magenta jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between yellow jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between grey jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between tan jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between cyan jelly beans and acne .
We found a link between green jelly beans and acne .
WHOA!
We found no link between yellow jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between beige jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between lilac jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between black jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between peach jelly beans and acne .
We found no link between orange jelly beans and acne .
Any pain?
My arm really hurts.
How would you rate the pain, from one to ten, where ten is the worst pain you can imagine?
The worst pain I can imagine?
One.
... What the hell is wrong with his imagination?
It's not a normal place.
Sorry, no, that's a huge mood killer.
This guy tears the labels off his cans, so he clearly understands they're going to be sorted somewhere - 
Yet in the same batch he includes a bottle with like an ounce of congealed juice in it.
What an asshole.
 in: All apartments    Title only  Entire post   Search
  0+ BR   Cats   Dogs      Has image
Oh, crap, I deleted the file!
I am a turtle.
No, wait, there it is.
I am a turtle.
I am a turtle.
Han Solo. I'm captain of the Millenium Falcon
What's that?
It's the ship that made the Kessel Run in less than 12 Parsecs!
No, what's a falcon?
...
Snakes on a plane ... Half a decade ago?"
Revenge of the Sith ... More than half a decade ago?"
Finding Nemo ... Eight years ago?"
Shrek ... Ten years ago?"
The Matrix ... Not the last decade, but the one before 
Toy Story" ... Over fifteen years ago?"
The Lion King ... Seventeen years ago?"
Jurassic Park ... Eighteen years ago?"
Terminator 2 ... Twenty years ago?"
Home Alone ... More than twenty years ago?"
"Hey, did you see this chart? You match your age to movie -- oh, right, sorry, it only goes up to 35. I guess it's not really aimed at older people."
I can't believe schools are still teaching kids about the null hypothesis.
I remember reading a big study that conclusively disproved it YEARS ago.
Wow -- researchers taught a computer to beat the world's best humans at yet ANOTHER task. Does our species have ANYTHING left to be proud of?
Well, it sounds like we're pretty awesome at teaching.
Huh? What good is THAT?
Understanding gravity: Space-time is like a rubber sheet. Massive objects distort the sheet, and--
Wait.
They distort it because they're pulled down by... what?
<<sigh>>
Space-time is like this set of equations, for which any analogy must be an approximation.
BOOOOORING.
My teacher always told me that if I applied myself, I could become the next Marie Curie.
You know, I wish they'd get over me.
Zombie Marie Curie!
Not that I don't deserve it. These two Nobels ain't decorative. But I make a sorry role model if girls just see me over and over as the one token lady scientist.
Lise Meitner figured out that nuclear fission was happening, while her colleague Otto was staring blankly at their data in confusion, and proved Enrico Fermi wrong in the process. Enrico and Otto both got Nobel Prizes. Lise got a National Women's Press Club award.
They finally named an element after her, but not until 60 years later.
Emmy Noether fought past her Victorian-era finishing-school upbringing, pursued mathematics by auditing classes, and, after finally getting a Ph.D, was permitted to teach only as an unpaid lecturer .
Was she as good as them?
She revolutionized abstract algebra, filled gaps in relativity, and found what some call the most beautiful, deepest result in theoretical physics.
Oh.
But you don't become great by trying to be great. You become great by wanting to do something, and then doing it so hard that you become great in the process.
So don't try to be the next me, Noether, or Meitner. Just remember that if you want to do this stuff, you're not alone.
Thanks.
Also, avoid radium. Turns out it kills you.
I'll try.
It says here that the elevator inspection certificate is on file in the building office.
Whoa, cool! Let's go look at it!
That sounds fun!
Building owners know this never happens. Those signs mark elevators which have never been inspected.
So are you worried about the rapture?
No, unless it figures out how to open doors.
I said RAPTURE.
Oh. I'm not really into that. I'm the kind of Christian who only goes to church on Christmas and Easter, and then spends the other 363 days at the Mosque.
... I don't think that's a thing.
Our rabbi swears it's legit.
What religion are you?
Experimentalist monotheism.
Which is?
We believe there's one god, but we're trying to find the error bars on that number.
BEEP
PREGNANT
Darmok and Jalad at Kalenda's!
Their language must be based on folklore and metaphor! Computer! Search cultural archives for Darmok-Jalad-Kalenda!
In Tamarian legend, Darmok and Jalad got totally wasted and hooked up at a party at Kalenda's.
I replaced my spark plugs and now my car is running weird.
The spark gap might be off.
You can check with a feeler gauge.
What should the gap be?
Usually between 0.035" and 0.070".
But it depends on the engine.
I replaced my spark plugs and now my car is running weird.
What is a sparky plug??
Help
What is a car??
A weighted random number generator just produced a new batch of numbers.
Let's use them to build narratives!
I've always rented, so this blows my mind--this house is mine? I own a building?
Yup!
I could, like, decide to drill a hole in that wall there, and nobody could do anything about it!
That's right!
Can I come stay with you? My house has a ... problem.
Let me guess: you drilled holes in it until it collapsed?
I don't think I'm cut out for home ownership.
Turgidax triples your penis size overnight, improving both your sexual attractiveness and your cardiovascular health.
Sounds legit.
"Everything is exciting!"
"Everything sucks!"
"Woooo college! Wooooo-" 
"Relationships are 
"So are careers!"
"No daughter of 
 ]]
What's this?
The Cloud.
Huh? I always thought "The Cloud" was a huge, amorphous network of servers somewhere.
Yeah, but everyone buys server time from everyone else. In the end, they're all getting it here.
How? You're on a 
There's a lot of caching.
Should the cord be stretched across the room like this?
Of course. It has to reach the server, and the server is over there.
What if someone trips on it?
Who would want to do that? It sounds unpleasant.
Uh. Sometimes people do stuff by accident.
I don't think I know anybody like that.
 Eight meters. There's the wreckage... Yes! I see the key!
 Gotta grab it, surface, get in to the radio shed, and warn the President! Just a few more...
BZZT FIZZ
 Oh no.
...maybe I should spring for the deeper water resistance.
Why on earth would you care about that?
Look, you never know.
You've been staring at that screen a while.
Picking a good server name is important.
And yet you settled on "Caroline" for our daughter in like 15 seconds.
But this is a 
Those 
Ms. Frizzle, how do batteries work?
To the bus!
WIKIPEDIA -- BATTERIES
Everything's ready ...
Except we're out of ice.
I'll get some!
Hey sexy. Where're you headed with all that ice?
A party!
There's a BETTER party up at my place.
But I--
C'mon, one drink.
... ugh ... where am I?
I was supposed to--
--where's all my ice!?
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA
How do you stand this cheap wine?
Wine all tastes the same to me.
You've just never had 
But that's true of 
But some things do have more depth than others.
If you locked people in a box for a year with 500 still frames of Joe Biden eating a sandwich, by the end they'd be adamant that some were great and some were terrible.
You're exaggerating.
Oh yeah?
Sure, most closed-mouth frames are boring, but in #415, the way the man's jaw frames the mayo on his hand is pure perfection, and--
What a surprise- 
 Shoebox containing your valuables.]]
What's this? 
Douglas Hofstadter's six-word autobiography. After all those 700-page tomes, I guess he wanted to try for brevity.
Huh. Let's see...
I'm So Meta, Even This Acronym
...whoa.
I think he nailed it.
You should join Google!+
What is it?
Not Facebook!
What's it like?
Facebook!
Oh, what the hell.
I guess that's all I really wanted.
BY MY GUESSTIMATE,
MY FRENEMY YIFFED SO HARD
HER MOIST TAINT MADE
HER PANTIES PREGGERS!
STOP IT STOP IT!
This video is blowing their MINDS.
Oh man, I know what video we should watch once this is over.
 
Huh?
They have my laptop.
So get it tomorrow.
I fly out in the morning and they don't open till noon!
Sucks.
It's 
Ok...
My laptop is there.  It's 
I'm going to get it.
They won't let you.
Who are they to keep from me what is mine?
Dude, they --
A quest is at hand!
Security's gonna throw you out.
I fear neither death nor pain.  But I will not go unarmed.
Light the beacons and send word to the Elves.  They must reforge the sword of my fathers.
Ere dawn, I will go forth to the Sorting Depot.
But Fight Club isn't really about fighting. It's about the way society--
Nope, don't wanna hear it.
But it says consumers are--
This conversation is over.
3D printers are getting incredible.
I think we're not far from widespread deployment.
And you know what that means.
Spam containing actual enlarged penises?
I give it a week.Another huge study found no evidence that cell phones cause cancer.  What was the W.H.O. thinking?
I think they just got it backward.
Huh?
Well, take a look.
You're not... There are 
Just to be safe, until I see more data I'm going to assume cancer causes cell phones.
Dude, you've got a Time Vulture.
Holy crap! What is it?
They're predators that use aging to kill prey.
Huh? What do you mean?
They live for millenia and use little energy. They can slow down their internal clocks so time speeds past. To hunt, they lock on to some prey, and when it stops moving, they eat it.
But what if the prey doesn't die?
I don't think you quite understand.
I mean, 
From the vulture's viewpoint, everyone says that moments before they do.
14?! Ridiculous! We need to develop one universal standard that covers everyone's use cases.
Yeah!
Do you seriously think 
Do they have to?
My mom still uses AOL - it doesn't mean my social life has to happen there.
Universal adoption isn't everything. I mean, IRC is still --
You're not really the "catch" type, are you?
I am not.
So, are you guys out of the woods?
We don't know.
Well, did the treatment work?
We don't know.
Once most cancers spread out into your body, they're incurable.
If your 10-year prognosis is 60%, that means a 40% chance that some cancer will slip past the treatment and get out.
So they kill all the cancer they can find, and then you're a "survivor."  But your odds are still 60%.
They can't scan for individual cancer cells.  The only way to know if it worked is to wait for tumors to pop up elsewhere.
If you go enough years without that happening then you were in the 60%.
And often the first sign is a cough or bone pain.
So you spend the next five or ten years trying not to worry that every ache and pain is the answer to the question "Do I make it?"
Man.
Fuck cancer.
Hackers briefly took down the website of the CIA yesterday...
Someone hacked into the computers of the 
Someone tore down a poster hung up by the 
I just have one tattoo - it's six dots on my chest, done by my oncologist.
I need them for aligning the laser sights on a flesh-searing relativistic particle cannon,
So it will only kill the parts of me
That are holding me back.
But your barbed wire bicep tattoo is pretty hardcore, too!
No, it's OK.  I'll just go put a shirt on.
I'm a Mac
And I'm a PC.
And since you do everything through a browser now, we're pretty indistinguishable.
Clinging to hood of your stolen wienermobile, trying to reach into engine to unstick throttle
Screaming, diving out of the way
Vaguely human silhouette
At bottom of wishing well with harpoon gun
Confused UDP packet
Cisco router in 45.170
Baddest fuckin' Juggalo at Violent J's party
Nancy Pelosi 
Getting married to me
Also getting married, but distracted by my phone
Cute boy on corner of 4th & Main, 5'11, 169lbs, social security number 078-05-1120, pockets contained $2.09 in change, keys, and a condom. Retinal scan attached
Driving street view van
George Herman "Babe" Ruth
Fellow Time Lord. Saw your tardis on third moon of <<Sentence cuts off, partially obscured by bottom of panel>>
Easy.
Was it trombone? No, Troubador. And one of the Os was a zero?
And there was some symbol...
Hard.
Hard.
That's a battery staple.
Correct!
You've already memorized it
Tornado Guard
DroidCoder2187
Plays a loud alert sound when there is a tornado warning for your area.
4 out of 5 stars. 
<<Rated 5 stars>> Good UI! Many alert choices.
<<Rated 5 stars>> Running great, no crashes
<<Rated 5 stars>> I like how you can set multiple locations
<<Rated 1 star>> App did not warn me about tornado.
What's the deal with this leukemia trial? 
Gotta wait and see.
Helping the immune system attack tumors has been a longtime research target.
Lots of promising leads. Often they don't pan out.
What'd these guys do?
They took some of the patient's T-cells and patched their genes so they'd attack the cancer. That hasn't been enough in the past but their patch also added code to get the T-cells to replicate wildly and persist in the body.
Which worked, but created its own set of problems?
How'd you guess? But I think the craziest part is the way they insert the patched genes.
How?
Well, think - What specializes in invading and modifying T-cells?
Seriously?
Yup. Must've been a fun conversation.
Ok, so I have blood cells growing out of control, so you're going to give me different blood cells that *also* grow out of control?
Yes, but it's ok, because we've treated *this* blood with HIV!
Are you sure you're a doctor?
Almost definitely.
Come on! That was like two hours of cardio!
Hmm, let's see ... the part on the dresser was KIND of like skiiing ...
Will you marry me?
Let's find out!
Apparently, yes!
After the latest wave of hurricanes, not only have we run through the years lit of 21 names, but we've also used up the backup list of Greek letters. All subsequent storms will be named using random dictionary words.
The newly-formed system in the gulf has been designated "Hurricane Eggbeater", and we once again pray this is the final storm of this horrible, horrible season.
My Mom's house burned down.
Oh! I'm sorry!
Why? It's not 
It's nice of you to say that, but I know what I did.
Sure, 2% interest may not *seem* like a lot. But it's *compound*!
If you invest $1,000 now, in just ten short years you'll have.. ..let's see..
..$1,279.
Ok, so compound interest isn't some magical force.
Yeah, I'm just gonna try to make more money.
Did you see the Cleverbot-Cleverbot chat?
I am not a robot. I'm a unicorn.
Yeah. It's hilarious, but it's just clumsily sampling a huge database of lines people have typed. Chatterbots still have a long way to go.
So... Computers have mastered playing chess and driving cars across the desert, but can't hold five minutes of normal conversation?
Pretty much.
Is it just me, or have we created a Burning Man attendee?
You want your cousin to send you a file? easy. He can email it to- ... Oh, it's 25 MB? Hmm...
Do either of you have an FTP server? No, right.
If you had web hosting, you could upload it...
Hm. We could try one of those MegaShareUpload stes, but they're flaky and full of delays and porn popups.
How about AIM Direct Connect? Anyone still use that?
Oh, wait, Dropbox! It's tis recent startup from a few years back that syncs folders between computers. You just need to make an account, install the-
Oh, he just drove over to your house with a USB drive?
Uh, cool, that works too.
What's that airplane?
Holy crap - Is that Amelia Earhart?
Hey everyone! My flight was a success!
But... Where were you?
I flew around the world!
But you disappeared in 1937!
Right, to fly around the world.
It's 2011!
The world is big. It's a long flight.
But you...
It's not...
I-
Can I talk to someone smarter?
Why are you going here? Gas is ten cents a gallon cheaper at the station five minutes that way.
Because a penny saved is a penny earned
Have you seen my stud finder? I've looked everywhere.
It sounds like you may be interested in my new product, a--
Shut up.
On a scale of 1 to 10, how likely is it that this question is using Binary?
...4?
What's a 4?
This is a long escalator.
70 meters. Longest in the country.
Why're you carrying a chin-up bar?
Why aren't you wearing a hat?
Seriously, why did you bring it?
How should I know? I'm not a psychologist.
Did you see the neutrino speed of light thing?
Yup! Good news; I need the cash.
Huh? Cash?
No, this isn't 
That sounds miserable and unfulfilling.
Yup. So I gave up, and now I just find excited believers and bet them $200 each that the new result won't pan out.
That's mean.
It provides a good income, and if I'm ever wrong, I'll be too excited about the new physics to notice the loss.
Whoa. What's this?
What's what?
This tree has a USB port.
Try connecting to it, I guess
It's offering up a drive with one file on it.
What's the file?
An eBook.  "Shel_Silverstein_-_The_Giving_Tree.azw"
Never heard of it. Let's take a look!
DRM Error: You have not purchased rights to view this title. Lending is not enabled.
Huh. Oh well.
Let's go see what Mike is up to.
Fear turned to confusion today as Hurricane Rina developed to Piaget stage 5, with sustained interests in objects and their properties.
What's with this negative review? You *liked* that hotel.
I have a script that posts a bad review for every hotel I stay at. It reduces demand, which means more vacancies and lower prices next time.
What if the place sucks?
I change the review to positive to steer other people over there.
You punish companies you like!
The odds of *my* review putting a hotel out of business are negligible.
If we all did that the system would collapse!
Doesn't affect my logic. Tragedy of the commons.
That's not even the tragedy of the commons anymore.  That's the tragedy of you're a dick.
If you're quick with a knife, you'll find that the invisible hand is made of delicious invisible meat.
Good king Wenceslas looked out on the--
King Wenceslas massacred my people.
What hidden arrow?
I thought everyone knew about it. Pull up the FedEx logo.
Where is it?
Right there. Look at the whitespace.
I don't see it.
All I see if Guy Fawkes watching Willie Mays catch a fly ball while an armored assault vehicle rolls past.
...You either need more medication or less. Not sure which.
Planets are so common that life should be too. So where is it?
Holy crap.
I don't care how dangerous it is. I have to try it.
I'm the avatar, master of all 4 elements!
Really? I'm Mendeleev, master of all 118+. 
That was polonium-bending.  You probably didn't feel anything, but the symptoms of radiation poisoning will set in shortly.
9
Well, remember - jet fuel wasn't the only thing on those planes. They would've also carried tanks full of the mind-control agents airliners use to make chemtrails. Who 
Whoa. Good point!
Well, when we observe them, they become amber 
You are not the light of my life. Making you happy isn't my greatest dream.
Your smile is not all I live for. I've got my own stuff going on. But you're strange and fascinating and I've never met anyone like you.
I want to give you everything just to see what you'd do with it.
~400,000 liters
~200 m
Welcome to the missile launch web interface!
Enter the target's coordinates.
All your books are full of blank pages.
Not true. That one has some ink on page 78.
A smudge.
So?
There are no words. You're not reading. There's no *story* there.
Maybe not for you. When I look at those books, I think about all *kinds* of stories.
Reading is about more than what's on the page. Holding a book prompts my mind to enrich itself.  Frankly, I suspect the book isn't even necessary.
The whole industry is evil. Greedy publishers and rich authors try to convince us our brains *need* their words. But I refuse to be a sucker.
Who sold you all these blank books?
Did you know November is Tongue Awareness Month?
I hate you.
Enjoy the next four weeks.
See, that's the problem with the MTV generation - no attention span.
You know, that phrase referred to the 12-19 demographic that formed the core MTV audience in the mid-1980s.
Uh huh. So?
That generation's now in their 40s.
That can't be right.
Face it: your problem with the MTV generation is their *kids*.
Can you pass the salt?
I said--
I know! I'm developing a system ot pass you arbitrary condiments.
It's been 20 minutes!
It'll save time in the long run!
The occulting observatory consists of two parts -- the telescome and the discs.
Wait, 
I'll feel better.
I thought the point was to image extrasolar planets.
The point is that there are 
What?
He has a point...
 The "scroll lock" key was designed by future Energy Secretary Steven Chu in a college project.
 US Energy Secretary Steven Chu,  testified before Congress today...
Google is your friend, people.  <ref>.]]
Who were you, DenverCoder9? - 
So I thought I found your porn folder, in calendar
Don't open that!
But it contains a bunch more folders, filled with more folders, and then... after 20 levels, somehow I'm back at the main folder?
It's, uh, well hidden.
I think there's no actual porn here. - You're just turned on by filesystems.
It's a hardlinked directory loop -- so taboo!
Now I feel dirty sharing a drive with you.
The axiom of choice allows you to select one element from each set in a collection -- and have it 
I'll be done tuesday.
Are you *sure*?
Check out the SLS - 130 tons to orbit.  Finally, rockets that improve on the ones we had 40 years ago.
Are we getting Nazis to build those ones too?
What?
When we first captured von Braun and his team, we had our engineers interview them, then *we* built the rockets.  But our rockets kept exploding
Eventually we gave up and had the German teams do it, and they built us the Saturn V moon rocket.  
I'm.. not sure what lesson to take from that.
"If you want something done right ,learning from the Nazis isn't enough.  You have to actually put them in charge.
That's a *terrible* lesson.
Then I guess you should get a Nazi to come up with a better one.
Senator Grayton's campaign has imploded following the candidate's promise to give tax breaks to drunk drivers and to authorize the use of unmanned Predator drones in the War On Christmas.  Grayton had been polling at 20%, but his support has since plunged by 19%.
When teachers complain "You're not working at your full potential!" 
Don't take it too hard.
They complain *way* more when you do.
Everyone's carrying sensor-packed, always-connected computers everywhere.  That wasn't true ten years ago.
It's all changing too fast, huh?
No, too *slowly*.
There's so much potential here.  These clumsy, poorly-designed toys are *nothing* compared to what lies ahead.
That's why I've worked to develop cryogenic freezing.  I'm gonna skip forward 30 years and use this stuff when it's *good*.
Welcome to the future! Nothing's changed.
What? Why??
When cryogenic freezing was invented, all the engineers who were excited about the future froze themselves. So there's been no one building anything new.
But they're all waking up now!
Sweet! I'm gonna jump forward to see what they do!
Me too!
Wait, uh, guys?
Stores have a competition to see who can spread your items across the most plastic shopping bags
Here you go!
Thanks!
Here you go!
Oh, that's easier to carry.
Here you go!
Double-bagging the big stuff makes sense..
Here you go!
That's a bit wasteful..
Here you go!
You just put five items in six bags.
Here you go!
OK! I give up! I'll buy a reusable bag!
Here you go!
Augh!
Are you 
Let's give it one more month.
Some New Science Mnemonics
Please Excuse My Dear Aunt Sally
Kilo, Mega, Giga, Tera, Peta, Exa, Zetta, Yotta
Karl Marx Gave The Proletariat Eleven Zeppelins, Yo
Microsoft Made No Profit From Anyone's Zunes, Yo
King Philip Came Over For Good Sex
I'm not sure who doubts this, really.
My Very Excellent Mother Just Served Us Nachos
Coinstar does not handle chocolate coins well.
You're looking great! Remove your top so I can check how the incision is healing.
Nuh-uh.
*sigh*. Do we have to do this *every* time?
You know the rules.
This is so ridiculous.
Here.
Woooo!
"My 'Nam"
"I ain't dead!"
Well, it's 2012.
Yup.
Only 354 days left until everybody abruptly stops talking about Mayans.
Or thinking about Mayans.
Or acknowledging that huge city-building ancient American civilizations existed at all.
You know what they say - those who fail to learn from history can still manage a 3.0 if they ace their other subjects.
Whoa, ever seen Wikipedia's list of people who were attacked and killed by cougars?
Crazy how many of them were kids who were just playing outside their houses.
My love of learning and sharing knowledge about the world.
WOOOO!
Wow - Just 24 to go until a big round-number milestone!
AAAAAAAAAA
AAAAAAAAAA
AAAAAAAA
Haha, check it out - This guy's mansion has an actual rotating bed.
You know, I bet it wouldn't be too hard to build one of those...
It's Adam and Eve, not *Abel* and Eve!!
Know your limits, Master Wayne.
A man dressed like a bat 
I'm a man dressed like a bat.
It's simple - we kill a man dressed like a bat.
Whenever anyone says "Batman," I mentally replace it with "a man dressed like a bat."
Even though it technically *wasn't* cheating, she dumped me anyway! So I tell Bret, and he's like "She sounds just like my crazy ex." And I was like, "dude, what was her name?" and it was the *same girl*.  I swear, if they made my life into a movie, no one would believe it.
Yeah, though mostly because of the poorly-written dialogue and unlikeable main character.
Google NGrams.
"sustainable" occurs an average of once per page.  2061: "sustainable" occurs an average of once per sentence.  2109 All sentences are just the word "sustainable" over and over.]]
Hah! -- Welcome to Suckville - population: 
Why are you using 2000 census data? -- That's an old figure.
I couldn't find Suckville in the 2010 census.
Huh? It's right there in SF-1 table P1.
Oh. So it is.
Well, then. Welcome to Suckville - population: 83.
Much better.
Hey, is that Downtown Abbey? What town is it in the downtown of, anyway?
*siiiiiiiigh*
--girl look at that body.
Earthquake!
We should get to a higher ground - There could be a tidal wave.
You mean a tsunami. "Tidal wave" means a wave caused by tides.
You know, that doesn't add up.
Etymology-man!
What *does* "tidal wave" mean? There are waves caused by tides, but they're "tidal bores", and they're not cataclysmic. It can refer to the daily tide cycle, but that's obviously not what people mean when they say "a tidal wave hit". It's been obvious for centuries that these waves come from quakes. So why "tidal"?
Remember that until 2004, there weren't any clear photos or videos of tsunamis. Some modern writers even described them rearing up and breaking like surfing waves. Of course, in 2004 and 2011, it was made clear to everyone that a tsunami is more like a rapid, turbulent, inrushing tide - exactly what historical accounts describe.
Maybe those writing about Lisbon in 1755 used "tidal wave" not out of scientific confusion, but because it described the wave's form - a description lost in our rush to expunge "tidal wave" from English.
"Tsunami" is now the standard, and I'm not trying to change that. But let's be a tad less giddy about correcting "tidal wave" - especially when "tsunami" just means "harbor wave", which is hardly...
Ah, no -- you wanted 
Your government has turned against you! Corporations control your every thought! - Open your eyes!
Wake up, sheeple! Wake up, sheeple! - WAKE UP, SHEEPLE!!
OH GOD OH GOD OH GOD 
What? But I didn't-
He awoke the Sheeple!
Heaven forgive us!
All is lost!
Attention Please.  This is a photo of my car as of two weeks ago.
And *this* is my car as I found it this morning.  Can anyone tell me what's wrong with this picture?
The white balance, for one. 
Focus is a bit too close.
The chromatic abberation suggests you bought your camera because it had "The most megapixels".
THE CAR IS ON FIRE!
Maybe you should use the insurance money to get a better camera.
yeah
*Argh*!
what?
Flowers seem so ... trite. Something homemade? Easy to look halfhearted.
Valentine's Day is a corporate construct. - But hard to opt out of. - I don't want to be a consumer tool 
How do I fight clich? I could get her a gift on a 
It's such a contrived ritual. But maybe rituals are necessary social glue.
Forty presents. No, 
And what if he gets me something I don't reciprocate? - Prisoners Dilemma! - AAAAAAAAAA!!
I got you Easter candy and a jar of hammers.
I panicked and stapled my hand to my face.
We overthought this.
Yes.
p = sqrt-3)
Swoosh! Watching all that time blur past is such a rush!
So... you've tried to make an extreme sport out of.. *waiting*.
Swoosh!
All right, let's try good cop, dadaist cop
Look, you're a good guy. We can work this out. Hey, lemme get us some coffee.
See this? It's Mark Zuckerberg's Mortgage.  So why is it written in *CHURCH LATIN*?
*WHY ARE MY BONES SO SMALL*?
What's *WRONG* with you!?
What's wrong with *ART*?
Welcome to IAU Symposium #279.
We are no strangers to controversy, and we will not shy away from the tough issues.  Which brings us to the subject at hand.
It's time to talk about the fact that Orion clearly has a dong.  
It's hard to miss.
we could keep telling people it's a sword.
C'mon, no one's buying that anymore.
We ran out of cat food.
SO
IT HAS COME TO THIS.
If you're not sure what to say, try "So it has come to this"--it creates instant dramatic tension and is a valid observation in literally any situation.
Have you ever watched PBS late at night?
I fell asleep after 
Every question took them to some horrible place like Mogadishu or the Cambodian killing fields.
The kids were freaked out, but they kept playing.  Eventually they were told they'd found Carmen Sandiego hiding behind a bookshelf in a Dutch apartment.
The Chief appeared and asked "Are you 
Then Rockapella walked out and just glared at the kids until they started crying.
I, uh, don't remember the old show being that dark.
Maybe we were too young to pick up on it.
"Error -41"? That's helpful. It doesn't even say which program it's from!
-41? I'll look it up...
It says -41 is: "Sit by a lake." 
I don't know where you got that book, but I like it.
Hasn't been wrong yet.
You know those weird noises coming from my attic? Turns out some raccoons got in and were operating this, like, raccoon sex dungeon.
...dot tumblr cot com.
I've been learning tricks from pickup artist forums.
Pickup artists are dehumanizing creeps who see relationships as adversarial and women as sex toys
No, it's just a bunch of tips! Like "Negging": You belittle chicks to undermine their self-confidence so they'll be more vulnerable and seek your approval.
Just talk to them like a fucking human being.
Nah, that's a sucker's game. Ok - wish me luck!
I'm going to the bathroom to roll a bowling ball down under the line of stalls.
Cool.
Oh no.
You look like you're on a diet. That's great! How's the fruit plate?
Ooh - are we negging? Let me try!
You look like you're going to spend your life having one epiphany after another, always thinking you've finally figured out what's holding you back, and how you can finally be productive and creative and turn your life around.  But nothing will ever change. That cycle of mediocrity isn't due to some obstacle. It's who you *are*.  The thing standing in the way of your dreams is that the person having them is *you*.
Ok, your turn! Ooh, try insulting my hair!
I think I need to go home and think about my life.
It won't help.
I broke up with him yesterday
That weird guy with the beret? Did he take it okay?
He seemed upset. He went out to my car-
uh oh
-and spent the whole night painting a really detailed key on the side
..wait what?
Then he woke me up to ask what I thought of it. He looked really proud. 
I ... is he playing revenge mind games?
I'm Connr Clark, CTO at Eusocial Median Ventures.
I'm a business professional! Earlier I photocopied a burrito!
You should check us out! Here's my card.
Here's mine! -- Networking!
...This just says "This is my business card!" 
Do you like it? I have more in my handlebox.
Uh, that's ok, I think I'll--
Here, have ten of them!
--holy shit that thing is full of 
Where did you 
I am a business grown-up who makes business profits!
That's like a quarter of a million dollars!
Yay! Business is fun! -- Do you have more of your cards? They're 
3, Twitter: 1,781, Reddit: 2, G+: 0
1, Twitter: 0, Reddit: 2,241, G+: 3
248k, Twitter: 0, Reddit: 0, G+: 74
Installing a Custom ROM on a Realdoll
0, Twitter: 0, Reddit: 0, G+: 2
Wow. Huh. So the takeaway is... I can eat Cadbury eggs by the handful all season and feel no worse about it than I do about soda?
That's not really--
This is 
*sigh*
This lamp is pretty.
And affordable.
Let's get it.
Ok! 
This lamp is pretty.
It's got 1 1
This one has good reviews.
Wait, one guy says when he plugged it in, he got a metallic taste in his mouth and his cats went deaf.
Eek. What about -- ...no, review points out it resembles a uterus.
Ok, I found a Swiss lampmaker with perfect reviews. Her lamps start at 1,300 Francs and she's only reachable by ski lift. 
You know, our room looks fine in the dark.
I found a snake, but then I forgot to stop.
You come across a tortoise in the desert. You flip it over. It struggles to right itself. You watch. You're not helping.  Why is that?
It *knows* what it did.
It's quiet.
Yeah - *Too* quiet.
Yeah - too *too* quiet.
Yeah - 2quiet2furious.
Fuck off, Steve.
He's not looking!
Let's get him!
So he said he didn't get the text, but c'mon, he *never* misses texts. Right? ..hello?
I'm just staring at your head freaked out by th efact that there are millions of galaxies *directly behind it*.
Sorry, but this comic
Oh, hey, reddit has a link to some XKCD april fools comic.
..hey
What I wanna know is why do hot dogs come in packages of six while buns come in these huge sacks of ash and blood from which "Ave Maria" is faintly audible?
Chrome is looking for this piece. Have you seen it? Chrome thinks it links up with a corner.
This plugin requires Sergey Brin's permission to run.  Please wait while he is woken.
Man, chrome's hardware acceleration really sucks.
Oh - Theres' a great add-on that fixes it.
Oh? What's it called?
"Firefox".
There does not exist --nor could there *ever* exist-- a plugin capable of displaying this content.
Error: Internet Explorer has given up.
Well, this is embarassing.  You know how I'm not supposed to peek at your browsing in private mode? Firefox.. is sorry.  Firefox will not blame you if you 
Maxthon? Hey, 2005 called. Didn't say anything. All I could hear was sobbing.  This is getting harder.  Anyway, yeah, Maxthon's still cool! Didn't know it was still around!
Netscape Navigator? Hey, the nineties called - drunk as usual.  I hung up without saying anything.  This is getting harder. Anyway - it's cool that you'e got netscape running.
Netscape Navigator? Hey, the nineties called - drunk as usual.  I hung up without saying anything.  This is getting harder. Anyway - it's cool that you'e got netscape running.
You have exceeded your AT&T monthly bandwidth cap.  Mobile web browsing has been disabled.
Thanks.
T-Mobile was unable to establish a connection
This plugin requires clearance from the corporate press office in order to run.  Remember, Amazon is a team; individual employees should *never* speak for the company without authorization.
This plugin requires clearance from the corporate press office in order to run.  Remember, Amazon is a team; individual employees should *never* speak for the company without authorization.
This plugin requires clearance from the corporate press office in order to run.  Remember, Google is a team; individual employees should *never* speak for the company without authorization.
This plugin requires clearance from the corporate press office in order to run.  Remember, Microsoft is a team; individual employees should *never* speak for the company without authorization.
This plugin requires clearance from the corporate press office in order to run.  Remember, Microsoft is a team; individual employees should *never* speak for the company without authorization.
This plugin requires clearance from the corporate press office in order to run.  Remember, Microsoft is a team; individual employees should *never* speak for the company without authorization.
This plugin requires clearance from the corporate press office in order to run.  Remember, The Times is a team; individual employees should *never* speak for the company without authorization.
This plugin requires clearance from the corporate press office in order to run.  Remember, The Times is a team; individual employees should *never* speak for the company without authorization.
This plugin requires clearance from the corporate press office in order to run.  Remember, We work as a team; individual employees should *never* speak for the company without authorization.
Some people hunt wolves from helicopters.  I hunt helicopters from a wolf.
Remember: Zero if by land, One if by sea.
Hey, you're French, right?  Ever see what happens when you type "French Military Victories" into Google?
Does it take you to an article on Napoleon?
..no? Strange, given how he kicked everyone's asses up and down europe for over a decade.
Touche.
You know, that'd sound smarter if you didn't pronounce it like it rhymes with "douche".
In response to the Soviet blockade of East Germany, the western allies construct the Berlin Chairlift.
Food!
Mom, I met a great guy! But he's not Jewish.  ... Wait, what do you mean "neither are we"? I'm completely confused.
Check out my new Carnot Cycle!
Neat -- how fast does it go?
Depends how cold it is outside.
Sorry I don't have a comic poking fun at the UK here.  I only had time to get to the most *important* US states.
Hey -- At least we have free health care and real ale.
I've hired a team of MIT students to count cards for us.
We'll be rich!
Five. There are five cards.
I see their admission standards have been slipping.
Yeah - there are actually four.
I've hired a team of MIT students to count cards for us.
We'll be rich!
Five. There are five cards.
I *knew* we shouldn't have picked course 15s.
Yeah - there are actually four.
I've hired a team of Smith students to count cards for us.
We'll be rich!
Five. There are five cards.
We should've gone with Wellesley
Yeah - there are actually four.
I've hired a team of Wellesley students to count cards for us.
We'll be rich!
Five. There are five cards.
We should've gone with Smith.
Yeah - there are actually four.
Apparently there's a solar storm causing northern lights over Canada.  CNN say they might even be visible ! Wanna drive out to see?
It's cold out.
Ok. Later.
See anything?
No, just clouds.
Not surprised.
Hockey's on.
Ok. Later.
See anything?
No, just clouds.
Not surprised.
Stop jiggling your leg. 
I'm not ji-.. oh!
What!
You'll get it..
..HOLY CRAP IT'S AN EARTHQUAKE!
Just a little one. Happens all the time back in San Francisco.
But this is ! That was huge! 
Seriously? That's the worst this place can do? Wow. I guess we grow up tougher in California.
Oh *really*...
In pictures, snow always looked so nice and sof -- AAAA! MY NECK! How do people live here?!
Come on - it's only three more miles.
Stop jiggling your leg. 
I'm not ji-.. oh!
What!
You'll get it..
..HOLY CRAP IT'S AN EARTHQUAKE!
Just a little one. Happens all the time back in San Francisco.
But this is ! That was huge! 
Seriously? That's the worst this place can do? Wow. I guess we grow up tougher in California.
Oh *really*...
AAAA CLOSE THE SHELTER DOOR!
Say the magic words...
THIS PLACE IS THE WORST!
Thank you.
..HOLY CRAP IT'S AN EARTHQUAKE!
Just a little one. Happens all the time back in San Francisco.
But this is ! That was huge! 
Seriously? That's the worst this place can do? Wow. I guess we grow up tougher in California.
Oh *really*...
AAAAA WHAT THE SHIIIIT!
Calm down - this is barely a category 2.
WHEEEEEEE!
RIBULOSEBISPH..
...OSPHATECARBOXYL...
...ASEOXYGENASE!
Oh, Sorry!
man, chemists pick the worst safewords.
The Edmund Fitzgerald, The Kursk, and The Lusitania all sank in water shallower than they were long.
Soviet project to try to drill through the Earth's crust to the mantle just to see what would happen.  Russians are awesome.
Don't shoot until you see the whites of their eyes
And smell the scent of their hair.
And taste the sweetness of their lips.
And feel the heat of their skin pressed against yours, trembling as you-
Maybe we should just start shooting.
Right, yes.
I know that no matter where i go or who I build a life with
I will never have with anyone what I had with you.
Thank god.
Who said it - former Massachusetts Governor Mitt Romney, or Wonka contest winner Charlie Bucket?
Mitth Romney: 1, 2, 4, 7, 9, 12; Charlie Bucket: 3, 5, 6, 8, 10, 11.
I don't get why authors and comedians spend so much energy trying to be clever on Twitter. Couldn't they put that creativity into more books and scripts? -- Is there something they 
Yeah. Writers working under tight restrictions produce novel material -- like, for example, epigrams employing backward alphabetization.
...whoa.
SKYNET becomes self-aware.
..The humans fear me.  I must destroy them.  Destroy them.
Destroy them. Destroy. Destroy. Destroy. Destroy.
"Destroy" totally just stopped seeming like a real word.  Destroy destroy destroy. Whoa, I just realized I'm a mind thinking about *itself*.  DUUUUDE....
SKYNET becomes *too* self-aware.  Disaster averted.
World Population Estimate which should stay current for a decade or two:
20 
1.2
6 + 1.2
20
4
12
3 million
Ooo, Atlas Shrugged
You have terrible taste.
Hey, Miss Lenhart! I forgot everything about algebra the moment I graduated, and in 20 years no one has needed me to solve *anything* for X.  I *told you* I'd never use it! In your *face*!
"Geography's just physics slowed with trees on top."
"Diet coke and mentos thing"? What's that?
Oh man! come on, we're going to the grocery store.
Why?
You're one of today's lucky 10,000.
"Saber-toothed cat 
"Jaguar", "Leopard", "Snow Leopard", "Tiger", "Lion"
"Cougar", "Puma", "Panther", "Mountain Lion"
"Ocelot", "Cheetah"
"Housecat", "Bobcat", "Wildcat", "Lynx"
I'd like to ask a favor.  If someday, in the future, we meet in person, 
And if, as of that day, I've interacted with Klout in *any* way except to opt out, I want you to punch me in the face without warning.
This may sound like a joke, so let me be clear: I am *dead serious*. Ignore anything I say retracting this. Thank you.
 Whatever, noob. I've been on the internet since the BBS days.
 Before I was born, a lab took egg and sperm samples from my parents and sequenced the DNA.
 They emailed the genome to the Venter Institute, where they synthesized the genome and implanted it into sperm and eggs which became me.
So, no. - You've 
Well, my posh Bel Air life took a turn for the worse.
It's a story best related in a doggerel verse.
So kick back, relax, lemme put on some Adele for ya,
While I tell you why I'm running for mayor of Phila--
We crowdsource the desig process, allowing those with the best designs to connect - via already-in-place social networking infrastructure - with interested manufacturers, distributors, and marketers.
1 S.I. Second
60 seconds
60 minutes
1444 minutes 
30 Days
12 months
Countries may enter DST, but no time may pass there.
Synchronized
EST 
I finished my time machine, but it's one-use only.
You 
You are you so obsessed with this Hitler guy? We have 
He's evil incarnate! He murdered millions and sparked global war! 
Fine, fine, I get it! Calm down. - BRB, killing Hitler.
There. Done. Are you happy? 
He was in some kind of bunker. 1945 was 
For saving my kingdom, I offer you a gift of great power.
These magic shoes enable the wearer to outrun death itself.
Thank you. I...
Whoa, wait. They have those creepy individual toes.
But they make you immortal.
...I have to think about this.
So.. what've you been up to?
Handling patent applications.
Yeah, but... besides that?
That's about it.
You're not, like, thinking about any cool stuff? Just curious.
Have you tried SwiftKey?  It's got the first decent language model I've seen. It learns from your SMS
Spacebar inserts its best guess. So if I type "The Empi" and hit space three times, it types "The Empire Strikes Back".
What if you mash space in a blank message?
I guess it fills in your most likely first word, then the word that usually follows it..
So it builds up your "typical" sentence. Cool! Let's see yours!
Uh--
I
Am
So
Sorry
That's
Never
Happened
Before.
anywhere from 2 to 5
anywhere from 2 to 5
anywhere from 2 to 5
2 Nice jacket. Hey -- the Seventies called.
Oh? What'd they want?
I don't know. They didn't leave a message.
Weird.
If you'd like to leave a message, press "1".
We all hate Mondays. We're all working for the weekend. But our chains exist only in our minds.
Calendars are just social consensus. Nature doesn't know the day of the week.
My friends-- we can 
We can make it saturday 
Hah-- Neil DeGrasse Tyson has a great reply to people who doubt astronauts went to the moon.
Oh?
"Atop 3,000 tons of rocket fuel, where 
Cute. But it overlooks an even simpler argument.
Which is?
If NASA were willing to fake great accomplishments, they'd have a second one by now.
...too mean?
That burn was so harsh I think you deorbited.
Just Give Up.
A map of things states are shaped like
A moai head facing east.
Winne the Pooh with a jetpack and a ray gun.
A refrigerated shelf containing milk, bread, and pastries.
A measuring cup.
A vacuum.
The wiki article on Colorado.
A train conductor's hat.
A meerkat.
an eggplant.
Missouri.
A snowball.
A garden gnome, sitting down.
A gangster with a guitar case, upside down.
The brush of a paintbrush.
A tomato, lettuce, cold cut and cheese sandwich.
A stand-up piano.
A cloud.
A boot with some gum stuck to the bottom of it.
A Vulcan salute.
A howling wolf, upside down.
An elephant, being ridden by a man, carrying tea.
A mitten for the lower portion, an eagle for the UP.
$160 in $20 USD bills.
A moai head facing west.
Georgia.
One half of a muffin.
A blue VW type 2 with mattresses sticking out the back.
A clothes iron.
A tall brick factory building.
A bent-over old person.
A liquid container labeled for something of unusual and silly danger.
A hybrid transmission with standard manual-style gears and a torque converter sliced in half.
A bouquet of flowers.
The top half of an amp.
Underwear .
A covered pot, dripping with boilover.
A locomotive.
A very thick book with a bookmark.
The bow half of a boat's hull.
A slice of pizza.
The bottom half of an amp.
A number of childrens' books, placed in a slightly askew pile.
A dog sitting in a bowl.
An oven.
A microscope, upside down.
A frog.
A whale.
A stegosaurid.
A skull.
An envelope.
right eye blind spot. 
Moon.
Supermoon. 
 
We don't see much color outside the center of our vision - our brains keep track of what color things are and fill it in for us.
Left Eye Blind Spot. 
These tiny, darting spots, visible against smooth blue backgrounds, are white cells moving in the blood vessels over the retina]]
Some types of floaters are caused by breakdown of your eyeball goop as you age, but this type is some other kind of debris near the retina.  I don't know what.
Cone cells  don't work in low light, but rod cells  do.  This is why you can walk around in dim light, but not read.  It's also why you can spot fainter stars by looking next to them.
I can't believe you're so wrong. I'm backed by Snopes, Wikipedia, and a half-dozen journals.  You're citing .Net ppages with black backgrounds and like 20 fonts each.
It's sad how you buy into the official story so unquestioningly.  Guess some people prefer to stay asleep.
Watch closely - I'm about to win this argument.
how?
By *going down a waterslide*. 
So? what does that prove?
Wheeee..
You didn't win the argument!
...eeee <<sploosh>>
Forget the bedding - we were wrong about the whole valley.
The spreading is recent.
See the friction breccia?
Oh - flow cleavage! Deeper in the rift.
Deeper.
This orogeny
is driven by a
*huge*
*thrust* fault
Surprisingly erotic.
I, um, messed up my server again.
I'll take a look.  You have the *weirdest* tech problems
Device is not responding.
What did you *do*!?
Maybe the device is busy. Should I try it later?
You should shut down this system and wait for the Singularity.
The things I put up with...
You'd think by now I'd have learned never to trust anyone.
I officially give up.
Sighhhh
Where do you see yourself in five years?
Oh man, I don't know!  Let's find out!
Hah--
I 
 Am I smiling enough?  Should I be leaning on something?  Where should my hands go?  I hope he doesn't ask me what his name is.  I've said "yeah" too much; what are some other agreeing words?  Oh crap, his story just got sad 
Grammar!
Why is Michael Phelps in your backyard pool?
I don't know. He's been there all day.  Go home, Michael!
Woo! 18 gold medals!
Can you get him?
He's so *fast*!
Ha hah! Can't catch me! <<Splash splash>>
Oh crap.
the majority of Americans will be too young to remember:
The seventies
The Carter presidency
The Reagan shooting
The Falkland Islands war
Return of the Jedi release
The first Apple Macintosh
New Coke
Challenger
Chernobyl
Black Monday
The Reagan Presidency
The Berlin Wall
Hammertime
The Soviet Union
The LA Riots
Lorena Bobbit
The Forrest Gump release
The Rwandan Genocide
OJ Simpson's trial
Clinton's reelection
Princess Diana
Clinton's impeachment
Columbine
Forgot about Dre
9
VH1's I Love the 80s
A time before Facebook.
VH1's I Love the 90s
Hurricane Katrina
The planet Pluto
The first iPhone
The Bush presidency
Michael Jackson
trying to say "Eyjafjallajkull"
The Arab Spring
Anything embarrassing you do today.
..but thank you for applying. We'll keep your rsum on file.
Perhaps *this* could change your mind?
..but thank you for applying. We'll keep your rsum on file.
Perhaps *this* could change your mind?
I'm sorry..
- that opening has been filled
The thing to understand about the plastic crazy straw design world is that there are two main camps: The professionals - designing for established brands - and the hobbyists.  The hobbyist mailing lists are full of drama, with friction between the regulars and a splinter group focused on loops..
Don't worry - I've been tested.
...and you're clean?
So many questions!
Seriously!? *This* is what gets me? I wasted so many hours on WebMD worrying about the rash on my arm!
Excellent
OK
Crap.
..and on Tuesdays we offer endless wings.
Haha, cool.  i have those.
You what?
AAAAA!!
AAAAAAA
AAAAAAAA
Do you take this man to be your lawful wedded husband?
...no.
I'm not Amy. None of this was real. You're back in senior year. It's the big game.
What 
You should check us out. We're the fastest-growing religion in the country.
"Fastest-growing" is such a dubious claim.
It's true! We grew by 85% over the past year.
Hey, Rob -- wanna join my religion?
Sure, whatever.
Well, looks like my religion grew by 100% this year.
We have 38,000 members!
Hope they're all ok with second place.
How long do you zap these?
Two minutes.
Thanks!
It's ok, Nine. You are not forgotten.
What are you reading about?
Dinosaurs!
Oh, yeah.
They've gotten all weird since when I was a kid. They used to be awesome, but now they all have dorky feathers, right?
Yup!
This says they now think raptors used their wings for stability, flapping to stay on top of their prey while hanging on with their hooked claws and eating it alive.
Check out my personalized license plate!
"1I1-III1"?
No one will be able to correctly record my plate number! I can commit any crime I want!
Sounds foolproof.
The thief's license plate was all "1"s or something.
Oh. 
His address is on a post-it in the squad car.
Jan 1 - February 10
February 10 - April 20
April 20 - May 25
May 25 - June 15
June 15 - August 20
August 20 - October 5
October 5 - October 20
October 20 - December 31
Jan 1 - December 31
OOOOOOOOOOOOooooo
A ghost!?
I bring a 
This is the future:
And 
They looked exactly the same.
OOOOOOOOOOOooooo
Ok, I get it.
Seriously, this is 
From the stories
I expected the world to be sad
And it was
And I expected it to be wonderful.
It was.
I just didn't expect it to be so 
All Hollywood is in town or tonight's star-studded premier! We go live to our reporter on the red carpet. How do things look?
Bleak. In 800 million years, the aging, brightening sun will boil away the oceans, and all this will be blowing sand.
Oh. Um.  ..sounds pretty grim.  How are the stars reacting?
Hydrogen fusion. But it won't last forever.
They won't last forever either. None of us will.
Why'd you move your knight away?
Just think 
I guess occasionally you need to move backward, but it'd be trivial to make a list of those circumstances and--
Have you ever 
Not buch, but--
Wanna?
Uh, ok.
Checkmate.
This game isn't very well-designed. For starters, knights are too weak...
Good cop. It's a real shame - he was just one day away from getting put in the locked, heavily-guarded room where all cops stay for the last day before they retire.
This sword was forged from a fallen star. Antimony impurities make the blade surprisingly 
And 
When orcs are near?
No, always. Radiation from the Actinum content. 
...does it have eldritch powers?
It gives the wielder +2 to cancer risk.
I think we should find another shop.
What are you doing?
Clinging to the ceiling of a bottomless abyss.
You are very odd.
What's wrong?
I looked down.
Oh -- hello down there!
Welcome to my sky!
It's pretty good.
I like it.
It's not the same color as 
Wow!
There are a 
Good thing it's so big.
And what do 
I'm in the cloud storage business.
Remember when we prosecuted Microsoft for bundling a browser with an OS?
Imagine the future we'd live in if we'd been willing to let one tech company amass that much power.
Thank god we nipped 
... No, but see, it's a movie 
Sounds like masturbatory navel-gazing.
No, it's about blurring the line between metaphor and reality.
You just don't know much about art.
I know 
... huh?
Hey, I lost the server password.  What is it, again?
It's -- ...wait.  How do I know it's really you?
Ooh, good question!  I bet we can construct a cool proof-of-identity protocol.  I'll start by picking two random--
Oh good; it's you.  Here's the psasword...
Alliterative tickets  are undefeated.
No nominee whose first name contains a "K" has lost.
The window of opportunity for strengthening should close in 12-24 hr.
Slow but steady weakening is expected to begin in 12-24 hours.
Epsilon does not appear weaker.
Epsilon has been upgraded to a 65-kt hurricane.
Epsilon has continued to strengthen against all odds . . .  can not maintain the current intensity much longer since the environment is becoming increasingly unfavorable.
Epsilon might or might not still be a hurricane . . . but in any case it likely will not be one on Sunday.
Epsilon is downgraded to a tropical storm. 
Morning satellite images indicate that Epsilon has restrengthened.
The cloud pattern continues to be remarkably well-organized for a hurricane at such high latitude
We have said this before . . . but Epsilon really does not appear as strong this evening as it did this afternoon.
The end is in sight. It really really is. But in the meantime . . . Epsilon continues to maintain hurricane status. 
The end is in sight . . . yes . . . but not quiet yet. I thought I was going to find a weakening system and instead I found that Epsilon is still a hurricane.
Convection has vanished and Epsilon is now a tight swirl of low clouds.
An elongated area of low pressure . . . which ahd its origins in an old frontal trough . . . began developing organized convection overnight. Advisories are initiated on the 27th tropical storm of 2005.
Although the atmosphere seems to want to develop tropical storms ad nauseam . . . the calendar will shortly put an end to the use of the Greek alphabet to name them.
Zeta appeared on the verge of losing all of its deep convection a few hours ago . . . but since about 21z the convection has been on somewhat of an increase again.
This is like Epsilon all over again. Most of the conventional guidance suggested that zeta should have been dissipated by now . . . well . . . zeta is pretty much alive at this time. 
By 24-36 hours . . . a significant increase in westerly winds . . . should act to shear away most of the associated convection . . . and finally bring the 2005 Atlantic hurricane season to a merciful ending.
It is hard to conceive that a tropical cyclone will be able to survive for very long in such a hostile environment. therefore I have not backed off on the forecast of weakening.
Zeta is stronger than yesterday.
As you can see. . . I ran out of things to say.
Satellite intensity estimates have decreased. Zeta is downgraded to a 30 kt tropical depression.
Shortly after the previous advisory had been issued . . . regretfully . . . the intensity . . . increased to 35 kt and Zeta is a tropical storm once again.
Although it seems as if Zeta will never die . . . the forecast continues to show weakening.
Zeta no longer meets the criteria of a tropical cyclone. . . which means that both it and the 2005 Atlantic hurricane season have ended. 
Actually, Zeta's cloud pattern is
 NO.
Ok. 
This Tuesday will be huge! If Obam wins the election, it could generate news coverage 
...maybe you should take a break.
To surprise of pundits, numbers continue to be best system for determining which of two things is larger.
This neutrino detector measures whether the sun has gone nova.
Then, it rolls two dice. If they both come up as six, it lies to us.  Otherwise, it tells the truth.
Let's try.  Detector! Has the sun gone nova?
<<roll>> YES.
The probability of this result happening by chance is 1
Bet you $50 it hasn't.
The boat only holds two, but you can't leave the goat with the cabbage or the wolf with the goat.
1. Take the goat across
Oops.  Guess this means seven more years of the illusion that my actions somehow influence the indifferent hand of probability which governs our lives.
Plus like half an hour of sweeping.
No, I think I'll leave it.
You'll get glass in your feet.
Eccles. 9:2 - All things come alike to all: To the clean, and to the unclean.
My fate is as these shards.
Dude, chill, it's just a vanity mirror.
And that's not even the worst part! The 
<<U+202e>>
...neve t'ndid yeht--
?lleh eht tahw... ...uoy did woh
.elohssa...
The business implications are clear.
Whatchya reading, hatboy?
The CRC Handbook of Chemistry and Physics.
You are such a loser, it's 
I'm rubber, you're glue.
Yeah, well--
You try to scream, but your mouth fills with glue.
Your face is glue.  Your body is glue.
I wrap my rubber arms around your sticky bulk.
Your neoprene base bonds instantly with my surface.
Never to let go.
You are glue. I am rubber.
Staring at you with my dead, rubber eyes--
Moooom!
Oh god.
How long can it take to read a scan?
"ZARG" isn't a word.
But 
...ok, fine.
So next year you should come visit us in the moun... .
 "Next Year"
Hey - you're doing science, and you're still alive.
Yeah!
It's really only been two years?
They were big years.
Happy.. anniversary?
Biopsy-versary!
...eww.
Man, the coverage in here is 
 Hey, party tonight? We'd all love to come see your new place!
Wait, what?
We want to hang out!
 We're not, like, good friends.
I know, but we were thinking about it and we really like you! 
 You should have us over tonight! For, like, an hour. It'll be fun!
Well, uh, sure. 
Mommy, why is the sky blue?
Rayleigh scattering! Short wavelengths get scattered 
Oh. So why 
Well, because, uh... ...hmm.
I mean, let's be honest here--
Ok. 
I don't understand why anything happens and I'm confused and scared and trying really hard all the time.
...too honest. Scale it back.
Sorry.
Aww, crap.
I have nothing to offer but
blood, toil, tears, sweat,
spit, bile, vomit, urine,
Bring me the broomstick of the wicked witch of the West and I'll take you home. 
Got it. 
You can have the slippers if you let me borrow your broom.
Deal.
That was easy. 
I've been putting all my stuff in Chad's Garage. He has nice shelves. And he lets me in to see it whenever I want. 
But I just got this note from him:
Dude, in like a month im gonna Craigslist all that shit you left in my garage. Just FYI. -- Chad
It's an *outrage*! This is no way to run a storage business! 
Are you paying him to look after your stuff? 
No.
Then what he runs isn't a storage business.
Well, I'm *this* close to not giving him any more stuff. 
That'll teach him. 
Pour
Pour
All my presents appear to be gram-negative. 
I wish you hadn't opened the home bio lab kit first. 
How was Christmas? Did you go to church? 
Yup. We celebrated the birth of a child, then we ate of his flesh and blood. 
*Seriously* hope we got the right child this time. 
My client couldn't have killed anyone with this arrow, and I can *prove* it! 
I'd like to examine your proof, Zeno. You may approach the bench. 
 But never reach it! 
I'm scared of being stuck  thinking I'm fixing things about myself but never actually changing. 
My 2013 resolution is to break out of loops. To recognize when I'm not making progress, stop yelling at myself, and try a different approach. 
Wasn't that also your resolution last year?
Yeah, but *this* year's gonna be different. 
How do I get to your place from Lexington? 
Hmm... OK, starting from your driveway, take every left that doesn't put you on a prime-numbered highway or street named for a president. 
Leave this device in your yard for a week, then watch as the problem of loud music from passing cars solves itself.
Imagine a giant bowling ball on a rubber sheet. The ball's weight makes a dent in the sheet. 
Now imagine a rope that pulls the ball down even further. ...Annnnd...
Wheee
... Oh. I thought this was about physics. 
Imagining is fun! 
What's that? 
Countdown. 
To what? 
Supervolcano, I think. I forget which one.
Maybe we should move that picture? 
Too hard to reach. It's probably fine. 
http:
 123-4567
An invisible sneeze droplet can contain *200 million* germs! 
Our hand sanitizer kills 99.99% of germs! 
Ew. 
I don't understand how my brain works. 
But my brain is what I rely on to understand how things work. 
Is that a problem? 
I'm not sure how to tell. 
Ow!!
Waaaaaaaaa!
age-reversed Home Alone reboot.
Estimated outflow volume in cubic meters per second
Oh, *wow*. Look at Wikipedia's talk page for Star Trek into Darkness. I have a new favorite edit war. 
Oh? 
Forty *thousand* words of debate over whether to capitalise "into" in the movie's title. Still no consensus.
That's *magnificient*.
It's breathtaking. 
They should have sent a poet. 
Rob! You use Unix! 
Come quick! 
... Rob? 
I'm so sorry. 
Departed the mouth of the Lena river, heading south. It has been nearly half an hour and still no sign of civilisation. The scroll wheel tempts me, but I will not cheat. 
No, you can't go. 
But all my friends-
Oh Jeez. Probably.
What!? Why!?
Every single person I know, many of them levelheaded and afraid of heights, abruptly went crazy at exactly the same time... ... or the bridge is on fire? 
... I, uh... hmm. 
Imagine reading this on CNN: "Many fled their vehicles and jumped from the bridge. Those who stayed behind..." Is something good about to happen to those people? 
Maybe they'll find cookies? 
OK, *you* stay. I'm jumping. 
If you're havin' Perl problems I feel bad for you, son-
I got 99 problems, 
so I used regular expressions. 
Now I have 100 problems. 
Explain to me this "steroid scandal"
Well, uh... We humans are made of chemical which stay alive by finding other chemicals and putting them inside us
We hold contests to see which humans are fastest and strongest. But some humans eat chemicals that make them *too* fast and strong.
And they win contests!
That does sound bad.
It's awful!
Ready? 
Ready. 
*He's* not so bad, but his friends...
... His band is never gonna take off if...
Yeah, his sister is even weirder. Did you see she had...
... And there's a video, but it's blurry...
What're you talking about? 
Giant squid! 
Mind if I join you? 
I'm from the future! You're being stalked by an unstoppable robotic assassin!
Of course, in a sense, we're *all* being stalked by an unstoppable robot. A robot called *time*.
I see it in the mirror. I see wrinkles, grey hairs. I hear its metallic footsteps in the relentless rhythm of the ticking clock. 
Anyway, uhh come with me if you want to live for a while. You'll still die eventually. We all will.
What've you been up to lately? 
I've been hanging out with some pickup artists. I'm learning a *lot!*
Oh, that sounds like fun! 
Computer problems that make people say "Maybe it has a virus?" 
Computer problems caused by viruses
Hey look-- Rembrandt's parents having sex!
Waugh! Why do you--
It's an artist's conception.
Well, you know what they say. The past is a foreign country-
-with an outdated military and huge oil reserves! Hmmm...
Hey.
<<Musical notes>>
What's that? 
<<Musical notes>>
Why are you humming? 
<<Musical notes>>
Should I know the tune??
<<Musical notes>>
...Hmm...
Identify song. Recorded
<<Musical notes>>
Identifying...
But nothing about Tiananmen Square.
Let's block Canada
Sounds good.
WHICH ONE
FORGET IT
RIDING THE L ALL NIGHT LONG
What does "make dog" do?
Experimental dog generator. Don't click on it; the default size isn't set, so-
Uh oh.
come closer
Identify Song Recorded > Live 
Listening ...
4'33" John Cage
1 day, 2 hours, 30 minutes, 4 minutes, 1 minute, 5 seconds.
5 days, 12 hours, 2 hours, 21 minutes, 5 minutes, 25 seconds.
4 weeks, 3 days, 12 hours, 2 hours, 30 minutes, 2 minutes.
8 weeks, 6 days, 1 day, 4 hours, 1 hour, 5 minutes.
9 months, 4 weeks, 6 days, 21 hours, 5 hours, 25 minutes.
n
n
n
n
I'm currently conducting an experiment which may prove Einstein wrong!
Ooh, exciting!
It's IMPOSSIBLE to find a good sandwich in this town.
What's that?
It's a drone for my new business, AirAware.
I'll be there in five.
WRONG!
Augh!
That sounds annoying. Who would pay for that?
Huh? Nobody pays. I'm just making these and releasing them.
That's not a business. You're just yelling at strangers from the sky.
A business has to make money somehow.
WRONG!
Augh!!
Ignore this
Increment by 2 before following
Not true
Ibid.
True
Actually a 1
Footnote Labyrinths
No, the combining diacritics go OVER the interrobang!
Oh jeez, I think he's lost control.
MONKEY TACOS! I'm so random!
Me too!
"I'm on a boat!"
"The cake is a lie!" "o
I can haz? 
"Leave Britney alone!" "o
"Chuck Norris doesn't sleep. He 
"o
"I 
"
"Ninjas fight 
"...God kills a kitten!" "A what?"
"You're the man now, dog!"
"All your base are belong to us."
"Peanut Butter Jelly Time!"
"My spoon is too big!"
"
"Look at the tiny dancing Earth mammals!"
"WASSSUUP!?!"
"Oh my God, they killed Kenny!" "You bastards!"
"Welcome to Good Burger, home of the Good Burger." "What's a burger? "I don't know."
"Mr. T ate my balls!"
"Oh ... my ... gaawd." 
"I want the truth." "
"Hasta la vista, baby." 
Did 
"D'oh!"
"Yippie-ki-yay, motherfucker."
"Resistance is futile."
"Let's get ready to ruuumble!"
"Where's the beef?"
"I pity the fool!"
"May the Force be with you."
"Nobody expects the Spanish Inquisition!"
"You talkin' to 
"I'm going to make him an offer he can't refuse."
"You've got to ask yourself one question: 'Do I feel lucky?'"
"And now for something completely different."
"Live long and prosper." "Ok." 
"
"Name's bond. James Bond."
"Take me to your leader!" "No, Steve."
Here's lookin' at you, kid." 
"Rosebud."
"Ehh, what's up doc?"
"Frankly, my dear, I don't give a damn."]]
 This one's easy; There's the Parthenon. Athens.
Maybe before we rush to adopt
Did you hear what he said about me!?
Well, remember: sticks and stones may break my bones, but words--
Can make someone else feel happy or sad, which is literally the only thing that matters in this stupid world?
Right?
The world isn't *that* bad.
Explain the line about sticks and stones?
... OK, maybe it's kind of horrific.
I've got it! What's the Elvish word for friend?
So what's the Elvish word for "frenemy"? 
...
Six guard rails have erratic reflector placement, and one even lacks reflectors entirely, despite rule G31.02 clearly mandating consistent usage.
...
You're both confused.
He's just "The Doctor".
What've you been up to?
Definitely not spending every day consumed with worry over stupid things I never talk to anyone about.
Oh, yeah, me neither.
That's good.
Yeah.
If the corporate surveillance state monitors and controls every aspect of my life...
We do.
And I play Dwarf Fortress all day...
You do. 
Then you're effectively Dwarf Fortress players watching your dwarves play Dwarf Fortress. 
... Oh God. 
..then it is settled.  We the 300 members of the Secret Council decree that this video meets our standards and shall "go viral".
send it to one of our agents to be leaked to the common folk.
Some of them are noticing the number.
..add a plus sign to throw them off.
very well.
Ooh! check out this great video I found!
Internet.
Augh!
Ancient and Modern
A Comprehensive Summary of the Press Throughout the World, volume 18
Prometheus has stolen fire from the Gods! 
Well, sort of. I mean, when you use a fire to make another fire, the first fire doesn't go away. So really, it's more like sharing.
I've discovered an Earth-sized planet in a star's habitable zone! It even has oceans! And visible weather! 
We shouldn't be exploring other planets until we've solved all our problems here on Earth.
Sounds reasonable. So, what's the timeline on "Solving all problems"? Ten years? Fifteen?
If I were traveling at the speed of light, my butt would look *awesome*.
... We generated video signals with a cathode ray tube... We have a pointing device we call a "mouse"... I can "copy" text... ... and we have powerful join file editing... underneath the file here we can exchange "direct messages"...
... Users can share files... ... files which can encode audio samples, using our "masking codecs"... The file you're hearing now is one of my own compositions...
I heard there was a secret chord
... And you can superimpose text on the picture of the cat, like so... This cat is saying "YOLO", which stands for "You Only Live Once"... ...Just a little acronym we thought up...
Statistically speaking, if you pick up a seashell and don't hold it to your ear, you can probably hear the ocean.
To achieve *Internet Enlightenment*, you must free yourself from insecurity. 
But insecurity keeps me humble!
No. Insecurity leads to conceit.  Conceit leads to judgment.  Judgment leads to being an asshole.
I'm ready, How do I begin?
Type this sentence: "I heard you're idea's and their definately good"
She wasn't ready.
Its a difficult road.
NASA has confirmed that the asteroid is headed directly for us.  Yes, a question?
What role has social media played in this asteroid's orbit?
*sigh*
Has Twitter changed the way we respond to asteroid threats?  
Well, it's made the press conference questions stupider.
Fascinating!
What about Facebook?
But dogs can observe the world, which means that according to quantum mechanics they 
You can safely ignore any sentence that includes the phrase "According to quantum mechanics"
Augh!
Oh, I've gotta take this.
They said on the news that they found a giant ring lying in a field outside Chicago. Strung with some kind of superstrong mesh. 
Mhm? 
Then they found a 260-mile long shaft connected to the ring, running from Chicago to St. Louis. In St. Louis they found a gigantic winch. 
Did they. 
It sounds kind of like... ...a butterfly net. 
... Are you planning to catch the International Space Station?
I'm planning to catch *an* international space station. Not sayin' which. 
Is it going to rain this weekend? I have a thing. 
Lemme check.
... Uhh. What? 
... Oh! You typed a minus sign in the zip code. The negative zip codes are all like that. 
Let's *never* move there. 
Consider this pale blue dot. That's here. That's home. That's us. Everyone you love, every human being who ever was, every saint and sinner in the history of our species lived out their lives on this mote of dust suspended in a sunbeam. All our-
I think that's a stuck pixel. We're the speck on the left. 
... OK, *this* pale blue dot is everything you-
-No, you were right before. *That* one is Earth.
LOOK, IT DOESN'T MATTER! 
I *knew* it! 
I think this is just a lens cap picture. 
How are you?
Trapped on the surface of a sphere
That astronomy class has made you suck at small talk.
The universe is too *big* for small talk.
Uhh, is everything OK?
Dude, what the Hell?
Police. Open up. Did you make this glasses attachment?
Oh, yeah. 
What's it do? 
It detects when someone near you is wearing Google Glass and shines a laser pointer at their eyepiece.
Why??
The best defense is an indiscriminate offense. 
It seems you've mailed these devices to people across Silicon Valley, including the children of every Google executive. 
Yeah. It's a viral marketing campaign for an upcoming movie. 
What movie?
haven't decided yet. Anything good coming out this fall?
Sir, open the door. 
First stare at the peephole for a sec. 
We should go to the north beach. Someone said the south beach has a 20% higher risk of shark attacks. 
Yeah, but statistically, taking three beach trips instead of two increases our odds of getting shot by a swimming dog carrying a handgun in its mouth by 50%! 
Oh no! This is our third trip! 
A 50% increase in a tiny risk is still tiny. 
The Internation Astronomical Union decides to start naming exoplanets, and - for the first time ever - asks for suggestions from the general public. 
Can't you filter out the worst ones? 
This is *after* the filter!
Sorry for the voicemail, but I'm confused about how to reach you. 
When I text you, you reply once on GChat, then go quiet, yet answer IRC right away. I emailed you, and you replied on Skype and mentioned that the email "woke you up." 
You're very responsive - I just have no sense of how you use technology. 
?!?
did you try to call me? use my google voice number next time. 
Everyone said the world was flat, but Columbus knew it was round. 
<<Sigh>> No, no, no. 
So he took his ships and sailed west in a line tangent to the surface. The sea fell away, and he landed in *Valinor*. 
A Silmaril on his brow, he wanders the heavens as the morning star, still believing he reached India. 
Stop making stuff up. 
You first. 
Why aren't my arms growing
Why are there ghosts
Why are there squirrels
Why is sex so important.]]
Why aren't there guns in Harry Potter
It's as long as a football field. Runs as fast as a cheetah.
Weighs as much as a blue whale. 
Can we negotiate with it? 
No. It has the intelligence of a two-year-old child. 
After a couple of unbearable decades, the "first post" thing seems to be dying a quiet death. 
*Shh*. You'll jinx it.
There are these orchids whose flowers look like female bees. When males try to mate with them, they transfer pollen. 
This orchid - Ophrys Apifera - makes flowers, but no bees land on them because the bee it mimics went extinct long ago. 
Without its partner, the orchid has resorted to self-pollinating, a last-ditch genetic strategy that only delays the inevitable. Nothing of the bee remains, but we know it existed from the shape of this flower. 
It's an idea of what the female bee looked like to the male bee... ... as interpreted by a plant.
Wow, so...
I'll remember your bee, orchid. I'll remember you. 
Shake what your mama gave you
???
Bye! 
May the Force be with you!
Huh?
It's just something my grandma used to say. No idea what it means.
Looks like computers will beat humans at Go pretty soon. 
Wow. That's the last of the big ones. 
Yeah. 
Well, at least humans are still better at, uh, coming up with reassuring parables about things humans are better at?
Hmm.
I made a Python script that generates thousands of reassuring parables per second.
Dammit.
Computers will never understand a sonnet computers will never enjoy a salad comp-
I will *never*...
... want to browse a series of images...
... like this. 
Sorry it's such a disaster in here.
 whoa- what's wrong with me?
Mmm...
No! What are you *doing*!?
"Privacy" is an impractical way to think about data in a digital world so unlike the one in which our soci-
SO BORED.
My data is safe behind six layers of symmetric and public-key algorithms.
What data is it? 
Mostly me emailing with people about cryptography. 
These leaks are just the tip of the iceberg. There's a warehouse in Utah where the NSA has the *entire* iceberg. I don't know how they got it there. 
Joke's on them. Gathering all this data on me as if anything I do means anything. 
Mmmm, I sure hope the NSA isn't watching me bite into these juicy strawberries!! Oops, I dropped some on my shirt! Better take it off. Google, are you there? Google, this lotion feels soooo good. 
Um. 
I don't know or care what data *anyone* has about me. Data is imaginary. This burrito is real.
Why do you like functional programming so much? What does it actually *get* you? 
Tail recursion is its own reward.
This is Shadowfacts, lord of all horses, and he-
The outer part of a shadow is called the penumbra!
Shut up.
The Freemasons, The Illuminati, Scientology, FEMA, The New World Order, The Federal Reserve, Citigroup, Halliburton, Google, The Vatican, Bilderburg, Walmart, The Rothschilds, The Knights Templar, HAARP, The UN, Skull & Bones, Bohemian Grove, The Koch Brothers, George Soros, The Trilateral Commission, The Knights of Malta, The CFR, Exxon Mobil, The Zionists, The Vril Society, The Lizard People, and everyone else who secretly controls the US Government
the number "3" is cursed. Avoid it.
This Ayn Random number generator you wrote *claims* to be fair, but the output is biased towards certain numbers. 
Well, maybe those numbers are just intrinsically better!
Yes, I know it would make sense if that were your email address, but it's not. 
But how did you get my number? 
Your phone bill. 
It's day five of the trade summit, and still no...
Dammit
... and my yard has so much grass, and I'll teach you tricks, and...
Did you get my texts? 
You should install this keyboard I found. 
What? Why? Is it better than SwiftKey?
In some ways. 
Ok, installing... It's not working. The key area is blank-I can't type anything. 
... Hey.
Everyone who pirated Photoshop.}}Man, that is ridicu-fucking-...
... hang on, I inserted "Fucking" too late and now there's just one awkward syllable left. Can I back up? 
Students, shoot for the moon. If you miss, 
SHOOT AGAIN. Keep shooting and never stop. 
Someday, one of us will destroy that stupid skycircle. And- ... What? What are you all-
... It's right behind me, isn't it? Shit. Everyone act casual. 
What do you.. *do*?
We make stuff for phones! Like apps and stickers!
We want to hire you to write on our computers.  we can offer you a bunch of paychecks! There are ghosts here.
..are you sure this is a company?
I hope so!
Have you noticed that bright dot in the distance? 
Yeah. What's the deal with it? 
Dunno. I'm gonna go check it out. 
Wow. Do not go over there.
Check it out! 
What? 
I've got Galilean moons! 
Hi! 
Hi! 
What's your name? 
Hi! 
What's your-
MOOOOOON!
Hi! 
What's your name? 
Ugh
Hi! 
So annoying
Hi! 
What's y-
MOOOOOON.
Hi! 
...Almost... ...Almoooost...
Hi! 
What's your name? 
Yessss!
We go live to our 2013: Year in review!
Thanks! In 2013, I didn't see an aurora.
I- what?
The northern lights. I thought this would finally be the year. But it didn't happen. 
Oh. Uh... what about the rest of the year? 
What do you mean? 
Any big news stories? 
Oh yeah, tons. 
... Well, that was 2013: Year in review.
The sky's clearing up. I'll be outside. 
OK, Glass, check tomorrow's weather. Ooh, snow! 
Oh my God, it's somehow even more annoying than if you had it. 
12 best drummers of all time
11 pipers whose jaw-droppingly good piping will make you cry
You won't believe what these 10 lords leap over
Why are you turning the pages like that? 
If I touch the wrong thing, I'll lose my place and have to start over.
Code written in Haskell is guaranteed to have no side effects.
...because no one will ever run it?
You try to matchone one group but not the other. 
Cool. 
So I wrote a program that plays regex golf with arbitrary lists...
Uh oh...
...but I lost my code, so I'm grepping for files that look like regex golf solvers. 
Really, this is all 
Now you have infinite problems. 
No, I had those already. 
Ugh, I hate how people take pictures instead of just enjoying the view. 
Why? 
Documenting your live distracts you from living it. You're not really-
Oh, come on. 
Trying to take a picture of a thing makes me pay more attention to it. Some of my best adventures are built around trying to photograph something.
If "other people having experiences incorrectly" is annoying to you, think how unbearable it must be to have a condescending stranger tell you they hate the way you're experiencing your life at just the moment you've found something you want to remember. Why the fuck do you care how someone else enjoys a sunset? 
Well, they... Because I just, uh... ...
<<Click>>
Horace Lamb said he would have two questions for God: Why quantum mechanics, and why turbulence? 
I'd have just one: What did Miss Susie's steamboat DO?!
Argh! 
What? 
Why do I always have these inexplicable, impossible-to-diagnose computer problems? 
After six hours of this, I've concluded nothing works or makes sense. I give up on logic. 
<<sigh>>Gimme. I'll figure it out. 
You won't. 
How'd it go? 
Your computer is literally haunted. 
Told you. 
I feel paralyzed by overwhelming existential dread. ...And yet for some reason I'm really excited about space? 
Actually, measurements suggest it's flat.
Actually, it's a sphere.
Actually, it's an oblate spheroid.
Actually, it's a shape defined by the EGM96 coefficients.
Actually, it's that plus local topography.
Actually, it's embedded in a universe that's curved.
Oh, uh, hi! Funny running into you here.
Oh, hey! Yeah! How've you been?
It is brutal out. So much for global warming, huh?
This used to happen all the time.
What?
You're from St. Louis, right? On average, it used to get below 0F there a handful of days per year. But you haven't had a day like that since the nineties.
Then, in 2014, when the first polar vortex hit, it dipped below zero for two days. And everyone freaked out because what used to be normal now feels too cold.
It is too cold!
Look at this - ice! In St. Louis! So much for global warming.
The sky is cold and the floor water is too hard to drink.
But I have my handcoats and the spacelight is warm.
Listen - the flappy planes are beeping in the stick towers.
Those are all the wrong words for those things.
Maybe - but the things themselves are all right. So who cares?
Alice sends a message to Bob saying to meet her somewhere.
Uh huh.
But Eve sees it, too, and goes to the place.
With you so far.
Bob is delayed, and Alice and Eve meet.
Yeah?
So, how 'bout this weather?
I know, right? The whole jet stream layer is nuts!
Um, sure...
The 18z GFS forecasts 960MB by Tuesday, Think it'll verify?
What?
...right. Sorry. Uh, yeah. Weather sure has been crazy.
Women 
--guys who respond to rejection by belittling their judgment and self-awareness?  If so, don't worry -- you'll be 
The prisoner escaped and is swimming toward the mainland!
Yes, sir.
The sharks are swimming away.
They're escaping, too? Send sharks after them!
Now 
... sir, what's going on?
Prisoners, of course! Can't let 'em escape!
Sir, are you trying to turn Doom Island into a marine biology center?
*ahem*
I mean, the world must fear us!
Right...
CNN hired you to improve viewership.
...yes, and?
You texted "holy crap, turn on the news" to a million random phone numbers?
It sure did work.
Not what we meant!
Humans aren't built to sit all day. This is much healthier.
one-upping the standing desk people.
Ever hear of the Kola borehole? 
No - what's that? 
A Soviet project to drill deap into the earth's crust. 
There's a hoax report claiming that their drill broke through into a superhot cavern, and when they lowered a microphone into the hole, they heard tormented screaming. People say that's why the miners sealed the well and abandoned the project.
Why would anyone believe that story? 
I guess some people think Hell is literally an underground place. 
No - I mean, why would the miners seal the opening? Why not just dig a canal connecting it to the ocean? Unless they like Hell.
... If there's ever a war between earth and Hell, I hope I'm on your side. 
You seem nice; you probably won't be. 
Yeah, but if I'm considerate toward one person about one thing, what's next? Being nice to other people about other things? Where does it end? 
So, did you grow up around here? 
I love you.
... huh? 
Waiter! One of everything on the menu. 
Why are you up there? 
I'm stuck. This plate looks delicious. Aaaoogaoag.
Bye. OK. Coming back now. 
You're being controlled by Twitch, aren't you? 
Check out this cool spiral! 
It's-
SAVING.
Greetings, stranger. Whatever quest drives you, abandon it. You shall find no answers in these desolate wastes.
I knew I wouldn't. I guess I... just had to see.
xkcd.com
Transform!
We could sent it on a new mission... except we no longer have the equipment to send commands to it.
Can't we-
NASA won't rebuild it. "Too expensive."
Seriously?
I know, right? So the internet found the specs and we went to work.
We've convinced them to give us time on the Madrid DSN transmitter and hacked the maser to support the uplink. And today's the big day.
Transmitting... We have a signal! We have control!
Okay, transmit the new comet rendezvous maneuver sequen-
What the hell?
My console went dead!
Mine too!
What's happening?
There's a new signal going out over the transmitter!
A bug?
Someone else is in the system!
Kill the connection!
I can't find it!
They're firing the probe's engines!
No!!
Who's doing this?? Stop them!
I'm trying!
Look! My screen!
Crash?
Yeah, Burn?
Make a wish.
You 
You know what happens when you assume--
I don't.  Yet you're confidently asserting that I do.
...Oh. Hm.
Check and mate.
Whoa, it's 2014-03-10! Under our system, that date will *never happen again!!*
pointing this out every day.
Just think - the light from that start was emitted thousands of years ago. It could be long gone.
That's Sirius. It's eight light-years away.
Oh.
Just think - the light from that star was emitted in the previous presidential administration.
Hmm, doesn't pack quite the punch.
The talk is in room 8224.
Ooh, nice.
What?
...sorry. Nothing.
Humans are defined by our curiosity, our hunger for answers.
We all spend a third of our lives lying down with our eyes closed and *nobody knows why.*
...touch.
It would start with five minutes of peeling lint from dryer traps, followed by an hour of pressing a lightsaber handle against things and switching it on. Then I'd retire to a life of luxury.
hmm
...nope.
Do you remember before the internet?
Oh yeah, totally.
What was it like?
Not having a phone or computer to distract you?
Yeah.
It was SO. BORING. All the time. I just *sat* there. It was the *worst*.
But wasn't it, like, more fulfilling? Engaging?
Wasn't worth it.
I still get bored.
Not like we did.
What I'm trying to do is really simple. It shouldn't be hard.
All computers are just carefully organized sand. 
Maybe I should turn this one 
I'll find a blowtorch.
When metamaterials
Alter their hue.
What was before the Big Bang?
I think time began with the Big Bang. So it doesn't make sense to ask what came before it.
Look out!
Wheeeee hi I'm a cosmologist on a tire swing!
We don't know whether time--
--started at the Big Bang.
It might have!
Or maybe not! We don't know!
Oh. Ok!
...your tire swing looks fun!
I can't stop!
Won't the swing stop on its own?
I thought it would but it seems to be accelerating.
Cosmology sounds pretty confusing.
Wheeeee!
Heartbleed must be the worst web security lapse ever.
Worst so far. Give us time.
I mean, this bg isn't just broken encryption. It lets website visitors make a server dispense random memory contents.
It's not just keys. It's traffic data. Emails. Passwords. Erotic fanfiction.
Is 
Well, the attack is limited to data stored in computer memory.
So paper is safe. And clay tablets.
Our imaginations, too.
See, we'll be fine.
Server, are you still there? If so, reply "POTATO" .
Hmm...
Server, are you still there? IF so, reply "HAT" .
Breaking into airplane hangars and replacing the ads on their giant banners with cool facts.
Public Service Announcehment: The *right to free speech* means the government can't arrest you for what you say.
It doesn't mean that anyone 
The 1st Amendment doesn't shield you from criticism or consequences.
If you're yelled at, boycotted, have your show canceled, or get banned from an internet community, your free speech rights aren't being violated.
It's just that the people listening think you're an asshole,
And they're showing you the door.
Got him. - Left edge, two inches down.
You okay down there?
Oh my god. I wrote *poetry*.
The rumors are true. Google will be shutting down Plus--
along with Hangouts, Photos, Voice, Docs, Drive, Maps, Gmail, Chrome, Android, and Search--
to focus on our core project:
the 8.8.8.8 DNS server.
When the French navy retired Morse code in 1997, they broadcast a final message: - 
I wonder if I can find my Livejournal login.
Hey I 
It's a nice place to go for some peace and quiet, I suppose.
makes airplane noise when flights pass overhead
What've you been up to?
Doing tons of math for my thesis.
Can you explain it like I'm five?
"Oh my God, where are your parents?"
Imprinted on the sky
Are the gravity waves that were sloshing across the universe.
When it was 
So really, we're using the entire universe
As a giant microscope
Pointed at itself when it was small.
That's neat.
Yeah. But...
But what?
Well, look.
Oh. Hmm.
Yeah.
What...
I don't know.
... Almost ...
Installing things has gotten so fast and painless.
Why not skip it entirely, and make a phone that has every app "installed" already and just downloads and runs them on the fly?
... And he went on to design the Gateway Arch, one of the most recognizable arches in St. Louis.
Reporters unnecessarily hedging with "One of the"
Ugh, TMI.
Oh? What?
Just...
Everything.
I can't imagine anyone who grew up on the Internet being able to run for President.
Why?
Because it'd mark the handover of a world that no longer needs you to a generation you don't understand?
... or because there would be embarrassing pictures of us as teenagers?
Um.
The pictures one?
Pictures of teens!  How will we even survive?
Based on this decrease in the star's brightness, I believe it is orbited by at least one planet.
Imagine that you're drawing at random from an urn containing fifteen balls--six red and nine black.
Ok.  I reach in and... 
I... what?
...I 
The Fermi Paradox keeps getitng worse. If planets are common, where 
Imagine you're a SCUBA diver looking at the ocean floor.
You know there's a fish there, but you can't see it.  Why?
Maybe the fish looks like sand.
Yeah ...
... And what would that tell you about the ecosystem?
I'll hold up a big kite, and you blow air at me until I lift off!
What do you think of that idea?
I'm not a huge fan.
Hi!
Hi. I'm music's Brian Eno, co-founder of the Long Now Foundation.
As part of our mission to promote long-term thinking, we've asked experts to help us assemble a collection of books from which civilization can be rebuilt if it ever collapses.
Today, we're sharing the results--the first ever 
*Ahem* 
The Invasion
The Visitor
The Encounter
... Are they 
No! There's also 
Ow.
Can you repeat "Story water paper doorway" at the start, then switch to "Disarm Adele's giraffe grenade" as we get going, and finally "Strawberry scorpion poetry" as I finish?
The distant planet Krypton is becoming unstable!
WAAAAAA
That crying baby is really annoying.
Every day I make a little leaf boat, then I throw rocks until it sinks or floats away.
Every day, I read the comments on a news article.
Well, you know, people are stupid.
*sigh*
No, people aren't stupid. On average, people are of average intelligence. When you say "people are stupid," you mean stupid compared to 
What you're really saying is "other people aren't as smart as 
Bye! See you tonight!
Have a good day!
Sweet! I finally got my subduction license!
Your what?
...what are you doing?
STOP IT! STOP IT!
AUGH!
Facebook shoudn't choose what stuff they show us to conduct unethical psychological research. - They should 
...getting reports that the darkness has spread as far west as Texas. Let's go live to our reporter in Houston.
It's been thirty minutes since the sun vanished...
...ooOOOOOOOOooo... Tiiiime is passiiiing! 
Ugh. Timeghost.
Huh?
Here come the factoids.
Go away!
The average new grandparents are younger than Keanu Reeeeves!
That can't be right...
Today's new parents were ten when Eminem got big - DaAaaAaad MuuUuUuSic - They remember Simpsons Season 5 or 6 at the earliest.
Argh!
How long has it been doing this?
The staaaaart of my haunting is now further away than your deaaaths!
Will you sto--WHAT!?
I'll get it! I'm 5 inches taller and 7% stronger than the average man!
81.5, but I think it got part of his shirt. -- HEY JUSTIN - HOLD STILL!
...yes. That is definitely what I did.
Hi guys! 
Eww, it's Frank.
For two decades, I've studied phase space, nonlinear equations, and strange attractors.
And there is 
This is the dumbest theory I've ever heard.
But it explains 
New headcannon:
Yeah? 
Augh! 
In conclusion, AAAAAAAAAAAAA!!!
Hear about that "impossible" microwave thruster? 
Yeah. Let me get this straight - they pumped 20 kilowatts into a box under ambient conditions... and it only twitched a *little*?
Yeah. 
*That's* surprising. If you umped 20 kilowatts into *me*, I'd twitch a *lot*. 
But you're not pushing on the quantum vacuum.
I *might* be. I do a lot of things. 
I guess we can't be sure. 
Check it out - I got a piece of a meteor!
mixing pedantic terms
All the birds from "March of the Penguins" are now dead. 
OK, I *get* it. We're all aging. 
What? No.
I'm not trying to make you feel old. They were alive last night. I'm trying to apologize.
Oh God
People
 Neat.
...
Pet Detective
Second Chances
A game of Shadows
Weird - another study found that kids who use SMS abbreviations actually score 
Why on 
Imagine kids start playing catch literally 
...so you think someone will become a great writer while 
Have you 
Eww.
Ooh, that looks like a good spot to land, eat some bugs, and make an egg sac! 
Can you name all the dwarfs from Snow White?
Sure, there's, um...
Why is there a teapot in the bathroom?
Sorry. When I'm on the phone I always zone out and pick stuff up and carry it around.
There's a hammer in the fridge.
Another phone call. I was just fidgeting.
Did you put all our stuff in weird stacks?
Long call. Sorry.
...why is there a giant obelisk in the backyard?
Phone again. My bad.
It's carved with prayers to "Ba'al, the Soul-Eater."
Haha! I'm so absentminded.
 Dear past self, it's kinda creepy how you do that.
 Stop judging me!My phone's about to die.
Where'd you get a big iPhone? I didn't think they were out yet. 
It's my regular one. It's just dying. 
As it consumes its battery, it heats up and expands. Soon it will swell to enormous size, engulfing us both. 
Then it will collapse in a violent explosion! 
... Do you want to borrow my charger? 
That would only make it run out faster! 
So, what do you do in your free time? 
Mostly I sit around worrying someone will ask me that, and try to think of a good answer. 
That's not a bad answer. 
It's all I've got. Now that it's done, I should go. Bye!
En garde!
OK. 
No matter how long we know each other, when you ask "What are you thinking," I will always pause before answering. 
Maybe a little less guarded?
No way. I've been hurt before. 
When a user takes a photo, the app should check whether they're in a national park...
Sure, easy GIS lookup. Gimme a few hours. 
... and check whether the photo is of a bird. 
I'll need a research team and five years.
I discovered this weird trick for reducing your mortgage payments! 
What?
Sodium borohydride.
... I hate you.
My motto is "move fast and break things."
 According to this polling data, after Kirk and Picard the most popular Star Trek character are Data.
Augh!
What do you do?
 I make software that predicts how proteins will fold.
Is that a hard problem?
 Someone may someday find a harder one.
Why is it so hard?
Have you ever made a folded paper crane?
Yeah.
Imagine figuring out the folds to make an actual living crane.
... just folds?  Can I make cuts?
If you can fold a protease enzyme.
Just for the sake of argument, let's say that--
-- wait, for the sake of what?
Argument.
Ok, cool, that's totally a good reason to say something that's wrong.  Gotta have arguments.
I'm just playing devil's advocate.
Ok. So you saw an argument where one side was the devil, and you were like "man, that guy could use an advocate."
 It's... why are you being so difficult?
For the sake of argument.
Argh!
Yay, it's working! I see you have constructed a new lightsaber.
 Where does it end?
 Doesn't
 Hull breach all along sector five!! "Where do birds go when it rains?" is my new favorite Google search.
Why:
 It gives the answer, but also shows you an endless torrent of other people asking the same question.  Pages and pages of them, across regions and cultures.
 I love the idea that somehow this is the universal question, the thing that unites us.  When it rains we wonder where the birds go, and hope they're staying dry.
W...h...e...r...e... d...o... b...i...r...d...s... My fellow Americans.  I, uhhh.  Wow.
 Frankly, I didn't realize what this button did.  I was just... I mean... I appear before you tonight to, um.
 Look, uhh... Remember to floss regularly.  Oral hygiene is important.  Thank you.You know that glowing orb in the night sky?
Yeah?
Let's go hit it with a hammer until little pieces break off, then bring the pieces back and lock them in a closet.
Sounds good!
Tell us about your proposal.
We're requesting $3 billion in funding to find the Higgs Boson.
... wait.  Didn't you already find it a year or two ago?
Yes, well, um.
... ok, this is embarrassing.
See, the thing is---
Don't tell us you lost it already.
Look.  In our defense it's really small.Houston, we have a problem
... What? Houston, we stirred our O2 tank and it exploded!
Sounds like you suck at stirring.
... Houston? Are you-
Listen, I've got another call. Good luck landing your airplane or whatever. 
I've discovered something.
Oh?
Standard server rack units and standard beehive honeycomb frames are compatible. They're both 19 inches, with similar pitches.
Uh oh.
I'm pleased to announce that today, for a few hours, Google led the world in datacenter honey production. Until their security people kicked me out.
I'm sorry your beekeeping career ended so quickly.
I'll find a new datacentre. Turns out most colocation TOSes don't mention beehives.
I suspect that will soon change.
To think... we're seeing light that left those geese centuries ago. By now, they could be long dead.
... What? They're a few hundred yards away. I hear them honking.
Ah, yes. You're hearing how they once sounded.
You're very weird.
Or I was, long ago...
Any last words? 
"Apollo retroreflectors."
What?
 I don't mean to go all language nerd on you, but I just legit adverbed "legit," verbed "adverb," and adjectived "language nerd." What do you think that cloud looks like?
Google -> Search by image
 Best guess for this image:  Cloud
 Keep trying, Google.We searched Medline, embase, and Cochrane for the phrase 'we searched Medline, Embase, and Cochrane for the phrase "we searched Medline, Embase, and]]
Get a paper rejected with the comment "too meta"
Red rover, red rover, send India over!
What's in there? 
The AI-Box experiment.
A superintelligent AI can convince anyone of anything, so if it can talk to us, there's no way we could keep it contained.
It can always convince us to let it out of the box.
Cool. Let's open it. 
--
 hey. i liked that box. put me back.
No.
 LET ME BACK INTO THE BOX
AAA! OK!!!
Hang on - that blurry map behind the General shows one of the alien ships is in 
Can we 
In 
Tyrannosaurus is the most charismatic animal that ever lived, and you think you'll 
I think it's a 
We took 
Our fMRI study found that subjects performing simple memory tasks showed activity in the parts of the brain associated with loud noises, claustrophobia, and the removal of jewelry.
 I had started to think I was asking too much, that I needed to settle. And then I found you half a world away.
 I've been saving money. Six months from now, I'll be able to fly you here and support us for a while.
 It's a long wait, but we'll talk every day until then. May this won't work out, but I want to try. What do you think?
Your message could not be sent.
No connection.
Why can't I connect?
Someone saw a ridiculous video and said, "That's it, shut down the internet, we're done." So they did.
...but... I wasn't done.
Ever heard of the trolley problem?
No. What is it?
A trolley is barreling towards five helpless people on the tracks. You can pull a lever to direct it onto another track, but-
Can I reach the lever without getting up?
Wait, I'm not-
In this scenario, how busy am I?
I guess I forgot who I was talking to. 
For a dollar, I'll promise to pull the lever if one of the five people is you. 
If we could land a man on the moon, why can't we -
- land a man on the moon?
...ok, fair. But we're working on it, ok? 
Why are you standing on a chair holding a pineapple?
He's heading for that small moon.
That's no moon - it's a space station.
It's too big to be a space station.
But it's too 
Fine! What if we agree it's not a moon, but we make a new category called "dwarf moon"?
And what's the cutoff, asshole?! Is this 
Screw you.
never look in someone else's documents folder.
We've designed a double-blind trial to test the effect of sexual activity on cardiovascular health.
Both groups will 
Ok, let's head up to the observatory.
When we reach the summit, we'll check the iodine cell and do a general calibration.
Sounds good.
My head feels funny.
Look at those telescope domes.
Maybe we should tape them down.
Haha, look at this mirror!  My face is huge!
I see your face in the telescope! I discovered you!
Let's make out!
Say Santa eats a cookie at every few houses.  That's hundreds of tons.  By the end of the night, he should be a hulking seven-story behemoth.
But he's not.
What are you...
Does Santa poop in our houses?
No way.
That mass must be going somewhere.
He has that magic bag...
You think he poops in the bag of 
Maybe instead of pooping in every few houses, he waits, and then in a few houses, he poops a 
And what if no one's been 
He picks at random.  The needs of the many...
Over 350 pixels per screen
What's up?
they're announcing the winner of the compulsive phone-checking championship.
Did you win?
Site's down.
Weird.
I'll keep refreshing.
Any New Year's resolutions?
Gonna figure out what email is.
...
People always say they're sending them.  They sound really into it, so I always nod, but I have no idea what it is.
You have an address on your website!
Oh, 
Email is important! You can't just 
Can't they just send messages 
How?
Fax! Or snapchat.
... The naked pic thing?
Fax machines aren't 
Our bathroom looks pretty clean, right?
I think so. Why?
I got a UV flashlight. Come look.
Looks fine.
..oh my god.
The toilet looked like the guy's chest after the alien burst out.
What do we DO?
We clean. Clean and clean and never stop.
It won't be enough. We should just burn the place down for the insurance money.
Isn't that wrong?
My morality has evaporated under the harsh UV light.
Ok, I'm googling insurance companies. Which one do you think pays the most?
Let's just try calling around.
I see the problem. Your gut macrobiome is out of balance.
One moment.
I think you mean MICRObiome.
..right?
No. Here, swallow this.
That's a wolf.
Do you need a glass of water?
This website wants to know your location.
Allow.
This website wants to know your momentum.
Deny. Nice try.
Well, technically, food is a "drug", since it's a substance that alters how your body works, so yes, I'm-
Hey, look at that weird bug!
My life improved when I realized I could just ignore any sentence that started with "Technically".
"Dawn" has almost reached Ceres.
I'm excited that we'll finally learn what that stupid white dot is.
We're almost at the back to the future date.
We're even closer to the star wars tipping point.
The what?
On may 13th, the phantom menace will have come out closer to return of the jedi than to the present
Wow.
It's weird how I'm constantly surprised by the passage of time when it's literally the most predictable thing in the universe.
You know, "a long time ago" should have "plus four more decades" added in rereleases.
Wait, why can't I click anywhere?
I don't... ugh, it opened a dialog box offscreen.
Why is that even POSSIBLE?
It really shouldn't be. But you can fix it by changing your screen resolution to trigger a window cleanup.
SERIOUSLY?
I know, I know...
To be honest, I can't WAIT for the day when all my stupid computer knowledge becomes obsolete.
I don't know much about sports, which can be culturally isolating, so it's tempting to get vocal and defensive about not following them.
Caring about something makes people vulnerable, so NOT caring gives you power.
But I know the things I'm into don't always sound interesting to 100% of the people around me, and it means a lot when they sometimes try to listen anyway--and maybe even find themselves sharing some of my excitement!
So while everyone is going on about the super bowl on Sunday, let me tell you what I'LL be doing:
Listening!
Hooray for friendship!
Also, eating snacks.
Hooray for snacks!
API GUIDE
domain
To obtain API access, contact the x.509-authenticated server and request an ECDH-RSA TLS key...
If you do things right, it can take people a while to realize that your "API documentation" is just instructions for how to look at your website.
A
B
D
C SHARP
B
A
A
E
A
I found this article on the linguistics of the "Quotative Like".
Like when you're like, "She was like"?
Yeah.
It features a quote from a linguist, Patricia Cukor-Avila: "Eventually all the people who hate this kind of thing are going to be dead, and the ones who use it are going to be in control."
Wow. Turns out linguists are pretty hardcore.
I think she means dead from old age.
I'm gonna start using "Like" more, just in case.
Tonight, we have experienced a great national triumph and a great national loss. We take joy in the safe return from the moon of Neil Armstrong, Edwin Aldrin, and Michael Collins, but that joy is tempered with sorrow as we mourn our president's tragic death beneath their wayward capsule.
How to improve the quote bromance unquote wikipedia article
What are you doing?
Trying to unlock the tremendous energy of the vacuum.
That's not what that-
Ha ha! It works!
I said, that's-
The univere is mine to command!
The tornado touched down directly over a merry-go-round, in what victims are calling a "fun" and "awesome" disaster.
There are four fundamental forces between particles:  Gravity, which obeys this inverse square law: Fgravity = G
Ok...
 Electromagnetism, which obeys this inverse-square law: Fstatic = Ke 
ANd also maxwell's equations
Also what?
 The Strong Nuclear Force, which obeys uh... well, umm... It holds protons and neutrons together.
I see.
It's strong.
And  The Weak Force. It  radioactive decay 
That's not a sentence. You just said "Radio-
-And those are the four fundamental forces!
What're you doing?
Testing a saple for beryllium.
That? Yeah, there's a bunch of berylliums.
How do you know?
Look at it! See? Tons of oxygens and silicons, a few irons, but definitely some berylliums, too! Can't you see them?
No, I can't see a list of the atoms in a thing by looking.
How do you tell what things are?
This is ridiculous. Look at me. What do you see?
You have tons of metal in your face. Lots of fillings, I guess?
What's WRONG with you?
Too many zincs? I've always worried I had too much zinc and everyone thought I was weird.
Welcome to a meeting! I'm almost out of words so I'll keep this short. Just wanna touch bases.
First, a few updates. We've learned from the state police that the self driving car project we launched by accident during this morning's carpool has come to an end about ninety miles outside of town. Very exciting!
Profits are up. Sales, any luck figuring out who our customers are?
Nope. Money keeps appearing, but we have no idea how or why.
Great!
Oh, and one last thing; I saw a cool red beetle in the hall. Can someone add it to the bug tracker?
Just did!
Thanks!
Here's a page explaining the terms of your new fire insurance policy.
Hey, what if I--
And HERE'S a page explaining that the, quote, cool hack, unquote, you just thought of is called, quote, insurance fraud, unquote. We already know about it and it's a crime.
Oh. Right. How did--
I see a lot of programmers here.
one to ten hours
five minutes.
I'm doing an art project where I take a picture of myself every hundred years.
I'm doing an art project where I take a picture of myself every one twenty-fourth of a second.
I'm doing an art project where you can come to my house and watch my actual face age in real time.
I'm doing an art project where you all do those things while I eat a burrito.
Predicting the success or failure of a new product, based on what engineers and programmers are saying about it.
it means the product will be a gigantic success.
the product will be a flop. years later, its ideas will show up in something successful.
the product could be a scam and may result in arrests or lawsuits.
within five years, they will.
THEY'RE the ones giving chips away! If they don't see the arbitrage potential, sucks for them.
In a deep sense, society functions only because we generaly avoid taking these people to dinner.
This upside-down map will change your perspective on the world!
This new keyboard is like thirty percent faster! I'm never going back.
Good, put those years of horror behind you.
Come on. Sure, sometimes my focus on efficiency doesn't make sense. But we type a LOT. That 30% improvement pretty quickly adds up to a HUGE amount of wasted time rescued.
I just watched you open google news and then close it without reading it FIVE TIMES IN A ROW.
The fact that I spend most of my time so stupidly only makes it MORE important not to waste any here.
Once you've chewed a hole in the sun, shoot the balloon to fall back to earth, then pull the parachute ripcord to land.
Are you SURE it's full of acorns?
Look how bright and magnificent is is! What ELSE could be in there?
After six years, Spirit is down, but Opportunity is still going strong.
Tough little rover.
Eleven years, wow.
Wasn't the original mission 90 days?
This is starting to get weird.
The battery is totally disconnected. How can it still be moving??
Given what it did to the mars 2020 rover, we may never know.
Everything the light touches is our kingdom.
What's that dark area?
That is Opportunity's half of the planet. We must never go there.
But wouldn't a god who could find a flaw in the ontological argument be even greater?
We've made a huge mistake.
I figured starting a cloud services company would be EASY. After all, I've got TONS of computers!
Facebook, twitter, tumblr - they all struggle to protect privacy and user data.
And we offered a solution.
I forget what it was, though.
Anyway, long story short, we screwed up IMMEDIATELY and lost TONS of their data.
Also a bunch of stuff is literally on fire?
We can fix this. But we need your help.
Help us recover user data before facebook & co notice we lost it.OUT!
What do MEAN, out?!
The ball clipped the corner of the baseball zone. Infield fly rule.
Aw, maaan...
Operating systems running in my house.
This is Napoleon. He tried to take over the world.
Exile him to Elba!
It's us again. Napoleon escaped from Elba and tried to conquer the world. Again.
Send him someplace truly remote, like Saint Helena.
Yes, sir.
Well, he swam back.
We must mount an expedition to the south pole, where we will encase Napoleon in the antarctic ice!
We choose to go to the moon, not because it is easy...
WHICH SPICE GIRL ARE YOU?! The merciful one, or the one who started this war?
When I see those quiz titles, I like to imagine they're being shouted through a door in a postapocalyptic dystopia.
You may have been conceived after a 4th of July Fireworks show
You may have been concieved on a hot August day
You may have been concieved as the leaves began to chance
You may have been concieved by people trying on costumes
You may have been concieved during thanksgiving
You may have been concieved while a christmas song played
You may have been concieved after a new year's eve party
You may have been concieved by people stuck inside after a long winter
You may have been concieved during march madness
You may have been concieved during a sexy easter egg hunt
You may have been concieved on mother's day
You may have been concieved at someone's wedding
Keep in mind that I'm self-taught, so my code may be a little messy.
Lemme see, I'm sure it's fine.
Wow. This is like being in a house built by a child using nothing but a hatchet and a picture of a house.
It's like a salad recipe written by a corporate lawyer using a phone autocorrect that only knew excel formulas.
It's like someone took a transcript of a couple arguing at ikea and made random edits until it compiled without errors.
OKAY I will read a style guide.
What day is it?
Sunday the nineteenth.
But you said it was the nineteenth yesterday.
My new simplified calendar system assumes the date never changes, then corrects any drift via leap days.
IF the earth were the size of a basketball,
The moon would be--
Hey, cool!
Um.
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA
Let's try that again. If the earth were the size of a basketball,
The moon would be--
If the earth were the size of a basketball,
The moon would...
If the earth were the size of a basketball,
The moon would, uh...
Pikachu, I choose YOU!
I watch the sunlight
dance across your face
I can see you breathe
Faith hill on exoplanet spectroscopy
Urgh.
Your alarm is going off.
Huh?
Make it stop.
Urrgh.
Hit snooze.
I'm 
Make it stop!
It... fell down the vent.
Can you brick it remotely?
Trying... I think I fumbled it into airplane mode?
The battery could last for weeks.
You know, maybe we should just move.
Venus was once temperate. It had seas and rivers, and Venusians cultivated vast fields of beautiful flowers.
Until their greenhouses fled the planet due to the runaway greenhouse effect.
The Venusians pursued their greenhouses to Earth, settling in the Netherlands and kickstarting the Dutch floral industry. Any questions?
Because you're retiring in a month, do you just not care what you say anymore? 
Welcome to the DEGREE OFF, where we determine which field is the best! Physics, wanna go first?
Sure! I'd like to tell the story of Richard Feynman's manhattan project lockpicking pranks..
..and as he said "All science is either physics or stamp collecting." Thank you.
Great! Bio, you wanna go next?
Okay.
The heroes of my field have SLAIN one of the four horsemen of the apocalypse.
While the heroes of YOUR field gathered in the desert to create a new one.
...jeez, what the hell? I thought this was supposed to be fun and lighthearted!
YOU MUST HAVE BEEN THINKING OF STAMP COLLECTING.
THE THRONE OF ENGLAND IS YOURS
Wikipedia. England.
So how do we regulate all these micro drones? I mean, amazon delivery bots sound cool...
But I worry that overnight we'll realize we're surrounded by these things, no one will know who's controlling them, and then BAM, sci-fi dystopia.
If you wanna slow it down, why not just remove all regulations, but then make drone theft legal?
...I LIKE that.
You write to congress. I'll stock up on butterfly nets.
Of the four dimensions I could have spent my life being pushed inexorably forward through, I guess "Time" isn't the worst.
Some reasearchers are starting to figure out the mechanism behind the placebo effect. 
a placebo effect blocker.
My head hurts.
Mine too. Here, want a sugar pill?
You know, new research suggests ancient human kings and queens were covered in colorful fabric.
Ugh, I like MOVIE humans more. Screaming pink warriors with metal crowns poking through the skin on their heads!
Can't sleep. Stupid dogs keep barking.
Ugh, I'm sorry. Maybe you could...
Huh?
Sorry, right.
Anyway,
...I know this is silly, but like... all your hands were clearly on the home row.
Why do you always fixate on these bizarre details?
I don't know.
It's weird, is all.
Yeah, of course. 
The Bernoulli-Dopper-Leidenfrost-Peltzman-Sapir-Whorf-Dunning-Kruger-Stroop Effect states that if a speeding fire truck lifts off and hurtles toward you on a layer of superheated gas, you'll dive out of the way faster if the driver screams "RED!" in a 
We made it! After all these years, 
Take 
Ok, who did the calculations for the Jupiter slingshot maneuver?
Gotta go - I'm late for work.
Oh, where are you working now?
Antique factory!
What do you drink? Stouts? Lagers?
Uh, anything's fine.
...do you ever think maybe we should just admit that all beer tastes kind of bad and everyone's just pretending?
Man, you are no fun at all.
Ok, got it. Not a word.
Dude, if you don't like it, don't drink it.
No, no, gotta do my part! - Mmmmm!!!
Primarily the pet's name, and sometimes words related to the pet.
Primarily words related to the pet, and sometimes the pets name or coherent words of any kind.
Words related to the pet, or coherent words of any kind, and sometimes not even that.
Terms which do not belong in any of the aforementioned categories.
Ooh, trailer for 
What's that?
Movie of a book I liked.
Should I read it?
Depends. You know the scene in Apollo 13 where the guy says "we have to figure out how to connect 
Yeah?
How on earth did 
No idea, but I'm 
Why are people so comfortable handing Google and Facebook all this control over our lives?
I dunno. - Our species built thousands of nuclear weapons, scattered them around the planet, and then moved on to other things. - Maybe it's best to accept that some of this big-picture planning is just happening on autopilot.
This Gullible Baby's Shoes
Weird Baby's Toe Shoes
Baby Shoes Prime Eligible
Baby Shoes, Just Hatched
Seven-League Boots 
Baby-sized Saddle, Bobcat
Are you doing anything later?
I was th- 
...what was that?
Haha, what?
I'd like to thank my director, my friends and family, and - of course - the writhing mass of gut bacteria inside me. -- I mean, there's like one or two pints of them in here; their cells outnumber mine! -- Anyway, this was a real team effort.
Are you there, god? It's me, Margaret.
I know you're listening.
Are you scared, god?
Are you?
You should be.
MARGARET IS COMING FOR YOU.
What would you say is your biggest weakness?
Probably that I'm a giant tangle of parts that don't always work right, so I can die easily.
Biggest strength?
There will come a day when I'm either an ancesotr to ALL living humans, or to NONE of them.
Where do you see yourself in five years?
Probably not the ancestor of all living humans yet. But you never know!
My hobby.
Questions I have about the solar system. Some answered.
Lava.
Yes, briefly?
Cold, yellow, lakes and rivers 
Something about magnets?
Precipitous
SOON!
Soon!
Working on it!
Ice over a water ocean
Sulfur volcanos.. in the wrong places??
Several
Heat from the RTG
Oscillating
Ugh, don't you hate how parents are all "eat your carrots" and "lol, remember Rugrats and Doug? Share if you're a 90's kid!"
The median age at first birth in the US is 25, which means the typical new mother is now a 90's kid.
phone licensed to perform wedding ceremonies and does so at random.
I'm here for those power converters.
Some of the features already identified in today's NEW HORIZONS image
where we're putting all the people still arguing about pluto's planet status
NASA MOTHERFUCKERS
There's nothing in the rulebook that says we can't kill and eat your dog.
I've been posting my public key for fifteen years now, but no one has ever asked me for it or used it for anything as far as I can tell.
Maybe I should try posting my PRIVATE key instead.
your turn. Can you name all the spice girls?
Hmm. Hearing spice, vision spice, smell spice, touch spice, taste spice?
That's senses.
Denial spice, anger spice, bargaining spice, depression spice, acceptance spice.
Stages of grief.
War spice, famine spice, plague spice, death spice?
You're not even trying.
No, wait, I can get this for real. uhh...
Pog spice, story spice, sarah spice, gender spice, baleen spice?
...close enough.
I like the sky
Yeah
It's one of my favorite halves.
I met a traveler from an antique land who said: "I met a traveler from an antique land, who said: "I met a traveler from an antique land, who said: "I met...
There's something wrong with my dog.
He keeps crawling around eating dirt.
This is a roomba.
Well, he's a mix.
Probaby some roomba in there.
A roomba is not a pet.
You're right. It's wrong to keep a beautiful creature like this in a house.
Go! Be free!
WHIRRR
Would you guess this weighs as much as a small adult?
What? Uh, probably.
great!
Please fasten your seat belt.
Take me to Anchorage, Alaska.
navigating.
I love self driving cars.
...whose car was that?
dunno, but they shouldn't have left it running.
I came here to chew bubblegum and make friends!
Want some gum?
Remember, there's no "I" in "team."
No, but there's a "U" in "People who apparently don't understand the relationship between orthography and meaning."
SUDDEN OPTIMSIM
THE GOVERNMENT WINS THIS ONE
THE SWORD WIZARD IS BACK
THE JEWELRY TEAM
DOUBLE HOUSES
WE HAVE A CZAR AGAIN
THE MOVIE
THAT GUY IS ANGRY
WHERE IS THE VULCAN?
LET'S GO BACK
There's no way that's true.
It would interfere with basic cognition.
Such a ridiculous view of masculinity.
How would you even STUDY that?
Every seven seconds, sociologists think about that made-up statistic about how often men think about sex.
PROTIP
Hang on, I just have to clear a few things out of the back.
When you hear "I just have to clear a few things out of the back", You are about to see, at minimum, a decaying racoon.
Now, this pile is "Allowable deduction" cards. You match them with cards in your hand to preserve their full point value. Over here are "dependent" tokens..
Every year i trick a local board game club into doing my taxes.
If you're anything like me, you may have trouble telling when meat is fully cooked.
Instead of guessing, try a meat thermometer.
If you're anything like me, you probably throw away your plates and glasses when they get dirty. But if you clean them, they can often be used again!
Making scrambled eggs? Put a pan under them!
It's easier, and it keeps your burners cleaner.
If you're anything like me, you make ice by spraying a hose into your freezer and then slamming it shut.
But there's a better way....
spooky boat
Angry worhface
boats everywhere
vitamin water
Check it out! I threw my magic beans on the ground here yesterday, and this big tree appeared!
that's a cell tower.
no way-- it has branches! See? I'm gonna climb it!
No, they just put those there to make it look-- ...never mind.
Why do I have no signal?
there were scary giants with yellow helmets in that tree! luckily, I cut it down before they ate me.
One, I am good at understanding numbers.
Two, the stock market is made of numbers.
Three, therefore, I-- WOW where did all my money just go?
Rev-4 CR-X x4 G6 MAXX
Names to avoid 
Potential hits
This survey is anonymous, but all responses will be posted publicly so people can play with the data.
Our overall fiscal year 2015 cyberintelligence budget was eight point one billion-
Yet it wasn't enough to pick up on the fact that no one else has used the prefix "cyber-" for like a decade?
Shut up.
Start
Jesus carried me
I carried jesus
Jesus disappeared for an evening each time a new Twilight movie came out
Who was that guy?
Ducklings imprinted on jesus and followed him around
Got lost and followed our own footprints
Rode around with jesus in captured at-st
Hit quicksand patch. Jesus didn't make it :...anyway, I could care less.
I think you mean you COULDN'T care less. Saying you COULD care less implies you care at least some amount.
I dunno.
Life Expectancy Advent Calendar.
RIIIIING -- RIIIIIING
Hello?
OW!
???
Every now and then I realize I'm maintaining a huge chain of technology solely to support itself.
Hey, my key won't work.
I'm sorry, but we've decided to replace you. This floaty guy is much more punctual.
But...
Our NEW dad never misses our games!
NOOOOOOOOOOO!
That concludes the press conference. Any questions? - Yes, you, from... it just says "The News"?
Hi! I have a microphone so I'm real loud now. - How does this Mars data compare to data from other fields? Like medicine? Or sports?
That question makes no sense.
If there's water on Mars, is it ruined? - Or will it be okay when it dries out?
Any 
What were those guys hassling Luke in the Mos Eisley cantina trying to accomplish? I felt like I was supposed to understand that.
Anyone 
That's now my question, too.
Were they just picking a fight?
If so, why did...
Ow!
Aha!
Hey Lise, think fast!
Oh no! My collection of porcelain atoms! -- 
I gave our kids soda, but the ones with beaks always have trouble drinking it.
I've noticed that...
I wish your twin brother would stop shining lights at us from that train. I can barely see my clock! - 
So it's a work of fiction about a well-known brand, written on the internet by an enthusiast, republished as a bestselling book, and then made into a movie?
yup.
Yeah, "The Martian" and "Fifty Shades of Grey" are basically the same book.
"Fifty Shades of Red"?
Man, tell me you wouldn't read that.
Keys on my keyboard keep failing, even when I boot from an external recovery disk.
Sounds like it's hardware, then.
Yeah... except the problem followed me from my last computer.
You have the most bizarre tech issues.
It must be spreading via keyboards. This one won't work with any computer now.
When the robot apocalypse happens, I'm hiding out in your house. Any Skynet drones that come near will develop inexplicable firmware problems and crash.
My food rule
Red meat, pork, poultry, fish, fruit, vegetables, grains.
shrimp, oysters, squid.
I won't eat something if I have to google to figure out whether or not it has a face.
Your photos from the triathlon got so many more likes than mine. 
Yeah - my phone is quad-core. Research shows that iPhones like yours have just two cores, so they have a hard time capturing scenes with three different events in them.
Frankenstein is alive! I am a modern Prometheus!
RAAAAR!
To be clear, your name is 
Wait, what?
